2
THE
FIRST OF THE KNICKERBOCKERS:
A TALE OF 1673. CHAPTER I.
The
great State of New York, rejoicing now in its
separate sovereignty, and in its vast metropolis, the
conceded capital of the western world, and vieing in
resources, both of money and muscles, with the old
nations of Europe, seems scarce possibly the same
which, less than two centuries ago, was the colonial
appendage alternately of England and Holland, and
but lightly valued by either. But let it not lower thy
honest pride, oh vaunted Empire State! to remember
those earlier days, when, in the shuttlecock state of
thy existence, thou wast bandied about from owner
to owner, now seized by force, and now a mere
makeweight
,
thrown in to settle some more important
bargain
.
And thou, oh gorgeous city of Manhattan!
mart of nations! blush not to own thy former self in
a small provincial town, clustered around its parent
fortress, to carry out the pleasing illusion of
protection
beneath its dread armament of sixteen frowning
guns. Formidable at least were they to the prowling
savage, lurking in undiscovered haunts, where now
the tide of human life rolls thickest, and where loudest
comes the busy hum of commerce to the ear.
Renowned among the primitive patriarchs of the
New Netherlands, a stickler for the dignity and honor
of the States General, and a fitting representative of
his transatlantic progenitors, was old Evert
Knickerbocker
.
His fortunes, like his affections, were so
intimately
connected with the rise and decadence of the
ancient Dutch dynasty in New Amsterdam, as to
render
an account of the one to some extent a history of
the other. Yet to neither of these weighty tasks does
the humble pen of the present narrator aspire. An
outline sketch of the character and fortunes of the
venerable Evert is all that can with safety be
promised
;
for the shades of his cotemporary heroes are
also hovering near, and many thronging memories are
summoned from the cloudy realms of Tradition,
obedient
to the spell of that magical name. To throw
around these aerial messengers the fetters of pen and
ink, and to preserve them a little longer from their
destined oblivion, or mayhap, ah, wo is me! to hasten
them, by an unfortunate association, to that gloomy end,
such is my more humble expectation. Thy memory,
oh noble and magnanimous Evert! embodiment of
the sterling virtues of a noble and magnanimous
people
,
may form indeed the theme of passing eulogy,
thy frailties perhaps elicit a passing smile. But thou
art introduced now and here (be quiet, restive shade!)
rather as the usher and forerunner of one claiming
a more distinguished notice. Nay, never shake thy
hoary locks at me! A friend and confidant of the
valiant Stuyvesant, sayest thou? a member of his
privy council? one of his body-guard, as 'twere?
What though thou wert? Thou art a shade,
innocuous
now, and must stand awhile aside, while Youth
and Beauty claim our first regard.
Youth and Beauty! Perennial ideas of a flitting
reality! how like the sunshine do ye glide from point
to point, among the generations of men, gilding with
your beams each successive race, and followed still by
the penumbra of advancing age. Not such, however,
are their reflections who bask within your beams, nor
such were thine, oh pure and peerless Effie! fairest
of Manhattan's many fair! rejoicing in thy dowery of
charms, profuse as blossoms on the vernal bough.
The shade of Evert stands appeased, and smiles
approving
now, willing, as in life, to concede to thee, sole
centre of his love, all precedence of praise.
A picture of happiness and content were they, the
gray-haired man and his beautiful daughter, sitting at
summer's twilight in the open porch that overlooked
the silvery Hudson, while fragrant wreaths of smoke
hung suspended, halo-like, above the head of the one,
and glossy curls, brown, rich and silken, floated as
airily around the gently-tinted cheeks of the other.
Not with embroidery or booksfeatures rather of
a more modern daywere Effie's snowy fingers
busy; but, girt with mysterious utensils of long, slim
wire, they nimbly moved, while eyes and thoughts
were roaming far abroad, unheeding pussy's playful
antics with the stray ball of worsted, which she now
tapped daintily with velvet paw, and now pounced
fiercely on, with talons all unsheathed.
If shadows could make indentures, Evert's portrait
would have adorned the wall, daguerreotyped by
the setting sun; for where now he sat, had he
regularly
smoked his evening pipe, through the warm
months of summer, for twenty-five long years. There,
eight years before, had he been startled from his
wonted reverie upon the future greatness of the New
Netherlands, and the growing honor of their High
Mightinesses, by the booming guns, whose echoes
across the bay and through the distant forests, were
but the prolonged dirge of his patriotic hopes. An
English fleet was in the harbor, and an English
army on its decks. Not numerous, it is true, were
the foe, nor many were their floating forts, but
there was enough to strike terror into many an honest
burgher's heart, and to turn the lips of Evert whiter
than the falling ashes of his pipe. He was one of the
few valiant spirits who, clustering around their
dauntless
governor, the good old Stuyvesant, would, like
him, have repelled the invasion by the sacrifice of
their lives; and if the superabundant valor of a few
could have been infused into the sluggish masses, not
then at least would the banners of St. George have
waved in triumph over the walls of New Amsterdam.
Grievous indeed had been the troubles of the worthy
Stuyvesant and his doughty band of councillors. Is
it not recorded by Diedrich the Great, in the ancient
chronicles of New York, how the steady and successive
encroachments of the English colonies upon the Dutch
governor's domains had long before tasked all his
resources of resistance? How even argument, which,
next to powder, the military governor esteemed, and
which he did not scorn to use when the munitions of
war were wanting, had failed to convince the
expansive
New Englanders of the duty of staying at home?
That principle, which since has grown into a proverb,
was already implanted in the puritan breasts, and
new settlements were then, as now, all the rage. The
banks of the Delaware, the green shores of Long
Island, and even the vicinity of the noble Hudson,
Dutch in its discovery, Dutch by long possession, and
Dutch in the very language of its gurgling waters,
bore witness that the future schoolmasters of
America
were already abroad. It was in vain to reason
with a people whose modest charter reached to the
Pacific coast, and who purchased their lands, not of
proprietaries, or of crowns, but of their natural
owners
,
the Indians. Where, then, are the New
Netherlands
?
was the question of the perplexed
governor
,
in response to the vast and increasing claims
of the Yankees; and not soothing to that testy
functionary
was the laconic reply of his adversaries,
`We do not know.
But now the crowning calamity had come; the
reverberations
of the threatening cannon had died away;
the lofty demand of surrendry, the patriotic resolves
of the few, the pusillanimous capitulation of the
manyall was over. The gallant governor was
deposed
,
and Sir Richard Nichols reigned in his stead.
But, saith an ancient and punning chronicler, unknown
to the present age, if Nichols
reigned
, Stuyvesant
stormed
, and tempestuous indeed was the time.
And Evert, too, was at first turbulent with wrath;
but in his milder nature that gusty passion soon sank
to a subdued and gentle grief; and nightly now,
as he took his accustomed seat, did he lament the
passing away of the good old times, and with
fragmentary
hopes of their return, build airy castles,
smoke-encircled, and vanishing in smoke. But time
had tempered his grief, and moderated his
expectations
.
A change
might
comehe would not despair;
but he no longer looked daily to see the gallant
Tromp whitening the Narrows with his crowded
sails, nor watched the iron weather-cock for favoring
winds to let in the imaginary fleet. With
Stuyvesant
,
now a private citizen, and his boon companion,
he revelled in the memories of the past, and enjoyed,
not sparingly, the creature comforts of life, with a zest
seemingly but little impaired by care. He was wont,
it is true, to decry even the dainties on which he
luxuriated
,
as inferior to those produced under the old
Dutch rule. But it was remarked that it was always
the second flagon of ale which elicited criticism, and
the fourth dozen of oysters, in which, although
confessedly
plump and luscious, there was ever a lack of
a certain flavor peculiar to their ancestors.
But Evert had substantial cause for his attachment
to the parent country. His large possessionsand
very large they werewere chiefly the fruit of her
bounty, a munificent requital for early colonial
services
which had been deemed important by the home
government. His estate lay chiefly upon Long Island,
although his homestead was in the city, and he held
an unheeded title-deed for a few hundred acres of wild
land a mile beyond the city wall, and stretching along
the shore of the Hudson. In regard to this
last-named
property, he had often expressed his confident
conviction that, but for the calamitous change in the
government, his children would have lived to see it
highly valuable, and worth perhaps even a guilder to
the acre. But Evert was a sanguine man, and must
not be censured for his enthusiasm. His household,
at the period now spoken of, consisted only of himself
and two children, with the usual retinue of slaves
incident
,
even at that early day, to all the wealthy Dutch
families. The beautiful Effie has already been named,
and of her brother it is sufficient at present to say
that he was a merry, rattling wag of twenty-two,
full of life, and utterly indifferent, as long as he was
allowed to pursue his piscatory and forest sports
unmolested
,
whether Charles the Second was his
sovereign
,
or whether he was under the dominion of their
Mighty Highnesses, (as he used to call them,) the
States General of Holland. The venison was as good,
he said, after feasting heartily upon a haunch which
had been bounding at sunrise over the hills of Harlem,
as in the days of the Dutch, but the more frequent
salutes at the fort were scaring the deer farther into
the wilderness. He cared little for this, however, for
he had a noble hunter, which had been sent to him
by a sporting cousin in Holland, and upon which,
together with six hounds and a few promising puppies,
was lavished, seemingly, the whole wealth of his
affections
.
It will naturally be supposed that Effie, the
beautiful
,
and the heiress, was not without her admirers;
for our ancestors of that age, unlike ourselves, are
said not always to have been indifferent to metallic
charms. Suitors she certainly had, and while we
have been wandering, instead, to other subjects, it
ought to have been said that the party on the Dutch
councillor's stoop had been increased to threethat a
young and buckish-looking gallant was disputing with
the kitten the honor of holding Miss Effie's ball of
worsted, and that the little belle, smiling coldly, was
listening with a semi-frown to the pretty flatteries of
her companion.
CHAPTER II.
Among
the colleagues of the venerable Mr.
Knickerbocker
in the council-board of the last governor of
New Netherlands, was one Wilhelmus Groesbeck,
the counterpart in many respects of Evert, his
co-immigrant
in early life, and, as the latter was
accustomed
to designate him, a man of substance. But,
alas for time and change! the New Netherlands
had ceased to exist; the governor no longer wielded
the dread
baton
of office; the council-board was
broken up, and the man of substance was a shade.
Although in life he had enjoyed the pleasing
illusion
of being the owner of a certain portion of
the planet on which he had been permitted to live,
his title, as grave men of the law advise, extending to
the centre of the earth, three thousand nine hundred
and sixty-seven miles, (and some odd feet, which he
was willing to throw off,) notwithstanding all this, he
died, it is believed, without materially changing the
position of his property. Not, however, without
decidedly
changing the position of a scape-grace son,
who had watched hopefully his progenitor's apoplectic
symptoms for many years, and who was disconsolate
indeeduntil all attempts at resuscitation were
abandoned
.
This son, by that strange perversity of
affection
so often observed, had ever been the chief object
of his father's regard, and found himself now, the
principal heir to his estate, and the direct devisee of
many wise and well-worded admonitions besides.
That Egbert was a
first
child, and thus peculiarly
the remembrancer of one who had long forsaken
earththat he bore
her
featuresthat he had been
her
idolthese perhaps were some of the strands of
that strong paternal affection which had outlived
ingratitude
and rebellion. For Wilhelmus had another
son, who, if not disinherited, was left comparatively
indigent, and dependent in part upon the bounty of
his elder brother, to whose protection he was
commended
.
The partial parent, proud of his estate, had
been desirous that it should be preserved entire, in
one branch of the family; and there was something in
the bold and dashing air of his eldest boy which
commended
him to the father's view, as a fitting person to
perpetuate the ancestral honors. He was a headlong
fellow, and although entirely selfish and unprincipled,
bore an exterior of frankness and candor, not a little
pleasing to the casual observer. He was a famous
sportsman too, and had carried off the honors of the
chase on many a well-contested fieldtriumphs so
nearly martial, as to elevate him highly in the good
graces of the late military governor.
Rudolph was bookish, mild and contemplative.
He soared to many an empyrean eminence of
thought, and if he took any flying leaps, it was
upon the winged steed of Parnassus. He never
participated
in the wassail or the song with the bloods
of the day, the ebullitions of whose coarser nature
seemed to jar upon his sensitive mind. Yet his heart
was a well-spring of every noble affection, and he
was alive to all the harmonies and beauties of Nature.
If modest and retiring, he was firm and stable in his
character, (thanks to his Flemish blood!) and he was
possessed of a fund of humor, which, although always
sparkling, seldom degenerated into sarcasm. Such
were the brothers, to whom the great Groesbeck
estate had descended, in a shower of wealth to the
one, and a slender competence to the other.
But Egbert had additional cause for
self-gratulation
,
besides that of being the recipient of so bountiful
a patrimony; for he was the affianced partner of the
beautiful Effie. Not that any personal compact
existed between them, but the matter had been
arranged years before, by older heads, which,
shaking
themselves wisely together, had settled the whole
affair, leaving nothing at all for the youngsters to
do, excepting quietly to acquiesce in the proposed
arrangement, when the set time should arrive. What
effect Egbert's sudden enfranchisement from paternal
authority was like to have upon the matter, did not
at once appear. Certain it is that he showed no
proper appreciation of his privileges. The fruit
which hangs within our grasp, however rich and
luscious, is not always the most tempting; for the
eye ever wanders to the more distant branches, and
searches for inaccessible treasures. Indeed the
modest
and retiring charms of Effie, were scarcely
calculated
to captivate so coarse a mind as that of Egbert.
The hoyden beauty who could meet midway his
addresses, who could flatter and cajole him, who
could talk vociferously and laugh boisterously, was
far more likely to attract his admiration; and such a
charmer, unfortunately for the young heir, lived in his
neighborhood, the sole object of whose ambition was
his subjugation. She was the daughter of one Hiram
Sharp, a man who had transferred his talents from
one of the New England settlements to that of New
York, but a few years prior to the period now spoken
of. As this latter personage, like his daughter, is
destined to figure somewhat in the following
narrative
,
it may be allowable here briefly to describe him.
Of Miss Euphemia, and of her younger brother, who
was just arrived at man's estate, and rejoiced in the
sonorous name of Benhadad, little need at present
be said, as the progress of this history will
sufficiently
develope their prominent beauties of
character
.
Hiram had been a lawyer, and one of that variety
which so often brings opprobrium upon his noble
profession. The organ of cunning, whatever may
be its designation in the nomenclature of phrenology,
was the nucleus of his brain: his pineal gland was
there, and his soul; for Hiram was what is called an
acute man. He was wide awake, as the saying is;
that is to say, he was always looking out for his own
interests, and looking on coldly, yet closely, at
everything
else. Of about fifty years, rather tall, slightly
stooping, with a sharp spectacled face, and little
restless
gray eyes, laughing much, and sneering more,
but always watchingsuch was Mr. Sharp. He was
not at the time now spoken of, properly a lawyer, for
he had abandoned his profession, and was engaged in
a miscellaneous trading business far more lucrative.
He bought peltry of the Indians, poor simpletons,
who thronged his doors, eager to exchange the
wealth of the forests for valueless trinkets, or the
suicidal draught. He was suspected, too, of carrying
on a still more reprehensible species of commerce.
It is well known that, in that early state of the colony,
the government, weak and unsettled, was often
compelled
to wink at the greatest enormities. Pirates
thronged the seas, and, scarcely dissembling their
character, visited the settlements. They were, of
course, a rough, bull-dog race, whose huge whiskers
and jaunty caps were a terror to all beholders, and
the weak officials of the law were fain to believe
them good honest seamen, a little eccentric perhaps,
but evidently industrious and thriving. These
worthies
were often seen lounging about Hiram's store,
and if rich foreign fabrics adorned his shelves more
plentifully on such occasionsit was a coincidence
certainly, but what was a coincidence! You would
not deprive a man of his good name merely on
suspicion
,
gentle reader, and if you would, let me tell
you that your ancestors were far more charitable.
Certain it is that Hiram Sharp was famed for being a
man of good moral character. It was what he prided
himself upon. He could have brought troops of
witnesses
to any tribunal to testify to it, and Captain
Ripley, the gentleman from Portugal, would have
clinched the matter with more oaths probably, than
any magistrate would have required. It is scarcely
necessary to say that Mr. Sharp waxed wealthy.
His roots struck deep into the soil, and his branches
overshadowed the land. They overshadowed, too,
many an honest Dutch burgher, who, in the quiet
contemplation of his cabbages, his pipes, and his
chubby-headed boys, saw the tide of trade roll
turbulently
by, without ever dreaming of embarking
upon its treacherous surface. They vented some
harmless imprecations, at times, upon the upstart
Yankee
,
fully believing that Satan was his right-hand
man, and that he would yet be seen flying away
bodily with the wily lawyer, and all his ill-gotten
treasures. Mr. Knickerbocker was among the
few wealthy Hollanders whose possessions greatly
exceeded those of the New Englander, and the stock
of moral qualities which was hoarded up in the
guileless
breast of the latter, was enhanced and
beautified
by the crowning one of envy. He could not
bear to see the silver-haired Evert walking quietly
about, with his hands behind him, the acknowledged
proprietor of fifty thousand acres of land. And when
he learned that his own amiable daughter, imbued
with paternal prudence, was angling wilily for the
treasures of the defunct Groesbeck, his dislike to the
Knickerbockers was by no means diminished; for he
knew well the intended union of Egbert and Effie,
and he had but little hope that it could be prevented.
But when Hiram could do nothing else, he could
watch
, and silently and calmly he observed the course
of events. Yet vigilant as he was, there were some
things which eluded his observation, or he would
have ceased so eagerly to desire the alliance which
he contemplated for his daughter. Egbert's wealth
gave but little promise of perpetuity. A career
marked by folly and extravagance did not necessarily
lead him to transcend his ample income, but there is
one variety of vice which undermines with facility the
most colossal fortunes. If the administration of the
Duke of York had been signalized by a large accession
of English gentry, and gallant cavaliers, to the
province
,
it had also been marked by the influx of
adventurers
of every description. Gambling had then as
now its fashionable devotees, and its systematic
sharpers, who were quick to discover their legitimate
prey; and when it is said that Egbert unwarily
ventured
within the circuit of this great moral maelstrom,
the precariousness of his possessions will be readily
conceded. But his addiction to so fatal a habit,
notwithstanding
his losses had already been large, was
unknown even to the astute Hiram, and was of course
unsuspected by Mr. Knickerbocker; for the heavy
mortgages which lay upon his fair fields did not
change their smiling aspect, or check their growing
verdure.
Long wavering in his choice between the lawyer's
daughter and the gentle Effie, it was only by views
of a mercenary character that he was at length
brought to a decision, and foregoing his frequent
visits
to the former, he seemed to prosecute with
earnestness
his claims upon his affianced bride. Now
Effie had a heart full of all pure and noble emotions,
and in her utter loneliness would doubtless easily
have been won by a generous and worthy wooer.
But she had been offended by Egbert's seeming
indifference
,
and resolved, with true feminine spirit, to
punish him, if only with temporary resentment.
Well would it have been for the tardy lover if the
gentle vengeance of Effie had been all that he had to
dread. Well, if there had not been one, whose cool
observant eye was upon him, whose toils were all
around him, and who, although apparently inactive,
was ever watchingwatchingwatching.
CHAPTER III.
Well
might the venerable Evert look regretfully
back upon departed days of Dutch dominion in the
province of the New Netherlands. So many were
the invidious distinctions made between the Dutch
and English residents, by the new authorities, and so
needless the vexation and disquiet inflicted upon the
former, that some began to take alarm, lest even the
titles to real estate which had been acquired under
the old dynasty, should be set aside. The power
bestowed by the Duke of York upon Governors
Nichols and Lovelace, was of a plenary nature, and
was executed much in accordance with the despotic
spirit which, at that period, marked the British rule.
That most of the oppression of these officers was the
result rather of a system for which they were not
accountable, than of any unusual personal depravity,
may probably be true: yet the man who could utter
the sentiment that severity was the best cure for
discontent
,
and that taxes should be made so heavy, that
the necessity of discharging them should leave the
people no time to grumble, certainly possessed some
of the essential elements of tyranny. How long he
could have withstood the spirit of the present age,
outside of the Celestial Empire, might be a very pretty
problem, and well worth the solving. If, however,
Governor Lovelace looked with an evil eye upon
some of the more wealthy Hollanders, he did not
attempt to dispossess them of their lands, but
following
the example of Sir Richard Nichols, he reaped a
rich harvest of fees, by requiring a renewal of all
patents which had been granted by the former
government
.
The brief administration of his predecessor
had left this labor unaccomplished, and even
Lovelace
probably consulted the exigencies of his private
exchequer, in the time and manner of enforcing the
requirement. But early in the autumn of the year 1672,
the few who had neglected previous admonitions on
this point, were warned, by a governmental edict, of the
necessity of compliance within a prescribed period.
Among those by whom this mandate had hitherto
been unheeded, and who now prepared to give it a
grumbling acquiescence, was Mr. Knickerbocker; but
what was his consternation on being unable, after the
most diligent search, to find any trace of a patent for
his own extensive domains. In vain was the
depository
of family writings ransacked, and countless old
papers, musty and mildewed, brought to light.
Bending
over chests, rummaging through drawers,
reaching
to topmost shelves, and peering into dark corners,
the alarmed old man passed a whole day, without
success. Tired with his labor, he sat down to reflect,
and, although he distinctly remembered that his
manor rights had been settled in council, fifteen years
before, and that he was then fully entitled to his
patent, he could not recall to mind the existence of
any such instrument. He did not remember ever to
have seen it, and the fearful truth gradually forced
itself upon his mind, that by some strange oversight,
it never had been executed. A blind confidence in
the stability of the then existing government was
doubtless, in some degree, the cause of this culpable
negligence. But how dreadful was his dilemma!
Watchful enemies on every side, and so strong a
pretext
for wresting his estate from his hands. He knew
full well that if he had no deed, his lands would be
regarded as having belonged to the Dutch government
at the time of the conquest, and as having passed, by
that event, to the new sovereignty. Desperate with
fear, he resumed his laborious search, and quitted it
only when exhausted both in body and mind. On
the next day he gained access to the public office
where the object of his search, if in existence, should
have been recorded, and without disclosing his object
to any, made a diligent examination, which proved
equally fruitless. It is needless to say that he
returned
to his home, a sad and dispirited man. All his
vast possessions seemed slipping from his grasp, as it
were by some necromantic wile. It was a consolation
however to reflect that as yet he was the sole possessor
of this important secret; and earnestly hoping that
what had so long remained undiscovered, might
continue
to be concealed, he resolved to maintain a
perfect
silence upon the subject. Doubtless, he thought,
the new instrument could be constructed without any
reference to the old, for the tract to be embraced in it
was known as certain distinct townships, and required
no definite description. Such was the judicious
reasoning
of Evert, but reason and resolution did not
allay his alarm. With the mania of a mind filled with
a single idea, he was haunted day and night by the
dreadful fear that some accident would betray the
momentous truth. He looked suspiciously at his
tenants
,
as they thronged on quarter-day at his door, and
wondered that they did not question his rights.
Quietude
became a stranger to his breast, and sleep
forsook
his pillow; or else even in dreams his grief
returned. Visionary sheriffs surrounded his bed,
serving countless writs of ejectment: long
parchment
processes, the very caligraphy of which was
fierce and threatening, unrolled themselves before
his eyes: little mocking demons perched upon his
bed-posts, and, grinning widely, whispered to each
other,
He hasn't any title!
and one, bending even
over his pillow, with cheeks distended like a trumpeter's,
shouted into his ears,
Where's your patent? where's
your patent?
Morning came, and he walked about his grounds for
relief; but fear and suspicion were his companions.
The very fowls seemed to be cackling forth his secret.
Chanticleer jumped upon the fence, and crowed it to
the winds; the ducks were babbling about it in the
pond; the geese, with long necks outstretched, hissed
it in his ears; and a fierce old gobbler, his gills red with
wrath, eyed him askance, as he sputtered forth his
views on the subject, with wonderful volubility, though
fortunately in an unknown tongue.
He strolled into the city, and sought diversion of mind.
His walk led him directly past the store of the attorney,
whose meddling propensities he was well acquainted
with, and whom, of all men, he dreaded most to
encounter
.
He was just congratulating himself on getting past
unaccosted, when the sharp visage and sharper voice
of the lawyer made him cognizant of his approach.
Evert prepared to give him a civil good day, and
glide quietly by, but the other evidently contemplated
some further salutation. He had a pencil in one
hand, and in the other a little scrap of paper, scrawled
all over with figures and diagrams, and there was an
ominous pen behind his ear; altogether, never had
the lawyer looked so formidable. He came up close
to Evert, and poked his sharp nose almost into the
old man's face, as, with an awfully distinct articulation
upon each word, he said,
Mr. Knickerbocker,
where'syourpatent?
Poor Evert's heart stood still; the blood forsook
his face, and the showering ashes fell, flake-like, from
his trembling pipe. Several seconds elapsed before
he could reply, and the lawyer, who in reality
designed
nothing more than to elucidate some trifling
boundary
question, stood wondering at his emotion. Now,
great as was Evert's alarm, he would not, in the
singleness
of his heart, have uttered a wilful falsehood for
his whole estate, and he replied, stammeringly, that he
did not think he could lay his hand upon it at that
moment.
Oh, of course not, said Hiram. I did not
suppose
you carried it about with you, but I wanted to
know how far north your ridge farm extends, as I
have a tract of land adjoining; and the lawyer went
on, chattering about links, and chains, and blazed trees,
and stakes, and stones, and surveyors, until all these
ideas were floating in a complete whirl through the
brain of his bewildered auditor. Evert inquired what
boundary Mr. Sharp claimed upon the south, and,
upon the latter designating one which clearly
embraced
a few acres of his own land, he replied,
Very well, Mr. Sharp, I'll not dispute it with you;
3
put your fence where
you
think the line is, and it shall
be all right.
The lawyer, gratified and astonished, bowed in
reply; but, as Evert was walking off, he gave him
the gratifying assurance that he would walk over to
his house, nevertheless, on some fine day, and
look
at the patent
as he wanted to see about the Whiston
and Pebble Bay tracts, and about the Coveand
about
Yesyesyes, said the old man, tearing
himself
away, with sad forebodings, any timeany
time. You'll come soon enough, he muttered to
himselfit's all gone: I see it clearly now, it's all
goneah! my poor, poor Effie.
Evert went home utterly appalled. Ruin was
staring him in the face, pulling him by the sleeve,
pushing him from behind, surrounding him on every
side. Sharp would certainly come. Nothing in the
world could stop him. An avalanche would not have
been a feather in his pathan earthquake might have
shaken
him
, but not his purpose. He could not fail
to discover the whole secret, for the absence of the
patent would arouse all his suspicions, and set his
infernal
wits at work. Thus thought the ex-councillor,
and not without reason. From the moment when he
parted with the wily lawyer, the latter had not ceased
to wonder at his singular emotion. Malice sharpened
his wits, and his suspicions soon taking the right
direction
,
he flew to the colonial record office, and to
his unspeakable delight, found that it contained no
trace of Evert's title. His doubts now became
certainty
the
agitation of the old man was all accounted
for, and Hiram rubbed his hands, and grinned
gleefully
,
as he thought how many desirable objects the
discovery of this momentous secret would enable him
to accomplish. It was true, the recording of the
patent
was not essential to its validity, and if Evert
could produce it, his rights could not be questioned;
but that he could not do so seemed nearly certain.
Why else should it remain absent from the public
books, and why such unnecessary alarm? The
patent
was either lost, or had never been executed, and
in either case, Hiram foresaw the downfall of his rival, a
bountiful slice of his manor in his own hands, as a
reward
for his fidelity to the state, and above all, a
probable recovery of the mercenary Groesbeck and
his extensive estates. With such inducements for
effort
,
he resolved to leave nothing undone; and,
suspending
all other labors, he gave his mind solely to this
magnanimous enterprise. His first step was to call
upon Governor Lovelace, with whom he had long
been on confidential terms, and whose favor and
powerful
patronage rendered him additionally formidable.
He did not, however, fully disclose his errand to that
functionary at first, but only hinted in general terms
at his important secret, seeking to elicit the views and
feelings of his companion. Lovelace, however, was
not a man to be trifled with, and perceiving, more by
the lawyer's countenance and manner, than by his
words, that his mind was teeming with some
important
matter, he hastily replied:
Speak out, Mr. Sharp, speak outyou talk of
escheats, and forfeitures, and rewards, quite too
blindly. Tell your whole story, sir; it is no small
game that you have treed, I'll be sworn, and if it is
any of these smoke-dried, disloyal, old curmudgeons
who go about with their gold-headed canes, prating
of their High Mightinesses, the States General, you
may name your own price, sir, your own price,
within
the bounds of reason.
Would a fifth be too much? suggested Sharp,
nervously.
A fifth, Hiram? why, you grow modest, manyou
do indeedyou shall have a
third
, sir, a
third
,
returned
Lovelace, who had, in reality, but little idea
of the magnitude of the lawyer's game. Sharp
now eagerly disclosed his whole story, to the great
surprise of his companion, and the conference that
followed was long and confidential. Let it suffice,
that when Hiram went home, he was in a flush of
excitement and joy, and he resolved to call on Mr.
Knickerbocker the very next day, and request a view
of the patent.
CHAPTER IV.
Overwhelmed
with the fear of his impending
calamity, Evert in the meantime resolved to apply
to his old friend, Governor Stuyvesant, for advice.
The thought relieved him, and he flew to put it into
execution. The ex-governor, who had retired from
the city at the time of the conquest by the English,
resided about two miles north of the wall, on his farm
or
Bowerie
, a locality as far within the bounds of the
modern town, as it was beyond the precincts of the
old. He received Evert's intelligence in silence, and
listened to the thrice-repeated story of the garrulous
old man without reply. His countenance gave no
indication of his thoughts, but his friend could read
his changing emotions with sufficient accuracy, in the
varying puffs that escaped from his pipe. The dense,
dark cloud which burst forth at first, the little angry
puffs that succeeded, and the light, easy, graceful
wreaths that next ensued, were all intelligible.
There was surprise and alarm at the danger
contemptuous
indignation at the lawyerand, finally,
distinct and certain relief. Poor Evert's eye
brightened
as he beheld these harbingers of hope floating
gracefully over his companion's head. He seized the
hand of his friend, and, with watery eyes, looked the
gratitude of his heart. Stuyvesant smiled in reply,
and lowering his pipe for the first time, he said:
Go home, Mr. Knickerbocker, and be quiet;
I
think I know where your patent is
. Hans shall bring
it to you. Go home, and go to bed, for you look like
a
spook
, Mr. Knickerbockergo home, go home, he
continued, shaking the old man's hand, and holding
him fast the meanwhile; and then, his whole face
changing to a thundercloud, he sputtered forth a
string of Dutch anathemas at the meddling lawyer,
as he turned hastily away, and left Evert quietly to
pursue his homeward path.
Hans, a tub-like lad of eighteen, was called and
despatched at once to summon to the governor's
presence, Mynheer Teunis Vanderbilt, an old, spare,
spindle-shanked, shadowy man, scarcely larger than
the smallest of his own money-bags, who had at one
time been chief officer of state under the valiant
Stuyvesant. He had been a sort of prime minister,
chief councillor, civic and military secretary, and
aid-de-camp
,
acting also occasionally as envoy
extraordinary
to Yankeedom and New Sweden. In these
capacities and others, he had not only contrived to
feather his own nest pretty effectually, but had
treasured
up a wholesome degree of wrath against the
Yankees, and, like Stuyvesant, he now watched with
jealous eyes, all encroachments upon the privileges of
his order, the old aristocracy of the land.
When Mr. Vanderbilt arrived at the house of his
friend, he found the latter sitting beside a table, on
which were writing materials, and a large blank
sheet of parchment. There was a vacant chair at
the board, of which Teunis took possession, and
lighting
his pipe, a silent fumigation ensued for about half
an hour, the secretary's eye falling occasionally with
an inquiring glance upon the parchment.
Hef you forgotten how to write, Teunis? at
length inquired the governor, between puffs.
Nainnain, Mynheer, replied the secretary,
laughing. Ich can write
my name
.
I don't believe it, returned Stuyvesant quietly.
Teunis gravely repeated his assertion. It was
indeed a lesson that he had taken too much pains to
learn, to allow of his easily forgetting it, for the sum
total of his chirographical education had been
devoted
to the acquirement of that one accomplishment,
the art of writing
his name
. The force of learning
could no further go.
Stuyvesant pushed the parchment toward his
amazed companion, and putting a pen into his hand,
pointed to the lower left-hand corner of the sheet.
Amazement seized upon poor Teunis, who stared first
at the parchment, and then at the governor, but the
latter, with his eyes fixed upon the ceiling, sat puffing
a regular ha! ha! and seemed utterly unconscious of
his presence. The secretary seized the pen, and after
some ineffectual attempts to mend it with his tobacco
knife, set himself about his task. It was a tedious
job, and the little man paused after accomplishing
the first half, and smoked three pipes before resuming
his labors, eyeing meanwhile, with much
complacency
,
the scrawl before him, which might easily
have been mistaken for the portrait of a many-legged
spider. In less than an hour, however, the feat was
satisfactorily performed, and Stuyvesant owned
himself
mistaken. Mynheer Vanderbilt, however, was
an astute man, and after much silent cogitation, he
began to wonder what was in the wind; but his old
habits of deference to his superior, prevented him
from encroaching upon his confidence by inquiring
into anything which the other seemed desirous to
conceal. He, therefore, rose to depart, and was
arrested for a moment in the doorway by the voice of
his friend.
Teunis! said the governor, gruffly.
The secretary turned, and looked back.
Teunis! repeated Stuyvesant, more emphatically.
Wal, Mynheer! was the response.
The governor laid down his pipe, and pressed his
forefinger upon his closed lips, until the displaced
blood left them as colorless as the wall. Vanderbilt
replied to this pantomime by a similar gesture, and
departed.
No sooner was Stuyvesant left alone, than he
seemed desirous of ascertaining whether he also
retained
the art of writing, and taking the pen which
lay beside him, he affixed his own name to the lower
part of the parchment, opposite that of the secretary.
This being done, the services of Hans were once
more in requisition. Again he went into the city,
and returned this time accompanied by another
elderly man, whose sagacious look, and quick rolling
eye, gave token of a different order of intellect. He
was, in fact, an ancient Dutch lawyer, who stood high
in the confidence of the governor, and whose little
crotchety handwriting was to be seen on all the public
documents of the late administration. But like many
other sagacious men, Mynheer Myndert Ten Eyck
had contrived to overlook the main chance, and had
found himself, in the downhill of life, almost a
pensioner
upon the bounty of his ancient comrades. He
had no reason, however, to complain of stinted
generosity
on the part of the ex-governor, and it was
owing perhaps partly to this circumstance that he had
responded with such alacrity to the summons of the
3*
latter. Stuyvesant had arranged a chair for him at
the table in such a manner that he could scarcely fail
to observe the mysterious parchment, with its
signatures
in blank; but this precaution was quite
unnecessary
,
for Mynheer Ten Eyck would have
discovered it, had it lain in the darkest corner of the
room. The governor proceeded at once to business,
by informing his visitor of Mr. Knickerbocker's loss,
and of the immense importance of finding the
document
without delay.
I have reason to think, he said, that it is in your
possession, Mr. Ten Eyck, inasmuch as you wrote all
the old patents, and I want you
to look for it
, and
to
look very sharp
,and again his merry pipe sent forth
a succession of little laughing puffs, while the gravity
of his countenance remained undisturbed.
The lawyer comprehended the whole subject; that
he did so was sufficiently evident from the fact, that
while his companion was looking another way, he
had already slipped the parchment slyly into his
pocket. I think I can find Mr. Knickerbocker's
patent, he replied; but a cloud of doubt rested on
his face, as he slowly continued, but I hope you
have considered
Everything, retorted the governor, angrily. I
have considered everything, Mr. Ten Eyck, and it
must be
found
. I will be responsible
I, sir
Peter
Stuyvesant, with my manors and estates. Do you
understand
me
now?
The lawyer bowed.
Donner and blitzen! exclaimed the old man,
striding up and down the room till the house echoed
with the strokes of his wooden leg upon the oaken
floorDonner and blitzen! he said, scowling at the
frightened attorney, would you sit still and see the
finest estate in the province confiscated, and the
gray-haired
Evert in the poor-house, while a parcel of idle
Yankees were rioting on his lands? Would you
How far the venerable Peter's oration would have
extended is uncertain, but on the breaking away of a
thick cloud which had hung stationary for some time,
midway to the ceiling, he discovered that his auditor
was missing.
Scarce two hours had elapsed, however, before a
messenger from the attorney arrived, who delivered
a sealed package into the hands of Mr. Stuyvesant,
and disappeared. The latter eagerly tore off the
envelope
,
and, to his great amazement, beheld an old,
worn, smoke-dried, mouse-nibbled sheet of
parchment
,
containing letters patent to Evert
Knickerbocker
for all his manor lands. It was dated in 1657
bore the signatures of Peter Stuyvesant as
governor
,
and Teunis Vanderbilt as secretary, and had
an old dirty seal of white was appended to it with a
faded blue ribbon. Again and again did the governor
examine and scrutinize it with the most
overwhelming
astonishment.
The tuyfel is in the lawyer, he exclaimed at
length, after turning it over for the fiftieth time; and
had it not been for an extra cross which he had
accidentally
bestowed upon the final letter of his name,
he would have sworn that the document before him
was in every respect genuine. As it was, his delight
knew no bounds. Calling upon Hans once more, he
despatched him with the precious document, carefully
enveloped, to Mr. Knickerbocker, whose amazement
and joy had well nigh overturned his reason; for no
faintest gleam of suspicion did he entertain as to the
authenticity of the deed. Soft was his pillow on that
happy night; no spectral sheriffs were about it; the
demons were all gone; and the long,
spectacle-stridden
nose and rat-gray eyes of Hiram Sharp did not
peer from behind the bed-post once during the
livelong
night.
CHAPTER V.
The
gray twilight of the ensuing morning saw the
vigilant lawyer on his feet. Far different had been
his repose from that of the venerable Evert, for all
night long the clink of the surveyor's chain had
been sounding in his ears, and little dancing figures,
indicative of interminable distances, had floated before
his eyes. Longitudinally, transversely, and
diagonally
,
had he divided the Knickerbocker manor, and
at every trial his own third part had proved, by some
strange hocus pocus, larger than all the remainder.
He laughed at the remembrance of his dreams, but he
looked on them as a good omen, and bestirred himself
diligently at his labors. It was nearly mid-day,
however
,
when he started on his important errand, for he
was certain of then finding Evert at home, smoking
his after-dinner pipe, in one corner of his long Dutch
stoop. Despite his bountiful supply of brass, he was
a little embarrassed at first, as he approached his
supposed
victim, and he attempted to hide his confusion
by rapid talking.
Good marnin', Mr. Knickerbocker, heow do you
dewI've called over about that air patent of yourn
jest want to look at it a minutefine marnin'. You've
been to dinner a'ready, hay? You Dutch people have
dinner dreadful arly.
He had rattled on thus far, closely watching,
meanwhile
,
the countenance of Evert, and he stopped now
in surprise at the perfect equanimity of the latter,
who, handing a seat to his visitor, called to Effie to
bring the desired document. Puzzled beyond
expression
at these appearances, and not a little alarmed,
Sharp was arguing to himself the impossibility of its
being produced, when Effie came dancing out, and
placed the sallow old parchment in his hands.
Opening
it, with an eager and wolf-like gaze, his eye ran
rapidly across the sheet, and a feeling of utter
discomfiture
came over him. If it had been his own
death-warrant he could scarcely have viewed it
with more surprise and grief. Again and again did
he scan it, but, forced at length to admit to
himself
that there was no flaw in the instrument, he
slowly folded it up, and was about returning it to
Evert, when a sudden thought seemed to occur to him,
and he drew back his hand. The remembrance of
his recent conviction that the patent was not in
existence
,
and the evidence which had sustained his
belief, came back to his mind with such
overwhelming
force, that he resolved to make still another
examination. For ten long minutes did he slowly
inspect the paper, until every fold and stain and
mark had been perused and re-perused, without
success
.
Suddenly raising it, however, to the light, and
looking through it, a glare of fiendish exultation shot
across his features; for the faintly stamped mark of
the manufacturers had caught his eye, revealing the
dreadful figures 1671!
It is a forgery, he shouted; a forgery!
holding
it up before Evert, and pointing to the fearful
proof, while the parchment shook and rattled in his
unsteady hand, like an aspen in the breeze. A deathly
pallor overspread the face of the old man: he rose
tottering to his feet, gazed for a moment at the fatal
figures, and then sank exhausted to his chair, with a
despairing conviction that all was lost. A moment's
reflection convinced the wily lawyer of the true state
of things. He knew that the signatures were both
genuine, and he was equally well acquainted with the
writing of Ten Eyck. That these three old cronies
of Evert should have thus combined to help him out
of a scrape, was the most natural thing in the world.
But he knew also that Stuyvesant was at the bottom
of the whole intrigue, and he would as willingly have
encountered the arch-fiend as have got into a broil with
the irate old governor. His policy, therefore, was to
profess to believe poor Ten Eyck the sole artificer of
the patent, and that the names of Stuyvesant and
Vanderbilt were counterfeited. He hastened, too, to
bring about an
expos
of the affair, lest the
ex-governor
might in some way outwit him after all.
Taking
advantage therefore of Evert's emotion, he
slipped the patent into his pocket and departed. He
bent his steps directly to the residence of Governor
Lovelace, and after a short interview with that
officer
,
hastened to the house of Ten Eyck. The sight
of Sharp with the open patent in his hand, a sudden
accusation, and an appeal to the mischievous figures,
overwhelmed the old man, and he could not reply.
Hiram laid the parchment on the table, and paced the
room as he conversed. There was a fire on the
hearth, and his alarmed companion, taking advantage
of a moment when the back of his accuser was turned
to him, seized the evidence of his supposed crime and
cast it into the flames. It was what Sharp had
expected
and desired. The fatal mischief was
accomplished
,
and Evert Knickerbocker was a paper.
Not in the literal sense of the word, yet reduced to
the slender competence which the possession of a
small homestead, and a few hundred pounds beside,
might afford. In vain was every effort made to stay
the operation of the dreadful machinery of the law;
for Evert's rights were not surrendered without a
vigorous effort for their retention. An appeal to the
Duke of York was made through eminent counsel in
England, but was soon abandoned as utterly futile.
The Knickerbocker manor, so said the brief
official
endorsement on the returned memorial, having
been ungranted at the time of the conquest, passed to
the British Crown. If Mr. Knickerbocker has any
claim for redress, it is evidently upon the States
General
of the Netherlands.
To the States General he applied with about equal
success, excepting that from this source he had the
satisfaction of being informed that his loss was clearly
the result of his own remissness. It was a matter of
deep regret, and it was to be hoped that the Duke of
York might see the justice of relinquishing his title.
The Council of State could not recognize his claim,
but voted him a thousand rix-dollars in token of their
sympathy.
A thousand rix-devils! exclaimed old Governor
Stuyvesant, in a boiling rage, when he heard of this
result. Why, it won't pay Poffenburgh's expenses;'
for Mynheer Yawpy Poffenburgh, a shrewd old
burgher, who was supposed to have some influential
friends in power at the Hague, had been despatched
on this fruitless embassy. His friends, it seemed, had
just influence enough to get his expenses paid, and as
to the rest, why, it was to be regretted, of course'
said Yawpy, and there the matter ended.
Months elapsed, of course, before these distant
negotiations were completed, but so slight had been
Evert's hope of their success, that the failure caused
him but little additional disappointment. While they
were pending, Governor Lovelace declined issuing a
patent to Sharp for his third, and even after they were
concluded, although the lawyer was allowed to take
possession of his estate, he was still compelled to wait
for his deed until further instructions from England
were received. The remaining part of the manor,
Lovelace himself took charge of, in behalf of the Duke,
and often, as he rode with Sharp about the extensive
domains, he calculated the probabilities of obtaining
it in lieu of his half pay, upon retiring from office.
Although Ten Eyck proved too faithful to his
patron
to disclose the secret of the false patent, no real
odium attached to his own reputation. Mr.
Knickerbocker's
rights were so apparent, and the injustice of
depriving him of them by a mere technicality, so
evident, that none could fail to sympathize both with
him and his discomfited friend. As to Sharp, the
informer, enriched by his own infamy, his name would
doubtless have become a reproach, had he not
immediately
set up a carriage, doubled his subscription to
the minister, and talked largely about reforms, and all
maginable kinds of charities.
But the proper course of this narrative now carries
us back to a time cotemporary with its opening
scenes, and to the contemplation of other characters
and different events.
CHAPTER VI.
The
surprise and indignation of Rudolph Groesbeck
at finding himself so strangely divested of his expected
patrimony, were not slight, and for a while he had
entertained the illusive hope that his brother would
rectify so apparent an injustice. But it soon became
evident that Egbert contemplated no such unnecessary
generosity. With the vanity of a little mind, he
exulted
over a brother whose superiority he had ever
been compelled secretly to acknowledge; though it
was rather Rudolph's elegance of person, and a
certain
intuitive grace of manner, which awakened his
envy, than the advantages, less appreciable to him, of
an enlarged mind, and a good education. Rudolph
was tall and well formed, and his face, radiant with
intellectual light, possessed beauty of a higher order
than any which mere symmetry of features can impart.
Possessed of a scanty income, he found himself
restricted
to a quiet and obscure life, and subject,
moreover
,
to the not infrequent taunts of Egbert, and his
roystering companions, as a tame and spiritless fellow,
destined to mope for a life-time among musty books.
And such, at times, he fancied himself to be, secluded,
owl-like, from the world, shutting his eyes to the
daylight of the Present, and groping in the dim night
of the Past. His owlship, however, was destined to
be disturbed by the flittings of a butterfly. He met
the beautiful Effieeach unknown to the other
rendered her some trifling courtesy, and returned to
his books to find her sunny features upon every page,
and to hear the melody of that one remembered tone
outsounding all the grave voices of Antiquity. The
transforming power of Love has been the theme of
all ages; and that it wrought its usual marvels upon
Rudolph need not be doubted. His well-thumbed
books were allowed a long respite upon their shelves,
and he sought in frequent walks to encounter once
more his unknown charmer. His poetic fancy had
invested the very spot in which they had met, with
unwonted beauty, and its echoes seemed still vocal
with the harmonies of her voice. He forgot his own
poverty; he forgot, indeed, that there were such
things as Wealth and Want. A rich and exhaustless
mine of bliss seemed opened in his heart, which would
prove triumphant over the ills of life, and independent
of the vicissitudes of Time.
That Rudolph did not recognize the daughter of his
father's chosen friend, whom as a child he had
intimately
known, is seemingly a matter of surprise. But
Time, good old fellow, to give him his due, is not
perpetually
wielding his scythe to depopulate nations,
or stooping with hammer and chisel at the base of
mighty edifices, or changing the channels of rivers,
or upbuilding islands in mid-ocean. For he had
found leisure, during Rudolph's retirement, to develope
so many beauties and graces in the gentle Effie, as to
bury beneath their profusion her former self. So
sinks the vase from view, concealed by bending
flowers
.
But it was no pleasure to the student to learn
that his fair unknown was the daughter of the wealthy
Evert. For a while, indeed, he wilfully closed his eyes
to the disparity of fortune between them, and meeting
her again and again, by a design which seemed like
accident, he contrived to fasten more firmly the rosy
fetters which enthralled him. Innocent of every art,
and utterly unconscious of Rudolph's sentiments, Effie's
genuine good nature and childish hilarity of spirits
were unchecked in his presence by the reserve which
might otherwise have detracted from her charms; and
the lover soon found himself in the plight of the
dazzled
insect, which, unwarned by the singeing of its
wings, continues to tempt Fate, until it rushes bodily
into the flame. But the reflection which is not allowed
to precede, is sure to follow our imprudent acts.
Rudolph's
dream of bliss was as brief as it was bright;
for dismay seized upon his heart as he at length began
to contemplate the gulf that intervened between
himself
and Effie.
The cold stage of his disease set in, and he flew to
his books for relief. Homer paraded his Helens and
Penelopes before him, and hinted at all the ruin they
had wrought; Virgil dwelt complacently upon the
charms of the magnificent Dido; Horace cracked a
few unfeeling jokes on the subject of Love in general;
Ovid offered to instruct him in the art; and Seneca,
the grave old wag, buried to his chin in gold,
descanted
sagely upon the blessings of Poverty.
Miserable
comforters are ye all, thought the hapless
Rudolph
,
as turning his back upon his study, he strolled
into the fields. His sudden despair however had not
been caused, or scarcely enhanced, by the existing
engagement
between Egbert and Effie, for to that event,
while it remained unratified by any personal contract,
he attached no manner of importance. It was the grim
spectre of Poverty, more formidable than the fabled
genii of the East, which stood scowling between him
and the bright Paradise of his hopes. Musing
painfully
upon his adverse fortunes, he sauntered to the
river, and arranging the sails of a small boat which
he kept for pleasure excursions, embarked upon the
glassy tide. It was a warm autumnal day, and the
whole face of Nature was wrapt in smiles. The
sky was bright and blue above him, and its image
bright and blue below, and his white-winged bark
seemed suspended in mid-ether, floating cloud-like and
buoyantly along. The sportive sea-gulls were flitting
around him, now darting into the stream, and now
flashing the sunlight from their dripping wings, as they
wheeled rapidly away. The trill of many birds came
faintly from the shore; the distant lowing of cattle
was heard, and the far-off voice of Chanticleer, the
challenge and reply, at once disturbed and illustrated
the silence of the scene. Rudolph's boat seemed
instinctively
to shape its course in the direction of the
Knickerbocker homestead, which stood on a slight
eminence, that sloped by a gentle declivity to the river.
At the bottom of the garden, and on the very margin
of the stream, was a latticed summer-house, clothed
with flowering vines, in which he loved to fancy the
beautiful Effie, lulled to repose by the silvery voice of
the tiny billows at her feet. Loosening his snowy
sails opposite this sacred retreat, he loitered midway
of the stream, forgetting for a while his grief, and
wrapt in those bright dreams of the imagination,
whose prismatic hues so often lend their radiance to
the young and ingenuous mind. The heavily laden
sloop, sunk to her gunwale in the flood, passed him
unheeded, and the helmsman's merry troll, and the
jarring voices of the crew, scarce sounded in his ears.
Unheard was the shout of triumph which came ever
and anon from the fisherman's shallop, anchored in
the distance, and the louder detonation of the
sportsman's
gun, echoing among the adjacent forests,
disturbed
not his reverie. His mind was revelling in Elysian
fields, for Hope, like the coral architect of the sea,
was rearing her gorgeous structures beneath the very
billows of Despair. Thus feeding the fire that
consumed
him, the hapless Rudolph gave way to the impulses
of a generous and guileless heart. The day waned,
and he retired to his lonely home, depressed by the
re-action of his thoughts, his devotion and his vigils
unrewarded, even so much as by the fluttering of a
scarf in the breeze. The time now spoken of was
just that period when Egbert, after a succession of
heavy losses at the gaming table, began to grow
certain
of his own affection for the beautiful heiress.
His marked addresses to Effie soon became generally
known, and Rudolph, smitten to the heart with his
own adverse fate, resolved to abandon a home
darkened
by so many griefs. In the settlement about Fort
Orange, or as it was called by the English, Fort
Albany
,
resided a brother of the deceased Wilhelmus,
whose often urged entreaties for a visit from Rudolph,
the latter now resolved to accept. The bustle of
preparation
for so extended a journey was at once a
relief
to his mind, and the many sage admonitions
4
which he received as to the dangers of the
undertaking
convinced him that he was not in reality as
friendless
as he had supposed. A sloop was preparing to
sail for the fort, for the transmission of some
munitions
of war, and other government stores, to the
garrisons
at that settlement and at Schenectady. Its
departure was indeed already publicly announced by
the city post; not the Evening or Morning Post,
gentle
reader, but a day and night post, which stood
patiently
in front of the government house, plastered all
over with public notices, in all imaginable varieties of
writing. On board this vessel Rudolph embarked.
The voyage was unusually long. There were head
winds, and side winds, and no winds, to baffle the wary
skipper, and there were stoppings at night, and safe
anchorings to be found, and watchings for the day.
Formal soundings too were to be made, even where
the bottom was visible through the shallow and
pellucid
wave; and the coast was to be examined for
future conquest; and the charcoal chart of Captain
Van Dam was to be corrected by striking out three
cannibal islands erroneously set down on a former
voyage, and by inserting a volcanic mountain among
the Highlands, which, like the pipe of its sage
discoverer
,
is supposed to have long since burnt out. A
week indeed elapsed before they had doubled St.
Anthony's
Nose, and another ere the six frowning guns of
Fort Albany were visible. It mattered little, however,
to Rudolph. He had his books and his
meerschaum
,
and in the black-letter page of the one, and from the
fragrant wreaths of the other, gleamed the radiant
features which were at once the cause and the solace
of his grief.
It was during his sojourn in these hyperborean
regions that the important events recorded in the
preceding chapters had occurred, of which no
intelligence
had yet crossed that mighty interval which
stretched between the city of New York and the far
northern outpost of Albany.
Egbert's wooing, meanwhile, had for a time given
token of success, for Effie had unfortunately been
accustomed to regard the alliance as a matter of
duty. Her heart indeed was unwon, but then she
knew nothing of the wealth of affection which lay
dormant within it.
But the sudden calamity which had overwhelmed
the house of the Knickerbockers, singularly enough,
put a new aspect upon the suitor's zeal. The
culminating
point of his love seemed suddenly to be
past, for the silvery voice of Effie, and her golden
locks, like the bills of a broken bank, no longer
represented
the chink of the genuine coin. He had
manifested
much alarm at the first intimation of Mr.
Knickerbocker's troubles, and for a while took an
active part in attempting to defeat the machinations
of Sharp. He esteemed himself, however, most
fortunate
in not having yet passed the Rubicon of
proposal
and acceptance, and resolved, while the peril
impended, to maintain a middle ground between
courtship and estrangement, from which it would be
equally easy to advance or retreat; thus imitating
the tactics of some renowned generals, whose
panegyrists
have loudly lauded their discretion for want
of something else to laud. Miss Sharp, in the
meantime
,
did not cease to ply her artillery with great
effect, whenever the enemy came within the range of
her charms. She affected much commiseration for
the Knickerbockers, and regretted that the
government
should have employed her father in so
unpleasant
a duty as that of prosecuting its claims against
him. She herself could bear witness to the sleepless
nights which it had occasioned poor papa, and then
her own feelings, to say nothing of Benhadad's, had
been lacerated to an extent that it was really quite
painful to mention. Such was the substance of Miss
Euphemia's sentiments as detailed to Egbert, with as
much of a languishing air as a pair of small, black,
snaky eyes, and a mouth with a decidedly
snap-dragonish
expression, would admit of. But her fears and
suspense were not of very long continuance, for the
news from abroad of the ultimate rejection of Evert's
claims, was speedily followed by another marked
change in the deportment of Egbert. His attentions
to Effie grew small by degrees and beautifully
less, and within a few weeks were altogether
discontinued
.
Poor old Evert, in all his troubles, had thought less
of himself than of his children, and he consoled
himself
often by reflecting how well his darling Effie was
provided for, and by hoping that Egbert, in the
plenitude
of his wealth and kindness, might possibly lend
a helping hand also to his heedless son. It was with
bitter grief and indignation, therefore, that he had
discovered
the perfidy of the heartless youth, nor would
he indeed give any credence to the signs of his
desertion
until compelled so to do. Far different, however,
were Effie's feelings. A sense of relief, and of
freedom
from some hidden danger, gave new bloom to
her face and fresh buoyancy to her steps. She
grieved indeed for her father's sorrow, and sought
ever to console him by the assurance that they would
still do well enough.
Remember, she would say, as she brushed the
thin locks from his templesRemember, papa, what
Dominie Vischer told us on Sunday, about blessings
in disguise.
The image of the Dominie's reverend head, just
visible above the huge high pulpit, and threatened
with momentary demolition by the massive cone,
which, like the sword of Damocles, hung perpetually
above it, rose for a moment in Evert's mind.
Yesyes, my child, I remember it well, he
replied
.
Heaven knows I thought of thee, when he
spoke of the wind being tempered to the shorn lamb
for thou art a lamb, my Effie, and thy fold will soon
be broken up.
We belong to one fold and one Shepherd, papa,
said Effie, smiling cheerfully; and the old man,
imprinting
a kiss upon the cheek of his child, tottered
weeping from the room.
CHAPTER VII.
The
gallant Captain Sinclair, who bore about his
person wounds received in the famous battle of
Dunkirk
,
and who was loitering awhile in this country,
while awaiting some expected promotion on the navy
rolls of Spainthe gallant Captain Sinclair was a
little fond of play.
Not deepnot deep, indeed, he would say, as
seating himself opposite the flattered Egbert in a
small room of Mynheer Schnaffenswauzer's hotel, he
would drop his cane and gloves, and, raising his
eye-glass
,
gaze about the room with a quick, jerking
motion of his head, to make sure that they were
entirely
alone. Captain Sinclair shuffled the cards very
awkwardly. We mariners, he would say, are
more accustomed to the boarding-pike than the
card-table
,
and he quite envied his companion's more
adroit and graceful motions. He was even known,
at times, to drop a card on the floor, so very
awkward
was he, and so bungling, and at times those
perverse little pieces of pasteboard would get even
into the sleeves of the Captain's coat, a new naval
undress of Spain, large at the wrist, and open,
exceedingly
.
He played often with Groesbeck, and sometimes,
at night, in company also with a couple of young
lieutenants in the Austrian service, with whom they
had formed quite an accidental acquaintance, and the
younger of whom took a great liking to Egbert, and
was always his partner. They lost very heavily at
times, but the Austrian bore his misfortunes with a
good grace, and always paid promptly. So did
Egbert, for he would not for the world have
disgraced
so distinguished an acquaintance. Captain
Sinclair had had his doubts sometimes about the
fairness
of the younger lieutenant's play; so he told Mr.
Groesbeck, but inasmuch as he had frequently met
that young officer at the governor's table, he could
not doubt that he was a gentleman, and thought he
must be mistaken in his suspicions. But still he
cautioned
his young and inexperienced friend, if he ever
played with the Austrian alone, to keep both his eyes
open; and as this was a feat more easily performed
than keeping only one of those organs unclosed,
Egbert promised compliance. Indeed he saw no
reason why he should trouble himself much about
the lieutenant's foul play, inasmuch as the latter was
always his own partner. Let the captain look to
that, he said, and detect it for himself. Foul play,
indeed, and last night we lost five hundred pounds.
And thus the poor dupe went on, floundering in
the net that was all around him, and entangling
himself
at every throe, more and more deeply. Not that
Egbert and his companion always lost; on the
contrary
,
they won at times quite considerable sums,
which the Captain always paid down in broad
Spanish
pieces; but the preponderance of the luck was
heavily against them, and in the more private
tte-
-t
te
games with the Spaniard, Egbert was also a
heavy loser.
Sinclair consoled him, in all these reverses, with
tales of the most astounding good fortune which had
befallen people upon a sudden turn of luck after being
nearly ruined.
There was old Count Sylvio, he said; you've
heard of him, I dare say, as in a fit of absence of
mind he began to deal the cards with exceeding
rapidity and ease; old Count Sylvioa little old
fellowtall as my caneyellow as an orangerich
as Crsushe wore horn-framed spectaclesthe
Count didvery large, and looked just like an
owl
Well, what of him? said Egbert, as the other
paused, gazing intently at his hand of cards.
4*
Just like an owl, continued the Captain; for he
stooped a little, and his little short coat-skirts stuck
out like tail-feathers; and again the Spaniard stopped
to admire some fortunate combination of cards in his
hand.
Well, what of him? what happened to the
Count? asked Groesbeck, petulantly; for his ill-luck
had made him impatient.
Why, sir, said Sinclair, lowering his hand and
throwing himself back in his chair, he lost three
large estates in one night, valued at half a million
piastresin one night, sir, to Prince Pluckmski, of
Moscow, and just as he was going out of the room,
quite penniless, he met a friend, of whom he
borrowed
a doubloon just for present necessities.
Well?
Well, sir, he looked at the doubloon, and the
doubloon looked at him; that is, as he said afterwards,
it
seemed
to look at him and say, `Try me,' and so the
Count went back, and asked the Prince if he would
play for a doubloon, and the Prince consented, sir;
and the Count wonand then he won again, sirand
againand he kept on winning until he got his
estates all back, sir, and sixteen townships in Russia
besides, with three thousand serfs in their shirt-flaps,
sir!
Mr. Groesbeck did not seem much consoled by this
anecdote, for his losses continued to multiply, until
their magnitude became truly alarming: but then the
Captain was irresistibly polite and affable, and his
victim could never find any cause of quarrel or
offence
.
Nor was their intimacy by any means
confined
to the card-table, for the Spaniard would often
call with a dashing equipage purchased with his
friend's money, and invite the latter to take a drive
with him about the city, and its suburbs. They were
seen together, indeed, at all public places, and Egbert
prided himself upon the association, for the Captain
was so
distingu
. There was one place, however,
to which Sinclair would never go, however often
invited or urged, and that was the residence of Mr.
Hiram Sharp. He even seemed to avoid it in their
drives about town, much to his companion's regret,
for Egbert was not unwilling to show off his
aristocratic
looking friend to Miss Euphemia, who it need
scarcely be said was already fully reinstated in his
affections. Scarcely a month had elapsed since the
cessation of his visits to Effie, and it had been only
out of fear of public scorn that he had even thus long
refrained from appearing as the acknowledged suitor
of Miss Sharp. But such a motive was not likely
long to influence him, more especially as neither the
lawyer himself, nor his daughter, seemed to be
troubled
with any sensitiveness on that point. Sharp,
indeed, for once became indiscreetly eager in the
pursuit of his object, for the large bait, which,
shark-like
,
he had so voraciously swallowed, seemed only
to have whetted his appetite. The great Groesbeck
estate being once in his family, in addition to his own
now colossal fortune, he would be able to look down
upon Governor Stuyvesant himself; while to have
seen Egbert in the hands of the Knickerbockers,
would have left his pique against that harmless old
man far from being gratified.
It does not take long to make a bargain when both
parties think they have got the best of it, and so the
alliance was very soon agreed upon. Euphemia
indeed required but little wooing. Like Miss Polly
Dolly Adaline Amelia Agnes Low, whose affecting
history is recorded in an olden ballad, she had long
anticipated the important event, and was prepared
for it.
It was a sad thing, to be sure, she said, behind a
white handkerchief, for the nestling to forsake ts
home, and fly away to a distant p-perchfor Miss
Sharp had an idea of consistency in her metaphors
but she would try to bear it.
For my sake, suggested Egbert.
For your sake, said the nestling.
And so it was all settled, and a day was named,
and the preparations went rapidly forward, and Sharp
rode out to look at the estate and calculate its value
in the hands of a good manager.
In the meantime Egbert continued his dangerous
career; for the near approach of his wedding-day
made him more anxious than ever to replenish his
exchequer. He felt deeply the want of available
funds, for although he had raised large sums by
mortgaging
his land, they had all passed into the hands of
his adroit friend. He was resolved now to strike one
Napoleon blow for liberty, and having fully
recovered
his ground, to be more wary in future about
retaining it. Elated with this resolution, which
seemed so easy of accomplishment, he sought out
Sinclair, and in the evening, in company with that
gentleman, paid his accustomed visit to Mynheer
Schnaffenswauzer's hotel. He felt certain that he
should win on that night, and he resolved to risk
larger sums than usual in order that a short run of
luck might set him up. He had before, on several
occasions, blamed himself for the paltriness of his
ventures, for, by an unfortunate coincidence, his
winnings
had almost always occurred when there was
but little at stake.
I have no more money, he said to Sinclair,
laughing, as they again sat down at the fatal table;
old Levi does nothing but croak, and make mouths,
and twirl his long snaky fingers at me, when I apply
to him, and says he fears my estate is not worth what
he has already advanced on itthe shrivelled old
sinner. But I will put up the
acres
to-night, Captain
Sinclair, he said, speaking with desperation. You
know that they are worth thrice the amount of the
Jew's claim. What say you to the Harlem farm,
where we shot that fine buck yesterday, against a
thousand guineas?
What! play you so largely then? asked the other
with a surprised air.
The gleam of insanity was in the eye of Groesbeck,
as he replied: Ayeayeit's this light play that
ruins a man. Fortune smiles on a bold venture.
Come, sir, down with your louis d'ors; I long to hear
them chinking in my pockets.
The Spaniard's hesitation, whether real or affected,
only increased the eagerness of his companion, and
he at length complied. They played, and Egbert
lost. His eye flashed wildlyhis lips were
compressed
,
but he did not complain. Another tract and
another was proposed, and still Egbert lost, and thus
half an hour elapsed, with but little variation of
result
.
Three-fourths of Groesbeck's property was
gone, and he was about pledging the remainder, when
the Captain, alarmed lest by grasping at too much he
might lose the whole, refused to play.
The luck is clearly against you, to-night, he said;
do not tempt Fortune too far.
I am ruined already, replied Egbert, dashing his
cards to the floor; three-fourths of my estate are in
your hands; the rest will doubtless be the Jew's.
Very true; very true, said Sinclair, blandly, and
drawing on his gloves; Count Sylvio
Dn Count Sylvio! said Egbert, tearing from
his pocket a bundle of old papers, and flinging them
upon the table. There are my father's title-deeds;
have your deeds prepared, and send them to me at
once, and they shall be executed; but do me the
favor, he added, more mildly, to keep this matter
secret for one week.
Most certainly, sir, said the Captain, clutching
the papers, and feeling only half certain of his good
fortune.
One week, mindand it will not matter so very
much after all. Old
Hi
, he muttered to himself, thus
abbreviating his expected father-in-law's nameOld
Hi
is worth half a million.
And thus the gamblers parted.
CHAPTER VIII.
It
was on a calm May morning, about three days
prior to that of the contemplated nuptials, that the
virtuous Mr. Sharp was interrupted in the midst of a
harangue at his own breakfast-table, upon the
heaven-liness
of that charity which begins at home, by a
visit from a friend of old standing, who desired to see
him forthwith, alone, and on important business. Not
a little surprised was the lawyer as, followed by the
fierce-looking Captain Ripley, he led the way into a
private apartment; for that enterprising mariner had
now been in port so long that it was scarcely probable
he could have any new bargains to offer. He was
not, however, kept long in suspense. Mr. Ripley had
called in behalf of a friend who was about to leave
the country for a season, and who, having recently
become an extensive landholder in the province, was
desirous of procuring a faithful agent to take charge
of his estates.
Mr. Sharp was delighted: Mr. Sharp took off his
spectacles and said: Is it possible! yescertainly
very discreethappy to render him any service
always at the disposal of his friends, &c., &c.; and
then Mr. Sharp put his spectacles on again, and
waited meekly for further developments. They
came. Captain Ripley was a man of few words, and
the story was soon toldas soon, that is, as the
interruptions
of the awfully incensed lawyer would
permit
.
It is probably needless to say that Sinclair was
the capitalist alluded to by Ripley, who, knowing
nothing of the intended marriage between Egbert and
Miss Sharp, and presuming upon the iniquitous bond
of secrecy already existing between himself and
Hiram
,
had not hesitated to hint broadly at the means by
which his friend had acquired the Groesbeck estates.
Mr. Ripley, said Hiram, as soon as his rage had
subsided to the speaking point, your friend is a
swindler, and you are his accomplice, and the property
must be refunded to Mr. Groesbeck at once, sir, or I will
arrest you both, and for far graver crimes than this.
Sharp did not seeit would have been better for
him if he hadthe demoniac scowl and baleful glare
which passed, like a cloud and a flash, across the
sailor's face.
You talk boldly, Mr. Sharp, he said with
composure
.
I do, sir, continued the lawyer; I am a bold man;
it is my business to be so. And mind, sir, I will have
no parleying or delay in this matter; remember that
there are trees on Gibbet Island that bear such fruit
as you and your swindling companion.
You
are
a bold man, replied Ripley; muttering a
long foreign oath, which sounded like the rattling of
shot against the inside of his teeth; but what must
be, must be. I will talk with Sinclair about it, and
see what can be done.
You had betteryou had better, returned Sharp
rapidly.
I will see you
This afternoon.
I will; and the sailor departed.
Manifest was Mr. Sharp's perturbation. He
followed
his visitor to the door, and followed him with
his eyes far down the street, and waited anxiously for
his return. He had known nothing before of Sinclair's
connection with Ripley, and although he had long
looked upon the former as some worthless adventurer,
he had supposed him to be of a higher grade than
the pirate; for such, he did not seek to conceal from
his own mind, was Ralph. Before others he of course
scouted the idea of such a suspicion, for his own
business connection with the sailor and his companions
had of late been scarcely cloaked. His present
dilemma
was therefore a serious one; for even if he
had possessed sufficient evidence for the arrest of
Ralph and his friend on so grave a charge as piracy.
he would, by so doing, impugn his own moral
character
,
a fabric which stood already on too tottering a
basis to bear any very heavy concussion. He would
also put a stop to a very lucrative business, derived
not alone from the harmless little Zephyr, Captain
Ripley, of and for Lisbon, and now lying at anchor
on the opposite side of the bay, just out of reach of
the guns of the fort; but from several other similar
craft floating under the colors of Portugal and Spain,
and visiting at times the harbor of Manhattan.
Besides
all this there was, in reality, no sufficient legal
proof against either Ralph or his vessel, and he knew
very well that Lovelace would never consent to
embroil himself, uselessly, with a set of desperadoes,
who, in one way or another, would be sure to have
their revenge. He had heard, however, that outlaws
of this description were proverbially timid, beneath
all their outside swagger, and his hope lay chiefly in
the fears which he had evidently excited in Ripley's
breast. Several hours elapsed, and the day was on
the decline, when Ralph returned. A tall, stout man
he was, brown as a butternut, and sporting bushy
black whiskers and a moustache. The lawyer's mind
was wonderfully relieved on seeing him, for there
was such a good-natured, playful smile upon his face,
and his glittering teeth shone out so frankly from
between
their black borders, that he felt satisfied all was
right. They conversed awhile apart, but the store
was thronged with people, and there was so little
room for privacy, that Hiram, at the suggestion of
his visitor, took his hat, and they sauntered slowly
down the street. The Captain talked rapidly and
seemingly to the point, for his auditor was very
attentive
.
He grew eloquent, indeed, and his arms flew
about like flails, and his head went bobbing in every
direction.
My friend, Captain Sinclair, he said, is a
gentleman
of the strictest honor, I do assure you, sir; and
he charges me to say to you, that if he could only
once have dreamed of such a thingif he could just
have
dreamed
of it, sir, that your daughter was to be
married to Mr. Groesbeck, he certainly would not
would nothavehave
Fleeced him? suggested Hiram.
No, no, no! my
dear
sir, that's not the word; you
are facetious, you are, indeed, sir.
To this and a great deal more, Sharp listened
anxiously
,
expecting momentarily to hear something to
the point. They had left the main thoroughfare to
avoid listeners, and were strolling through a by-street
towards the river, at a point but little frequented, and
near to which the water was fringed with a thin
growth of bushes. Hiram had been all eagerness
and delight; for he was too cunning to be taken in by
any professions of regard on the part of Ralph and
Sinclair, and attributed all his companion's civility to
the fright which his threats had occasioned him.
Indeed, he had been so accustomed of late to see
people cringe to him, that he had begun to fancy
himself a man of extraordinary importance. But
somehow or other there did not seem to be quite that
degree of fear manifested by his companion which he
had expected, and he recalled all his former sternness
of manner that he might re-awaken it, and bring
matters to a more speedy conclusion.
Well, well, Mr. Ripley, this is well enough.
he said, but where are the deeds? These, you
know, must be returned at once.
The deedsah, yes. Captain Sinclair saysthis
way a little, the walking is better, taking a side-cut
across an unfenced field, and still towards the river
and the bushesCaptain Sinclair says that he will
surrender them with the greatest pleasure in the
world
Hiram's eyes sparkled
Upon your paying him ten thousand guineas!
The scoundrel! exclaimed Sharp, blinded again
by sudden rage; does he dare, do
you
dare to make
such a proposal? Do you remember what I said to
you this morning?
I DO, returned Ripley, through his teeth, and
letting his brawny hand fall with the clutch of a tiger
upon the shoulder of his companion; I remember it
well
, he said, dragging the other within the cover of
the bushes:
you said there were trees on Gibbet Island
which bore such fruit as I and my swindling
companion
.
The pirate's face was changed to that of a demon;
his eyes were bloodshot; his nostrils were dilated;
his cheeks were flushed; and his whole frame
quivered
with the intensity of his rage.
You, Hiram Sharp, who have fattened on my
favorswhose whole life has been full of fraud and
villainywho yourself deserve the death of a dog
do you talk to
me
about the
gibbet!
My good sir, I didn't mean
Nay, it is
too late!
thundered Ralph, shaking his
victim to make him stand still.
Really, really, my dear Captain Ripley, let us go
back,never mind the deeds; never mind the
property
.
It is too late!
I will pay the ten thousand
It is too late!
A long, low whistle issued from the lips of Ralph,
and two agile seamen sprang up the bank and stood
at his side. Bound, gagged, dragged down the
declivity
,
and thrust into a small boat which lay
concealed
beneath the bushes, Sharp's failing senses
became conscious only of a rapid transition across the
water, of being hoisted up the side of a ship, and
thrown, like a log, into some dark corner.
Ralph had remained on the beach, and strolling
leisurely back to the city, he took especial pains to
exhibit himself at all his accustomed places of resort.
He even called at Sharp's shop, and, not finding its
proprietor at home, patiently awaited his return,
smoking meanwhile a fantastically carved pipe, and
imbibing a liberal potation of his friend's
double-reduced
Monongahela.
Hiram in the meantime remained in the dreadful
situation which has been described, a prey to the
most excruciating terror. All his efforts to move or
speak were unavailing, and the only sound that reached
his ears was an occasional coarse jibe upon his own
misfortunes, followed by fiendish laughter. Hours
elapsed, he knew not how many. The day went and
came, and there he lay. But at length there was the
sound of an approaching boat, and cheerful voices
were heard without. Somebody had come; there
was a faint gleam of hope in his breast. His son had
proved vigilant and shrewd; had suspected his fate;
had incited the governor to action; had arrested the
kidnappers, and flown, armed with official authority,
to his relief. Such was the dream of a moment,
and in the next, Ralph and Sinclair stood before him
smiling!
Oh, how dreadful was that smile! His
whole frame shuddered as he saw it, for it spoke of
the poniard, the gurgling waters, and the shark! He
was brought forward, and the gag was removed from
his mouth, but he could not speak. His feet were
next pinioned together, yet only by gestures could
he express his agony.
Bring a small shot forward! shouted Ralph.
Aye, aye, sir, was the quick response, and a
twelve pound ball was brought.
Fasten it to his feet, he said, turning away, and
when it is quite dark, call me.
Again the answer was prompt, and the orders were
obeyed, and Ralph and Sinclair descended to the
cabin. Hiram's senses seemed spell-bound, as it
were, by some hideous nightmare; but he recovered
his voice at length, and called faintly to one of his
guards. He came nearer.
Do you want to be rich? whispered the prisoner,
very rich?do you want goldgoldten thousand
real glittering guineas?
Yes, said the sailor.
Help me to escape, and you shall have it allall
and more.
There are trees on Gibbet Island, that bear such
fruit as we!
was the taunting reply.
It was as if some mocking demon was ever echoing
back the words of his rash threat. He was about to
renew his efforts when Ralph and Sinclair approached.
The evening had set in, and it was already sufficiently
dark to prevent any possibility of observation from
the shore. At their approach Hiram poured forth
the most frantic cries for pity, and Sinclair seemed
suddenly to relent.
Stop, Ralph, he said, as they were dragging their
victim to the side of the ship. We sail in a few
weekslet's carry the old sinner to the Pelews.
Yes, gentlemen, yes, cried SharpdodoI'll
Christianize them.
I'll not consent to it, exclaimed Ripley, with an
oathhe would have hung us; let him dieI won't
consent to it.
Your consent won't be asked, Mr. Ripley,
returned
the other coolly. You forget yourself, I
thinkperhaps you have been a little too long on
shore.
Very true, Captainit's for you to say, of course,
but it's my game, and curse me, if I think it's hardly
fair.
Oh, never mind, Ralph; I'll promise you he never
sets foot on these shores again, and that's enough for
our purposes.
Poor Hiram had remained looking from one to the
5
other of his captors during this colloquy in a tumult
of dreadful emotions; but when he felt himself
relieved
from the prospect of immediate death, his
delight was unbounded. The shot was removed, and
he was secured, still bound, in a small room below.
CHAPTER IX.
Rudolph Groesbeck
did not cherish his grief, or
seek to perpetuate an illusory hope. But let him not
be blamed if he could not at once uproot the gentle
flower of affection, which, dear to him as the stricken
gourd to the rebellious prophet of Judah, had sprung
into existence with almost equal celerity. Isolated
from the ordinary ties of life, it was natural that his
one attachment should be intense and strong. He
struggled indeed to free himself from its power, but,
like the broken slumbers of morning, it still returned
to enthral him, and like disturbed dreams its gorgeous
fragments still re-united, and glowed as brilliantly as
ever. The winter had passed slowly away, and the
mellow skies of May were bending above Fort
Orange
,
and the quiet little hamlet which surrounded
it. It was one of those bright mild days of spring,
when the flooding sunlight warms without oppressing,
when the air is scented with the breath of blossoms, and
when children laugh beside the rippling streams, and
shout, because the pretty birds, long exiled, have
returned
.
The bright green grass, trod by many tiny feet,
was spangled with the yellow
leontodon
, whose golden
tops were glittering on every side, plenteous as guineas
in a miser's dream. The economic bee, impatient of
the tardy thyme's delay, and looking vainly for the
sweet pea's swinging cup, sipped daintily at these less
honeyed founts, and then passed hastily away. There
was beauty and melody in the forests and the fields
on the broad blue river, and in the over-arching sky,
where many little wings were waving, and where the
gleeful swallow, caracoling gracefully, leapt laughing
through the buoyant air.
But it was high noon in Albany, the hour of sleep
from time immemorial to the Netherlanders, and in
peaceful oblivion were its ancient burghers wrapt.
There was fortunately an English garrison at the
fort, or the wily Hurons would have found it as safe
an hour for attack as the noon of night; and it is even
reported on as good authority as that of Herr
Long-bow
Vondermarvel, a now neglected chronicler, that
in earlier days the Dutch sentinels had been scalped
while asleep upon the walls, and had only discovered
their loss on awaking at the usual hour. The
regretted
trophies, however, it is said, had been
subsequently
returned to them by the taunting foe, well
cured and smoked, and suitable for use as
tobacco-pouches
.
But there was a sudden commotion in the
sleep-enveloped village, on the day which has just
been described. Doors and window-shutters were
thrown violently open in every direction, and heads
were peering out and clamorous voices were heard;
and one little bandy-legged fellow, with a short pipe
fitted immovably in one corner of his mouth, was
flying
about from house to house, sputtering forth
something
in deep Dutch which elicited a general jabbering
response from all quarters, whether of joy or grief, it
was difficult to tell. The men shouted, the women
yelled, the hens cackled, and the dogs frisked about,
and snuffed the air, and barked, and wondered what
the deuce was in the wind.
Who saw it, Hans Spaffenswelter? asked old
David Groesbeck, who had come growling from his
sleep,that's what I want to knowwho saw it?
Josh Vanderwater saw it, was the triumphant
reply; Josh Vanderwater, and you'll allow he's got
eyes.
An apparent commotion at the fort was also
perceptible
,
for the commandant and half the garrison
were on the walls, shading their eyes with their hands,
and peering away down the river. There was a
sloop coming up the Hudson, that is to say, she was
lying becalmed about ten miles distant, and might
safely be expected in within forty-eight hours. She
had come all the way from New York, and had
escaped
all the dangers of that long and perilous route.
She would bring news from the city, news of distant
friends, news, perhaps, even from Faderland, that
distant
world, to which the memory of many an ancient
Hollander still clung with a fervent love, not to be
superseded or effaced. Well might they rejoice!
Well might the old cronies congregate together on
the sunny beach, and shake hands, and laugh, and
anticipate
the tidings! How did
they
know but the
lower fort and city were again in the hands of the
Dutch? for many were still firm in the belief of such
a restoration. Ah, how would their old hearts have
bounded at such tidings! How would they have
rushed with a shout to the feebly garrisoned fort
pulled down its hated flag, and raised the banners of
the mighty states of Holland to the northern breeze!
Well might they rejoice, for they were a noble-hearted,
simple-minded race, full of honest patriotism, and lofty
courage, and patient endurance.
Rudolph alone heard of the approach of the vessel
without joy. To him it could only bring tidings of
grief. He would hear of the consummation of his
misery
;
he would hear that an eternal barrier was placed
between himself and the one object of his affections.
Such were his thoughts, and when, on the next day,
a favoring breeze brought the sloop into port, and the
city rushed
en masse
to the wharf, he strolled
nervously
away to the forests, that he might postpone for
a little while the certainty of his woe. He was not
missed from that excited throng, where friends aboard
were shouting to friends on shore; where old men
tottered on their canes, and leaned earnestly
forward
,
and placed their hands behind their ears to
catch the shouted tidings; where each eagerly asked
what it was, and none could tell, and hope, and fear,
and expectation reigned, and Babel's uproar was all
renewed. Clustered like bees upon the pier, mounted
on boxes and barrels, clinging to posts and corners,
and all as eager and delighted as children at a show,
thus the people watched and waited for the
slow-moving
sloop.
Hef you got any latters? shouted old Myndert
Van Schaick, from the top of a populous hogshead,
and waving his cane to attract attention; and the
reply was in pantomime, by the captain taking from
his capacious waistcoat pocket a large package, and
holding it up to view, thereby visibly increasing the
excitement on shore.
Is the ship in? Is there any news from
Holland
?
What tidings from the war? What
news of Admiral De Ruyter? How's old Governor
Stuyvesant? such were the questions resounding
on all sides.
There is a ship just in, was the reply sung out
by Stentorian lungs from the vessel; news of a
greatnavalbattle; Admiral De Ruyter vic-
tor-r-r
-
ious! and then the welkin rang with huzzas, and
tears gushed forth, and congratulations were
exchanged
on all sides. For this, it will be remembered,
was the period when Charles the Second and Louis
the Fourteenth had coolly resolved to slice up the
Lowlands, and, allowing the Prince of Orange a
moiety for his connivance, to divide the residue
between
themselvesa very fair business transaction,
to which the Dutch were unreasonable enough to
object
,
and flying to their arms, or rather to their fleets,
under the invincible De Ruyter, fought three drawn
battles with the allied navies of France and England,
and taught them not to look for honey in hornets'
nests. It was a tyrant's war, waged in opposition to
the sympathies of the British people, who, with
unexampled
magnanimity, wept at the reverses of their
foes, and rejoiced at their own defeats.
It was not until the tumult had subsided, and the
crowd had dispersed, that Rudolph, still futilely
trying
to throw aside his dejection, proceeded slowly
homeward. He looked suspiciously at every one
whom he encountered, dreading momentarily to
hear from some officious friend the tidings which
were ever uppermost in his mind. Resolving at
length to know the worst, he drew near to a knot of
burghers who were congregated at a corner, engaged
in animated discussion; but all that he heard was the
praises of Admiral Ruyter. Disappointed, yet
relieved
,
he tried a second group, with a similar result;
the victory was the theme, and the admiral was still
the toast. He approached the village inn, the porch
of which was darkened with an unusual cloud, and
decorated with a double row of smokers, but still the
word was RuyterRuyterRuyter. He began to
partake of the general sympathy, which, under other
circumstances, he would have been foremost to
entertain
;
but private griefs had too far usurped his
thoughts to admit of enthusiasm in national affairs.
He hastened home, where he was met by his
good-natured
uncle, with an open letter in his hand, the
reading of which he had not yet completed.
He proceeded rapidly to relate to Rudolph the
only prominent item of news of which he had
as yet become possessed, which was the
extraordinary
misfortune of Evert Knickerbocker. Startling
as was this intelligence, which was discussed at
length, and with deep regret, it conveyed no gleam
of hope to Rudolph's mind, for he had no doubt that
the nuptials of Egbert and Effie were already
solemnized
,
and he now waited patiently until he should
hear it announced. The old man put on his
spectacles
,
and holding the letter up to the light, resumed its
perusal. Various desultory items of intelligence next
followed, and Rudolph listened with exemplary
patience
,
among other things, to tidings of a famous
sheep-shearing
,
off what is now called the Battery, but more
properly the
Buttery
, owing to certain pugnacious
propensities which were wont to be exhibited by the
fathers of the flock on washing and shearing days.
Next followed a glowing description of the recent
festivities of May day, at Bowling Green, which,
although reasonably spirited, the writer grieved to
say were somewhat degenerating. They were
nothing
,
indeed, he said, to what they had been in the
good old days of Governor Stuyvesant, when the
whole town was given up to merriment, and the bell
was rung, and the flag hoisted, and the old governor
himself was seen, despite his wooden leg, dancing
with the best of them, and always choosing the
prettiest
lasses for his partners. But now, alas,
Stuyvesant
kept aloof, for, like Samson at Gaza, he was
unwilling to make sport for the Philistines. Indeed,
the presence of the gay English cavaliers, and their
stately beauties, who looked curiously on in the
distance
,
5*
imposed a sad restraint upon the mirth of the
merry throng, and made many a timid maiden shrink
from observation behind the ample robes of some
staid and portly vrow. They had fun, though, not a
little, quoth the gossipping correspondent of uncle
David, and he proceeded next to tell of a famous
game at bowling on the green, in which Alderman
Hoppman had made a remarkable twelve strike, by
knocking down, with a single ball, the ten pins of the
alley, and the two pins of Mynheer Stoffle Ocobock,
who stood stooping over the planks at the wrong
end, eagerly watching the effect of the throw.
Rudolph, as may well be supposed, was not in a
frame of mind to be amused by these tidings, and he
was about turning away when his attention was
arrested by the mention of his brother's name.
Egbert Groesbeck, continued the old man, still
reading aloud, isto bemarried
Rudolph's heart stood still
Inaboutthreeweekstotoa pause of
considerable length ensued
Effie
, uncle,
Effie Knickerbocker
, exclaimed
Rudolph
at length with desperation, and anxious to have
it done with.
Toto, said the old man, holding the letter
still closer, and peering earnestly at the puzzling
characters; toto
Effie
, I tell you, said Rudolph, who, unable
longer to endure the torture, seized his hat and was
hastening from the room, when his uncle began to
spell the refractory word.
E-u-p-h, Eff
Three chairs lay rolling about the floor, which had
obstructed Rudolph's leap to his uncle's side; he
snatched the letter from the astonished old man, and
holding it with a hand that shook till the paper
rattled
with the motion, he read the name,
Euphemia
Sharp!
The scoundrel! exclaimed old Groesbeck,
heedless
of his nephew's emotion.
Flushed with excitement, Rudolph tarried long
enough only to read a few succeeding paragraphs in
the letter, confirmatory of the news, and then hastened
to seek some retirement where he might give way to
his emotions. Hope had burst upon his mind with a
radiance almost too dazzling for endurance. Effie
was free, and was no longer separated from him by
the formidable barrier of wealth.
She was free to be
wooed and won by him
. How his rapt heart exulted
at the thought, which, for a while, buoyed him up
above all doubts and apprehensions. True, he was
poor, but poverty is a remediable evil. The gates of
wealth and power must ever yield to the magical
sesame
of an iron resolution; and what would he not
dare and do, inspirited by such a hope? The world,
from that moment, assumed a new aspect to his view.
Life was no longer a load to be endured, but a gift to
be prized and cherished. The earth was changed
from a vast prison-house to a blooming Paradise,
teeming with beauty and redolent of fragrance. Oh
blessed Hope! if thy sister, Faith, can remove
mountains
in the natural world, thou canst remove them
from the human heart. It was with no light regret
that Rudolph's friends heard him announce his
determination
to return to New York in the vessel which
had just arrived, and which was to descend the river
within a few weeks. But entreaties were unavailing
to prolong his stay. Let us behold him then again
voyaging the mighty Hudson, and after a speedy
trip of twelve days, once more arrived at the
metropolis.
CHAPTER X.
The
time of Rudolph's return was about ten days
prior to the period appointed for the nuptials of
Egbert
and Miss Sharp. That contemplated event,
however
,
was far from being a matter of public notoriety,
and was entirely unknown to Mr. Knickerbocker,
who continued to cherish the hope that Egbert's
estrangement
was only temporary, and that he would
yet prove mindful of his obligations. He knew
but little indeed of the true character of the
individual
whom he thus desired as the protector of
his daughter, and still less of Effie's feelings in regard
to him. Long accustomed to wealth, and to the
influence
which it commands, he had insensibly acquired
the habit of considering it essential to happiness, and
nothing gave him more uneasiness than the dread of
leaving his child unprotected by so powerful an gis.
Although Egbert's vices were radical, and indicated
almost a total absence of moral principle, his manner,
as has been said, was frank and engaging. Smiles
were ever at his commandcounterfeits, of course, of
the heart's true currency, but which, like other
counterfeits
,
were freely dispensed. It was not strange,
therefore, that the guileless Evert, who was possessed
of that blessed spirit of Charity which thinketh
no evil, still retained confidence in the son of his
deceased
friend.
There was one exception to the universality of
Egbert's
smiles. He had none for Rudolph; and so far
from welcoming him home, gave manifest tokens of
dissatisfaction at his return. The intercourse of the
brothers was of course, therefore, of the most limited
kind, for however Rudolph's generous nature would
have induced him to cultivate a more fraternal
feeling
,
his advances were ever coldly repulsed, and were
even openly attributed to motives of personal interest.
Rudolph was fortunately charged with some
friendly
messages from his uncle to Mr. Knickerbocker,
and, as may be imagined, he was not tardy in calling
to deliver them. As he approached Evert's residence,
he saw the old man from a distance, now strolling
slowly through his garden, and now leaning on his
cane at the water-side, and looking wistfully in
the direction of his lost estates. As he came nearer,
he saw Effie also, restraining her buoyant steps, and
walking slowly at her dear father's side; and a still
nearer view would have shown him that her face was
radiant with smiles, and that her lips were prattling
of hope, and that she was full of little devices to win
the heart-broken Evert from his grief; for she
trembled
,
poor Effie, for the failing reason of her sire, as
with his thin locks streaming to the wind, he still
gazed silently awayfar awaytoward the miles of
blooming fields and waving forests which were even
yet called by his name.
Although nearly a stranger to the family, Rudolph
received a cordial welcome from the hospitable old
man, who congratulated him on his safe return, and
evinced much curiosity on the subject of his
adventures
.
Effie, delighted at the returning smiles of her
father, and at the interest which he manifested in
their visiter's narrative, became a deeply interested
listener, and was doubly beautiful, because utterly
unconscious
of being the object of admiration. Rudolph,
of course, exerted himself to please, and became
astonished
at his own resources, and when he rose to
take his leave his new friends parted with him with
unfeigned regret. It was a singular accident, Effie
thought, that on the very next day she met him again,
while taking a short walk, and that he strolled at her
side, and engaged her in conversation, and
accompanied
her home, and again sat down by old Evert's side
for two long hours. On the ensuing day he came to
exhibit some northern curiosity of which he had
spoken on a former visit, and on the next, for some
other easily invented cause. How very kind it was
of him, thought sweet unsuspecting Effie, to come
thus daily and cheer up poor papa, for the old man's
eyes always brightened at his approach, and all his
grief seemed for a while forgotten. But other
eyes soon brightened, and other ears caught first
the sound of his footsteps, and an angel heart
beat quicker at his coming. New and strange
emotions
were Effie's, unconfessed to herself, and
carefully
concealed from others. Vainly she sought to
repress them, or to believe that they did not exist;
for she did not dare to believe that Rudolph's visits
were intended for her, or that he looked upon her
with any especial regard. To her appreciating heart
he was all too noble and too pure, to be within the
attraction of her humble charms. But as day after
day brought some new token of his regard, the
delighted
Effie was compelled to believe and hope, and
to look tremblingly for that avowal, which seemed
only unspoken.
But Rudolph unfortunately began to be haunted by
doubts. The first ardor of his hopes had subsided, and
some very natural fears suggested themselves to his
mind. If Effie had really been attached to Egbert,
was it not reasonable to suppose that she still loved
him? Might she not even be cherishing the
expectation
of his returning fealty; and might not her present
kindness to himself be the more freely exhibited,
because she had every reason to believe that he knew
of her love for another, and that he would not
misconstrue
her friendship into affection? Lovers are always
skilled in self-torture, and Rudolph was fast becoming
a proficient in the art. Several unfortunate
circumstances
gave strength to his suspicions, and just as he
had resolved to hear the worst from Effie herself, a most
untoward event occurred, interrupting his design, and
dashing all his brilliant hopes to earth. Evert had
continued blind to the attachment which existed
between
Effie and Rudolph, and so pertinaciously had
his own thoughts and hopes clung to the idea of
Egbert's
returning faith, that he imagined his daughter
to be imbued with the same feelings. What else, he
thought, could render her so happy and contented?
How could her step be otherwise so light, her voice
so cheerful, her face so radiant with smiles? In this
state of mind the half-crazed father applied to poor
Rudolph for his opinion in regard to the extent of
Egbert's
defection, and the probability of his return; and
when the young man found voice to reply, it was only
hurriedly to inquire if Effie would still be a willing
party to the alliance with his brother. The surprised
air of Evert, as he returned an unhesitating answer in
the affirmative, set the seal to Rudolph's despair. He
felt like one who, having in a dream climbed to some
giddy eminence, topples suddenly from its summit.
He was now furnished, he thought, with the key to
all Effie's conduct. His sagacity had been at fault
before, only because it had been led blindfold by
his hopes. But he never would hope again. How
foolish indeed for him to think of winning an angel
from its sphere; but he saw, thank Heaven, his
presumption
,
and now that his eyes were open he would
endeavor to keep them so. Such were Rudolph's
thoughts. His esteem for Effie was indeed slightly
impaired at the thought of her attachment to one as
undeserving as Egbert; but on reflection he
remembered
that she was ignorant of his true character, and
he thought that doubtless her affection, based at first
on a sense of duty, had grown gradually into an
enduring
sentiment. But however that might be, one
thing was clear enough, and that was that she cared
nothing for him. So this, he thought, was the end of
all his happiness. It had lasted a fortnight, for which
he might thank his folly. He would now go quietly
home, and advertise for a cap and bells, for if there
were any spare insignia of that kind in the world, he
thought he was fully entitled to wear them. Rudolph,
in short, discontinued his visits to Effie, and betook
himself once more to solitude, but, as is supposed, not
of the sweetened variety.
CHAPTER XI.
The
mysterious disappearance of Mr. Sharp caused
an unexampled commotion in the community. Wells
were explored, and rivers dragged, and forests
searched in a fruitless effort to bring his mortal
remains
to light, and among the crowds who engaged
in these labors, none were more active or efficient
than Ralph Ripley. The excitement was continually
increased by some new rumor on the subject, and
conjectures of every description were of course
afloat. Some said that the trading Indians had
carried
him off, in payment of certain arrearages of
indebtedness
,
and there were not wanting others, who,
exonerating the savages, still shook their heads
gravely, and said it was what they had long
expected
.
A certain personage
would
have his own,
and probably Sharp had got no more than he had
bargained for a great while before. No suspicion fell
on Ripley, for none had known of the quarrel on the
day of the abduction, and until that time Ralph and
the lawyer had been on friendly terms. As to
Sinclair
,
he gave himself no uneasiness on the subject,
excepting to express an opinion that it was really
quite a shocking affair; but he had known many
things more strange off the coast of Portugal. But
when three or four days had elapsed without any
clew to the secret, the search was relinquished, and
poor Sharp was abandoned to his fate. The wedding
was of course postponed, and Egbert Groesbeck had
the gratifying prospect before him, not only of utter
insolvency, but of a speedy exposure of his affairs,
and probably a perpetual leave of absence from the
charming Euphemia. Neither that young lady, nor
her brother, manifested any excess of grief at their
misfortune, for Sharp had been in his family, as
elsewhere
,
a harsh man, and his house had been
emphatically
a home of the iron rule. Benhadad indeed
talked largely of his designs in regard to his lost
progenitor
,
and it was thought by some that he would
not stop short of drawing off both rivers in search of
the body, and exterminating a few tribes of Indians,
to avenge the paternal manes; but somehow it
happened
that he never really entered upon any of his
vast designs. Benhadad was a young man of a lofty
gait, and a general pompousness of mien. His
self-importance
,
never deficient, had been immeasurably
increased by his new position, and it was with
difficulty
that he could keep down his sense of rising
greatness sufficiently to admit of paying decent
respect
to the memory of his lost parent. He possessed,
of course, but little of his father's shrewdness, for
arrogance, in his case, as in most others, was the
off-spring
of a shallow brain; but then he fully believed
that the cloak of Hiram had fallen upon his shoulders,
and that it was an exceeding good fit.
Benhadad was a very condescending man. He
was exceedingly gracious to Evert; expressed his
regrets at some little misunderstanding which he
believed had existed between the families; and
tendered
to his venerable friend, by way of a
peace-offering
,
the use of a cow-pasture in some odd angle
of the Knickerbocker manor. It need not be said
that the munificence of the junior Sharp was not
accepted, or very gratefully acknowledged. It
awakened the slumbering fires of resentment in the
breast of Evert, and the ashen hue of rage was on his
cheek, as striking his cane violently to the ground,
he said,
Your father
Blessed be his memory, interposed Benhadad, by
way of a reminder, for he thought he foresaw a storm.
Your father, young man
Has gone to his reward, rejoined the pious son.
Yesyesyes, said the old man emphatically;
he hashe has; and seeming to think better of
his proposed invective, he turned slowly away, and
left his companion not a little relieved by his
departure
.
But Hiram Sharp, in the meantime, as the reader
is aware, had not yet put off his mortal coil. His
prison chamber was lighted by a port-hole, the iron
tenant of which was stored for the present, with its
companions, beneath a miscellaneous mass of ballast,
far from the observation of any prying eyes, which
might, upon some possible contingency, visit the
suspected
Zephyr. The port-holes themselves were
ingeniously
masked, this one alone being left partly unclosed,
less, however, out of any regard for the prisoner's
comfort
,
than for the convenience of his custodians. Sharp
was chained to the floor, at a point whence it was
supposed impossible for him to gain access to the
aperture, even to indulge in the slight luxury of
gazing upon the world from which he was excluded.
But what will not the ingenuity of despair, favored by
solitude, accomplish? By dint of extraordinary
muscular
exertions, and untiring patience, he could
succeed
in bringing his eyes to a level with the opening,
and feasting them upon the view without, taking
care, of course, never to indulge in this forbidden
pleasure when there was any danger of being
discovered
by his keepers. The window looked out
upon the distant city. He could see his own house,
and watch the very smoke that curled up from the
fireside at which he had been accustomed to sit. He
could see figures moving at the open windows, and
others crossing the lawn, and entering his doors; and
when the air was still and dense, he could even hear
the barking of his favorite dog. The voice and its
echo from the barn came to him together. He knew
the sound well, and would have liked it better had it
not been for the remembrance which it summoned
up, of a poor Indian, driven away but yesterday by
Fang, unconvinced that his merchandise of seal-skins
had been damaged by
getting wet
, and that the
pittance
which he received for them was enough for his
hard-earned treasures.
Day and night did Hiram gaze, at intervals,
through this loop-hole of his retreat toward his
distant
home. It seemed as if it had been prepared for
him by way of a refined species of torture; for not
Tantalus, bound chin-deep, in the cool waters which
his parched lips might never reach, not Tantalus
endured a more exquisite pain. But there is only one
place to which Hope never comes, and that good
genius appeared to Hiram in the very remarkable
guise of old Tony West, a negro fisherman. Tony
was the property of a main chance man on Long
Island, who, in consideration of his faithful services
by day, generously allowed him his liberty at night,
a portion of which the slave regularly appropriated to
his piscatory pursuits, and was thereby amassing, by
sixpences, a sum with which to purchase, at some
future day, no less a treasure than his own body and
soul.
Some men are born free, thought Tony, sadly,
and that's five hundred dollars in their pockets to
start with; but still he did not complain, but went on
toiling with net and line, fully believing that he should
yet fish up the great boon of liberty from the bottom
of the bay. He had reason to hope, Tony had; for
a year's labor had brought him nearly fifty dollars, a
stupendous sum in his imagination, and only nine
years more would complete the task.
It was on a dark night that the negro, after
unusually
long and ineffectual labors in his little skiff,
far out from shore, had raised his anchor
dejectedly
and started for home. The night was far spent,
and his torches had expired, and his pipe had gone
out, and he bent, nodding with sleep, over his oars,
yet keeping up their slow and monotonous stroke, and
lulling himself still more by the sound. But as
Morpheus
gained ground, the oars dropped from his
hands, and the dark boat, and its darker tenant,
drifted silently along, invisible as a cloud upon the
wave. If Tony did not catch many fish in his sleep,
it was not for want of diligent bobbing, for his round
woolly head went up and down with a ceaseless and
regular motion, and he was only awakened at length
from a dreamy tussle with a mammoth codfish, by
the sound of his boat striking against some hard
substance
.
It was some time before he became
sufficiently
awake to discover that he had run foul of a
ship, and he was about pushing his boat off, when he
heard a voice calling in an earnest but suppressed
tone for help. The negro could see nothing, but he
guided his skiff in the direction of the sound, and soon
lay directly beneath the point whence it seemed to
emanate.
Quickquick, said the prisoner,this way
listen to me; I am Hiram Sharp, the great merchant
of New Yorkkidnapped by Captain Ripleyand
going to be murdered here on board the Zephyrdo
you hear me?
Yyyes, said Tony, trembling, I hare.
Who are you? said Sharp.
TonyTonyI'm TonyI b'long to Massa
West, over yeer in Breuklyn.
Go quick to my son and tell him where I am
murderedon the Zephyrquickand tell him to
give you a hundred dollars, right straight downand
that I say so. Go, Tonygood Tony, quick.
Jess jump right out, massaright out of that hole,
6
Oh, I can't, Tony, I can't; my feet are chained
together, and chained to the floor; go, Tony, go.
And Tony went.
The ensuing morning had been set apart by Mr.
Benhadad Sharp, for a visit to the manor tenantry to
notify them of their loss, and that he, Benhadad, was
to be regarded as their future landlord. His buttoned
coat only did not burst, as, clad in the habiliments of
woe, he stepped into his carriage, and was detained
only by the sudden appearance of Tony, breathless
and speechless, who, gazing at him with eyes
frightfully
dilated, laid his huge dark hand upon the wheel
as if he would arrest its motion until he could speak.
Benhadad waited complacently, for he knew the old
negro well, and had no doubt that he had brought
intelligence
of having accidentally fished up his honored
ancestor. Indeed, he was already singling out a small
coin in his pocket to reward the slave, when the
latter
recovered his voice, and with chattering teeth
related his wonderful tale. Astonishment and alarm
for a moment held the young man silent.
Tumultuous
and mingled feelings succeeded, in which, strange
to tell, joy did not preponderate. His dimensions
visibly diminished, and his swollen and rigid air quite
disappeared. He questioned the negro again and
again, and eliciting nothing to throw discredit on the
story, dismissed him. To Tony's eager appeal for
the promised reward, he replied by a gratuity of half
a dollar, and an intimation that a similar sum would
be forthcoming after the release of his father was
effected
.
No injunction of secrecy was imposed upon
the negro; nothing to prevent the rumor from
spreading
,
reaching the ears of Ripley, and thus defeating
the chance of rescue. But Tony was not himself
devoid of sagacity, and his wits were sharpened now
by the hope of gaining the munificent prize which
had been promised him. He hastened therefore,
unobserved
by Benhadad, to the presence of Euphemia,
and repeating his marvellous tale, again demanded
his reward. Miss Sharp was both shocked and
delighted
,
for she was not without a degree of affection
for her father, and besides that, she was not
unmindful
of her deferred nuptials. Egbert was at once
summoned, and he indeed proved a joyful recipient of
the news, and advised instant, vigorous and secret
action; while Benhadad, who soon joined them,
found himself compelled to imitate the zeal of his
companions, and was even forced by their decision to
tell down the chinking gold into poor Tony's broad,
black, trembling hand. How it glistened on that
ebony palm! How melodiously they rung, those twenty
bright yellow guineas, striking against each other, and
how the great iron fingers closed over the treasure,
with a clutch designed to render all relentings
useless
.
Nothing but Death could have opened Tony's
hand.
Egbert went about his task with earnestness.
Enjoining
the strictest secrecy upon all, his first step was
to lay all the facts before Governor Lovelace, and apply
for his official aid. He had a long and private
interview
with that officer, and was returning from the
government house, wrapt in the contemplation of his
schemes, when he encountered Captain Sinclair,
bearing in his hands a package of papers, which he at
once recognized as the fatal deeds. They were in the
vicinity of the office of Records, and Egbert at once
guessed the design of the other; for he had been daily
trembling at the expected exposure of his affairs, and
had with difficulty persuaded his friend to defer
making
the matter public until now. Taking the arm of
Sinclair, and drawing him aside, he said,
You have accommodated me so often about these
dreadful deeds, that I really feel ashamed to ask any
further delay; but let me beg for one week more.
Mr. Groesbeck must excuse me, answered
Sinclair
,
coldly; the deeds must be recorded.
Give me one week, said Egbert, and you will
save me from ruin.
Sinclair smiled incredulously, and did not yield; it
was the old story, he said, and Groesbeck was no nearer
his object now than he had been three weeks before.
Stop, said Egbert, as the other was turning away;
I have a great secret; you shall hear it, and judge
for yourself.
He then proceeded to relate to the astonished
Sinclair
,
the discoveries in relation to Sharp, and how his
return would be followed in a few days by the
postponed
wedding. A warrant is already being
prepared
for Ripley's arrest, he said, and as soon as it
is dark, three gun-boats with marines will be sent out
to board the Zephyr, and bring her into port. Do you
believe me now, he said, and will you wait?
I doI do, replied Sinclair, smiling, and
returning
the papers to his pocket. Oh yesI'll wait; why,
there'll be fun, won't there? I wonder if they'll hang
that bull-dog of a Ripley. I always thought he had a
bad lookthe scoundrelthe dem'd infernal villain,
I may say. Good morninggood morning, sir; and
bowing and smiling, Captain Sinclair turned
gracefully
away, leaving Egbert more than ever impressed
with the idea that he was an exceedingly civil and
good-natured fellow.
Twenty minutes afterwards Sinclair and Ralph
were standing together in the very grove which had
proved so fatal to Hiram.
You will cruise in the West Indies until autumn,
said the Captain, hurriedly, when you will return to
Boston, where I will meet you. In the mean time,
you will of course change your paint and name.
And that dd Sharp? said Ripley, inquiringly, as
he placed one foot in the boat, and looked angrily back.
Is to be preserved
, said Sinclair, emphatically;
mind, I insist on this; the reason you shall know
hereafter.
I'll be hanged if he don't wish the sharks had him,
then, before we get back, replied Ripley, as he
pushed off; and Sinclair, smiling, walked hurriedly
back to offer his assistance in the pursuit.
CHAPTER XII.
Formidable
, meanwhile, were the preparations
which were made for the seizure of the Zephyr. The
suspicion which had long rested upon this vessel was
now turned into a reasonable certainty, and Governor
Lovelace, roused to vigorous action by so great an
outrage, was determined to bring her into port, and to
arrest her whole crew as pirates, not doubting that
the fullest proof could be adduced against them.
There was no naval force in any shape attached to
the colonial government at this period; but there was
fortunately a British man-of-war lying in port,
undergoing
some repairs, which, although unfitted for
immediate service, was manned by a gallant crew and
brave officers, of whom Mr. Second Lieutenant Flash
was one. To his charge the expedition was
committed
,
which was to be, if necessary, a regular cutting
out affair, although it was hoped that the enemy,
being unalarmed, would offer no serious resistance.
Not so however hoped Flash, who, from the moment
that he was intrusted with the enterprise, considered
his long expected promotion as secured beyond any
further contingency. How it will read in the gazettes
at home, he said to himself gleefully, as he stood
watching an old tar who was diligently engaged in
furbishing up his sword hilt: Lieut. Flash, with three
gun-boats of marines, made a most daring and gallant
attack upon a piratical sloop-of-war, of twelve guns,
lying in the bay of Manhattantremendous conflict
deck strewn with the dyingblood in torrents and
Flash snapped his fingers, and cut a rapid pigeon-wing
at the delightful anticipation. We'll carry her of
course, he said; there'll be lots of prize money,
probably
,
but no matter about that; there's a first
lieutenantcy
,
that's certain; and again he laughed and
rubbed his hands joyously together.
All day did Egbert Groesbeck walk excitedly
about, watching the mysterious preparations; for no
one felt more anxious than he about the result. He
feared momentarily that the Zephyr would take to
flight, for she seemed like some graceful sea-bird,
floating buoyantly upon the water, and ready to
spread her white wings at the least alarm. There
seemed however little ground for such an
apprehension
,
for she had lain for weeks in her present
position
,
and gave no indication of any intended change.
The failure to find Ripley on shore created no
surprise
,
for he frequently passed days together on his
ship, and he was supposed to be in profound ignorance
of the deep and well-digested designs against him.
Benhadad's feelings were of a conflicting character,
but his complacency was in part restored by his being,
as he fancied, the prime mover in the momentous
events which were now occurring. He thanked
Heaven, with a vertical toss of his head, that he had
at length opened the eyes of the government, and
had got the government into motion; and Miss
Euphemia
guessed that Mr. Ralph Ripley would learn
better than to carry off folks's papas, and just as
folks were going to be married, too. Swelling with
the importance of his secret, and wearing a
profounder
look than Pitt, with the fate of Europe in his
hands, Benhadad strayed, or rather stalked, at
twilight
,
to the wharf, and examined the boats and the
munitions which were being prepared for the
enterprise
.
He was joined by Lieutenant Flash, who,
coming up to him with a face radiant with joy,
exclaimed
,
Sharp, I've got the most delightful news for you;
Captain Grim is really a very considerate man; he
says, considering your natural anxiety in the matter,
he will not object to you accompanying the
expedition
,
and doing what you can to render it successful
under me, of course.
IIahyesI fear muttered Benhadad, a
little crest-fallen.
You can go in my boat, you know, continued the
rattling lieutenantfirst to board, after meyouthful
ardorpike-in-handdash into the cabinand
rescue
your father with your own hands;won't it be
glorious?
Yyyes, said Benhadad, it would be nice
that wouldbut what will the bloody pirates be doing
all that time?
Oh, cut and thrusttake and giveneck or
nothing, said Flashthe chances of war, you
know; they may blow us all up together in one
undistinguishaawhy, what the deuce is the
matter, Sharp? you look as pale as a sheet.
Why, the truth is, replied Benhadad, I'm a little
unwell, and I think I'd better not venture out; the
night air don't exactly agree with me, and I believe
6*
I'll stay at home. 'Twould be all very nice, of course
youthful ardorpike-in-handand all that, and I'm
very much obliged to you, you know, all the same;
good night, Mr. Flashtake care you don't get wet.
The single-minded lieutenant, educated to a
contempt
of danger, and whose valor was always
red-hot
,
could scarcely credit the cowardice of his
companion
.
He had expected to be overwhelmed with
thanks. He gazed after him for some time in silent
wonder, and then muttering a contemptuous Pshaw!
turned quickly away.
It is due to Captain Sinclair to say that that gallant
officer called upon the governor and made a tender
of his services to command the expedition, thereby
gaining great clat at a very slight cost, inasmuch as
Captain Grim of the man-of-war would not of course
listen to such a proposal to the prejudice of an officer
in His Majesty's navy.
But probably, said Lovelace, if Captain Sinclair
chooses to take one of the boats
Captain Sinclair bowed very low, and smiled very
graciously. He would do it gladly, but for the risk
of giving offence in certain high quarters at home, by
taking command under a lieutenant. The thing was
not to be thought of. What would his cousin the
Duke of Parma say, and Count Sylvioandand
and Captain Sinclair wished the governor a very good
morning.
A devilish fine fellow, that Sinclair is, said
Lovelace
to one of his companions as the Spaniard bowed
himself out of the room; I wish we could induce
him to remain among us.
It is said that he will do so, was the reply; he
has talked for several weeks past of a design to
purchase
an estate here, and retire from the service.
Motionless meanwhile, and with no appearance of
life upon her decks, lay the suspected Zephyr. The
wind was light, and was growing gradually less, and
Ripley avoided exhibiting any premonitions of flight,
until the breeze was sufficient to render the attempt
effectual; for if he was to be compelled to await an
attack, it was better that the enemy should suppose
him to be unalarmed. He relied however on the
wind freshening at sunset, enough at least to admit of
changing his position to some good hiding-place, and
in the night or the early morning, the zephyrs would
be pretty certain to come to the assistance of their
graceful little namesake. Two or three puffs, he
said, looking aloft with knotted brows, will put her
outside the Narrows, and then we are safe. Ripley
would have fought the boats with a perfect good will,
had not Sinclair forbidden it, and then besides, he
thought, this fighting with a halter around one's neck
isn't exactly the thing. His guns were mounted,
however
,
and all his weapons were put in order to repel
an attack, and it was not a little singular that two
diligent subordinate officers who superintended these
labors, bore a marvellous resemblance to the Austrian
lieutenants, of whom mention has heretofore been
made.
All day did Ralph watch the sky and scan the
light feathery clouds to find tokens of the coming
windbut all in vain: the breeze continued to fall
away, and when the sun went down there was a
perfect calm. So smooth and motionless lay the
waters that the stars, as they successively came to
their posts, were greeted by their images in the wide
and beautiful mirror which lay stretched beneath
them. The situation of the Zephyr became
momentarily
more critical, and Ripley began to give tokens
of uneasiness. Even the tide had joined the list of
his enemies. It was coming slowly in, and any
attempt to change his position, by drifting, would
have borne him still further from the open sea, and
would thus have diminished his chances of escape.
Meanwhile Lieutenant Flash was the busiest and
happiest man in the province. It was about nine
o'clock that he put his force in motion, after a brief
hortatory address to his men, reminding them that
the honor of their flag, their own private reputation,
and a small fortune for each of them, depended upon
their conduct. It's probable, he said, mind I don't
say it's certain, but it's probable that fellow is
ballasted
with ingots. Remember that the most perfect
silence is to be maintained, and you all understand
that, one way or another, we are to bring the Zephyr
into port. So push ahead, my hearties, and you,
Midshipmen Jones and Smith, addressing the
commandants
of the other two boats, don't forget my
orders, and nowgo aheadno, not yet,one thing
more, said the lieutenant, charged to the brim with
ecstatic delightthe man who first touches the deck
of the Zephyr shall have half of my prize money
that's allgo ahead; and touching his cap to
Governor
Lovelace and Captain Grim, who, with one or
two others, stood wrapt in their cloaks on the
quarter-deck
of the Terror, watching the embarkation, the
gallant lieutenant sat down, and the boats, with
muffled
oars, moved noiselessly off. It is needless to say
that every man resolved to be first on board the
enemy
,
and with such enthusiasm, there was little fear
of defeat.
As the twilight had departed, Ripley's alarm had
rapidly increased. The unfurled sails were hanging
motionless from the masts, ready for the wind, which
did not come; and one, with an axe, stood ready to
cut the huge cable at the first rustling of the air. But
still the seemingly doomed vessel lay,
without breath or motion,
As idle as a painted ship
Upon a painted ocean.
Every preparation was therefore made for the
conflict which now seemed unavoidable; and although
the Zephyr was but slightly manned, the fierce looks
and threats of twenty bold buccaneers showed that
she would prove no easy prey. The disadvantage
of the pirates consisted in being greatly outnumbered,
and in the fact that their enemy, if beaten off, could
reinforce his strength and renew the attack. As to
the guns of the ship, but little aid was expected from
them in the silence and obscurity of a night attack'
when the first notice of their foe might be the clash of
the grappling irons. An hour elapsed, and a distinct
though faint sound of oars was heard. Every heart
beat quicker.
All hands to repel boarders! said the third
officer, in a suppressed voice.
Silence, you fool, retorted Ralph; do you think
they'll come with such a noise as that?
Zephyr, ahoy, ahoy! came up in a faint but
familiar voice from under the bow.
It's
the Captain!
responded twenty voices in a
breath, and before the buzz of excitement had
subsided
,
Sinclair stood upon the deck.
I knew Captain Karl wasn't the man to see his
comrades fighting against odds, and he not there,
said a privileged old ruffian, with an oath.
No, no, my boys, replied the Captain, evidently
in a state of the most intense excitement; no, no!
the Zephyr's my bride; if she's lost, so am I; but,
he continued, drawing Ralph aside and lowering his
voice still more, this is a bad fix, Ripley; but
you've disposed of Sharp, of course?
Disposed of him? growled Ralph; he's asleep,
I presume, below, taking his comfort; he must not be
disturbed on any account. Probably he'd like
something
warm for supper.
Tut, tut, over with him, of course; I did not
calculate
on this; we must not be found with
him
on
board.
Mr. Ripley, whispered a sailor, touching him and
pointing over the bow, I think they're coming, sir.
Ralph looked and distinctly saw a dark object
moving slowly and noiselessly, like a cloud on the
water, and approaching the vessel in the direction of
her bow, evidently to avoid danger from the guns.
They're coming, Captain Karl, he said, in
earnest.
So is the wind!
replied Sinclair, as with one
hand extended, he felt the air; stand by to cut the
cable.
Aye, aye, sir.
In a minute more a flapping noise was heard
against the masts; the next, the sails slightly filled.
The order to cut was given, and the parted cable fell
with a splash into the water; the canvass slowly
distended, and the vessel came gracefully around, and
glided, duck-like, down the bay.
Flash saw it, heard it, felt the growing breeze on
his cheek, and groaned in the intensity of his
anguish
.
A parting ball skipped past him on the wave,
and he almost wished, for the moment, that it had not
missed its aim.
'Twas very hard, Captain Grim, he said, as,
twenty minutes afterwards, he stood once more on
shipboard, gazing gloomily seaward; she slipped
right through my fingers, sir, at the very last minute,
and Flash dashed a tear from his cheek.
Never mind, Harry, said Grim, whose usual
hauteur had yielded to admiration of his young
officer's
valor; never mind; Sir Henry shall hear all
about it; and I'll see to your promotion myself.
This unexpected kindness came like balm to the
mortified spirit of the lieutenant. He knew that
Captain Grim was not lavish either of praises or
promises, and he knew, moreover, that he was the
brother of one of the Lords of the Admiralty. So
Harry took heart, and made the best of it.
Merrily, meanwhile, went the Zephyr on her way,
and as she passed slowly along near the eastern
shore of the bay, the despairing Sharp gazed out
from a crevice in his prison, and looked earnestly
landward. He recognized, even by starlight, the
shape of the coast, and knew it as his own soil, and
as a part of the famed Knickerbocker manor. Long
and wistfully he gazed, clinging, as it were, by his
eyes, to each receding point, and looking still in the
same direction when it had faded entirely from view.
Onward went the Zephyr, rapidly, merrily, and
bidding a final adieu to the bay of Manhattan and all
its appurtenances. Off Robins' Reef she parted with
her ubiquitous Captain, who was seen the next
morning
leisurely smoking his
meerschaum
, as usual, on the
piazza of Mynheer Schnaffenswauzer's inn.
Flash, my fine fellow, he said, as he was
accidentally
joined by the lieutenant, they tell me you
had bad luck last night; I am sorry for you; I am,
indeed. I always thought thataaRipton there,
was a dem'd pirate; he had a bad look decidedly.
CHAPTER XIII.
There
were few to mourn the abduction of Hiram
Sharp. Among those who did not weep was poor
Tony West, who had been perpetually haunted by
visions of the released Hiram posting to Breuklyn
to reclaim his gold and disavow his promise. But
Tony had taken some slight preventive measures
against such a calamity; for he had sewed up his
treasure in a leathern bag, and had inclosed the whole
in a small deal box, which in its turn he had buried
deeply in his master's cellar, and covered with a
heavy hogshead, and thrice a day did poor Tony
steal cautiously down to see if his huge sentinel was
undisturbed.
If Evert Knickerbocker's wrongs were seemingly
avenged by the calamity which had befallen their
author, his own condition was by no means improved.
It was like one of those comfortable processes of the
law, by which, sometimes, a criminal is heavily fined for
depredations upon his neighbor's property, the amount
of the amercement going into the public treasury,
while the defrauded party gets nothing but
satisfaction
,
and that of rather a diluted quality. It was
indeed rather an aggravation of Evert's sufferings to
behold the exaltation of a new enemy, whose
legitimate
insignificance was unrelieved by the shrewdness
which sometimes saves villainy from contempt.
Benhadad's condescension was harder to bear than
Hiram's hate, and Evert, in the exercise of Christian
duty, found it easier to forgive the father than to
withhold his scorn from the son. For Benhadad had
recovered all his importance, and there was a degree
of loftiness, even in his grief, a sort of stately
solemnity
,
which was quite imposing. He felt relieved
from further responsibility by the turn which events
had taken, for there were no means of pursuing his
father, or taking any additional steps for his rescue.
Whatever had been the cause which led to so great a
crime, there seemed no reason to hope for a return
of the unfortunate victim. His children could not at
once assume the right to their large inheritance, but
they had all the essential benefits of ownership, with
a reasonable certainty of the future title.
Mr. Knickerbocker, meanwhile, saw his means
continually decreasing, with no prospect of relief from
utter poverty. He felt like the tenants of those ingenious
cells of torture, the walls of which are so constructed
as to move daily nearer together, until their hapless
tenant is crushed between them. He saw the
approach
of destitution, and estimated daily its
diminished
distance. Ah, dreadful task! to watch the
out-going stream, and the failing fountain, with no
power to stay or replenish its departing tide. But
sorrows come not singly, and the venerable Evert
found still another source of anxiety in the impaired
health of his daughter. Not that she complained of
illness, or intermitted her usual duties, but there was
such a change
in Effie. She, who had been so
cheerful and so ready to impart courage to him, was
now herself drooping, and the more evidently so,
from her earnest but ineffectual attempts to maintain
her former vivacity. The smile faded in its inception,
the once ringing laugh was now forced and unnatural,
the sparkling eyes were dimmed with frequent tears,
and the pallid face was turned aside to hide them.
Her brother was the first to notice this change and to
guess at its cause. The name of this young Nimrod,
which is supposed to have been originally Jedediah,
had been shortened by immemorial usage in the
family into the initial syllable, and the very servants
had no other name for him than Massa Jed. His
devotion to the chase was unbounded, and it gave
additional zest to the relish with which he pursued his
forest sports, to know that they now contributed
materially
to the maintenance of the family. He was a
stout, broad-shouldered young man, with the full
glow of health upon features which, if none of the
handsomest, possessed the inimitable charm of good
nature. There was never a snarl or a crotchet visible
on his face, and let the world go as it would, he had
a good word and a smile for everybody. He used to
say, that next to his hounds and his hunter he loved
Effie, but the truth was that his gentle sister had
no rival in his affections. During the period of
Rudolph's
recent visits to the Knickerbocker family, a
warm friendship had sprung up between the young
men; an intimacy, indeed, of that sudden growth
which could originate only between dispositions alike
frank and ingenuous. They had walked, and ridden,
and hunted together; and nearly all of the time
which Rudolph had not devoted to Effie, had been
passed in the presence of her brother. Jed had, of
course, suspected the sentiments of the lovers, and
Effie's recent dejection had confirmed his suspicions.
He felt certain that there was some unfathomed
mystery
in the matter, but he did not think of bestowing
censure upon Rudolph, whom he knew to be the soul
of sincerity and truth. Affairs stood thus for several
weeks, and Jed looked daily, but in vain, to see the
returning sunshine of his sister's smile, and to hear
her wonted voice of mirth welcoming him home from
the woodlands. He had returned one afternoon in
unusual spirits, having brought down two noble bucks
after a glorious run, and he was so delighted himself
that he felt sure of seeing Effie in her wonted glee.
Nor was he entirely disappointed; she met him with
momentary cheerfulness, for there was no resisting
his contagious enthusiasm, and poor Jed rejoiced to
believe that the spell was at length really broken.
And here comes father, he shouted, as the
bending
form of Evert was seen moving slowly up the
lawn; two bucks, fatherone with six antlers, and
one
But the evident abstraction of the old man, and the
expression of his features, indicating that he had
something
else in his thoughts, induced the son to pause.
Rudolph is going to Holland, said Evert, as he
drew nigh.
A light trembling hand was upon Jed's shoulder,
and at the next moment he felt that Effie was leaning
upon him for support.
Let us go in, she said, as she slid her arm within
her brother's; the air grows cold; and Jed, talking
rapidly for her relief, accompanied her into the house.
Evert's intelligence was true. Rudolph had
resolved
to bid a final adieu to the province, and to
seek his fortunes in his ancestral land. The pending
war was rich in inducements both to patriotism and
ambition, and he might bury his griefs in its turmoil,
or, which seemed scarcely less desirable, terminate
them in an honorable death. His Majesty's
brig-of-war
,
the Terror, had been repaired, and being on the
eve of sailing, afforded him the means of proceeding
at once to England, whence he could cross, if not
directly to Holland, by reason of the war, yet to
some part of the continent from which that country
would be easily accessible. He had one trial to
endure
before departing which he would gladly have
avoided, and that was to bid adieu to the
Knickerbockers
.
Ordinary civility forbade the neglect of so
obvious a duty, and a few days prior to that fixed for
his departure, he nerved himself to the task. Evert
had both messages and packages to forward to his
native land, and gladly availed himself of Rudolph's
offered services to bear them. He lauded the young
man's enterprise and courage, and wished him every
success, not neglecting, on a momentary return of his
monomania, to give one more twinge to the torture
of the lover, by a repetition of his former inquiry in
relation to Egbert. Jed was not at home, and while
Rudolph was talking constrainedly to Effie, the old
man casually strolled away, and there was a crisis
when it seemed that something must occur to dispel
the singular hallucination which rested upon two
ingenuous
minds, each devotedly attached to the other,
and yet about to separate forever. Ah! how many
a term of misery has been entailed upon generous
and noble hearts by some trifling misunderstanding
which a word might have dispelled, and yet that
word was never spoken.
If Rudolph could not fail to notice the change in
Effie, he attributed it all to Egbert's perfidy, and thus
the mesh of error thickened around him until he was
entangled at every point.
I fear that my father is troubling you with too
many commissions, said Effie, after an embarrassing
pause in conversation.
By no means, replied Rudolph; his letters will
serve as an introduction for me, and may prove of
the greatest service. Has Miss Knickerbocker no
messages for her friends abroad?
I believe I have no friends, replied Effie, smiling
faintly, excepting father and Jed.
It will take something from my sense of loneliness
on leavinghome, said Rudolph, if Miss
Knickerbocker
will allow me to believe that she includes me
also in the list.
Effie bowed, and turned away, unable to speak.
There was another pause, but no good angel
intervened
to show this mistaken pair their folly; a formal
farewell ensued,and Rudolph was gone.
CHAPTER XIV.
The
sun was approaching the western horizon, and
the lengthened shadows were stretching across the
waters, on the day which has last been named, when,
on the portico of his old Dutch mansion, walking
excitedly
to and fro, now pausing and muttering to
himself as he looked anxiously down the road, and
now resuming his rapid and noisy march, Peter
Stuyvesant, ex-governor of the New Netherlands,
revolved weighty matters in his mind. He was
awaiting with such patience as he could command,
the return of his messenger, Hans, from the city, who,
after long delay, was seen approaching at a slow
walk, yet very much out of breath. Hans was no
Ariel in figure and no Puck in speed, and so far from
putting a girdle round the earth in forty minutes,
he would have required half that time to put one
around a circuit equivalent to his own capacious
waist; but he was faithful and reliable to the last
flicker of the feeble judgment which reposed beneath
his bushy hair and fat narrow forehead.
Well. Hans, said the governor, when the other
had recovered his breath, have you seen them all?
7
Yaw, Mynheer, said Hans.
Teunis, and Myndert, and Mr. Knickerbocker?
Yaw, Mynheer.
And Stoutenburgh, and Poffenburgh, and
Hardenburgh
,
and Vanderburgh?
Yaw, Mynheer.
And Van Schaick, and Van Schoonhoven, and
Van Ness, and Van Rensselaer, and Van Kortland,
and Vanderpool, and Vandergrift, and Vanderveer,
and Vanderspeigle?
Yaw
And Livingston, and Duyckinck, and Romaine,
and Roosevelt, and Roorback, and Clapsaddle?
Still the answer was in the affirmative.
And are they all coming? continued Stuyvesant,
still with an excited air.
They were all coming.
Go now, then, to Rudolph Groesbeck, and tell him
that I, Peter Stuyvesant, wish to see him at my house
forthwith, on private business of importance; tell it
to him alone, apart, and secretlyand tell him not to
speak of it; do you understand?
Yaw, Mynheer, said Hans; Mr. Groesbeck
musht come, and musht be mum; and the tortoise
express was again under way.
It was not long before Rudolph, not a little
surprised
at his singular summons, was in the presence
of the governor. They were closeted together for
nearly an hour, and before their conference had
ended
,
the congregated guests in an adjoining apartment
had grown impatient for the appearance of their host.
He joined them at length with little greeting, and
taking the seat which had been reserved for him,
lighted his pipe and smoked for a long time in silence.
The apartment was well lighted and its windows
were carefully closed, and the guests, each also
diligently
smoking, had the air of men whose minds
were by no means unoccupied. There was a look
of thought and expectation on every face, and it was
quite evident that no one present was ignorant of the
general object of their convocation, how much soever
they might be in the dark as to its particular design
at that time. Half an hour elapsed, and the clouds
grew thicker and the silence more unbroken; and
frequent glances were turned, not to the governor's
countenance, but to his particular pillar of smoke, to
glean some indications of his sentiments, and of his
approaching remarks. They were coming, evidently
enough, and wrathfully, too, for the slow, graceful and
thoughtful wreaths had given place to short, quick,
dense puffs which chased each other to the ceiling
like miniature thunder-clouds.
We have borne it long enough, he said at length;
we have borne it long enough.
Long enough, Mynheer, answered Teunis
Vanderbilt
;
and long enough echoed from every part
of the apartment, followed by a general nodding of
heads, and increased furiousness of fumigation. There
were eyes, too, that gleamed like live coals through
those clouds, and an under-tone of wrath ran around
the room, subsiding only as the speaker resumed his
address:
He is a tyrant, and the province is all ready to
rise: Fort Orange could be ours at a moment's
notice
;
Long Island is ripe for revolt; New Sweden
is impatient for the word; and it is only here that we
are powerless. But three ships of war from home
would give us the cityand
we must have them
.
Innumerable yaw-yaws responded to this
sentiment
,
and the excitement rapidly increased.
There is one of our friends, continued the speaker,
with the air of a man who is about to announce a
startling fact there is one of our friends who starts
the day after to-morrow for Holland, who will carry
out our despatches, and further our designs.
A general and joyful surprise was manifested at this
announcement, and all eyes were turned upon Yawpy
Poffenburgh, who, having recently accomplished the
wonderful feat of crossing the ocean, was supposed to
be the only man competent to the task. But Yawpy
turning slightly pale with alarm, at the threatened
honors
,
hastily disavowed any intention of leaving home.
He knew well the peril of attempting such a mission,
under the vigilant watch of Lovelace and his agents.
No, no, my friends, added Stuyvesant; here is
the man, calling in Rudolph from an adjoining
apartment
,
young, ardent, patriotic, who stands ready to
aid usRudolph Groesbeck, the son of my old friend
and councillor, Wilhelmus.
Rudolph, thus introduced to the assembly, was
received
with cordial greetings, and shaking of hands,
and even with tears, and great was the astonishment
to learn that the studious and retired youth whom
few had known excepting by name, was brave and
patriotic, and ready to venture his life in the good
cause which they all had so deeply at heart. He
made a few earnest remarks, assuring them of his own
conviction that the time had really come when they
might hope for the recovery of the province to the
Dutch dominion.
Our friends at home, he said, are maintaining a
successful war with the English; let them once know
the defenceless state of this country, and the general
disaffection which prevails toward the existing
government
,
and they will send us the little help which is
necessary to plant the banners of the States on
yonder
fort. I am ready to bear your despatches to the
home government, and to urge attention to them as
best I can; and although I shall probably never
revisit
my native land, its welfare will ever be the
object
of my earnest solicitude. There is peril I know
in my undertaking, but I should be spiritless indeed,
if I were unwilling to encounter danger in such a
cause. Let it be remembered, however, that the
hazard is chiefly that of present detection. Once
safely out of this port, and there is little else to fear.
Be therefore, one and all, silent and discreet, and let
no word or action give rise to suspicion of my errand;
and above all, do not come to the vessel to bid me
farewell, for we have a vigilant foe, and we know not
who are his agents or his spies.
Two hours before, Rudolph had been ignorant of
the existence of the plot which he now so zealously
espoused; but his sudden and warm advocacy of it
should be no matter of surprise. It opened for him a
present field of action, and would be a fitting prelude
to his proposed plan of foreign service. Duty,
patriotism
,
and ambition would under ordinary
circumstances
have rendered it attractive, and the prospect of a
temporary oblivion of his grief was, in his unhappy
state of mind, a more potent inducement still. It need
scarcely be said that peril and hardship have little
terror
for a mind influenced by motives like these.
The venerable Evert had been a most astonished
spectator and participant of this unexpected scene.
My son, he said, have you fully considered the
hazard of this enterprise? do you know that it may
lead to death?
I do, replied Rudolph, solemnly: what great
enterprise was ever accomplished without peril?
But let us not fear; Heaven is ever on the side of the
oppressed, and our masters, who, not content with
wresting this land from its rightful owners, in a time
of peace, have heaped wrongs and indignities upon
us, may yet feel the edge of retribution. You, my
dear sir, above all who are here, have felt the heavy
hand of tyranny, and to you, above others, should
the prospect of enfranchisement be welcome.
And so it is, my dear boy, so it is, said Evert,
drawing the young hero apart, as the conversation
became
general among the confederates; but alas, I
fear there is little to be hoped for from home.
Holland
is fighting against two powerful nations, and is
fearfully divided in her own councils besides. We
cannot shut our eyes to these facts, or expect aid from
a country which may, alas, at this very moment be
conquered and overrun.
We can try, rejoined Rudolph, firmly, we can
try; let us at least keep up good cheer, and not injure
our cause by unnecessary fears. It is natural that
you, who have seen so many hopes blasted, should
learn to despair, but to the young and vigorous, a
different
duty belongs.
Evert grasped the hand of Rudolph, and tears
rained from the old man's eyes as he exclaimed,
Heaven keep thee, my boy, and in better times bring
thee safely back to us again.
Governor Stuyvesant proceeded next to lay before
his friends a brief petition addressed to the government
of the States General, setting forth the defenceless
state of the province, the feasibility of its re-conquest
and its vast importance to the States, and urging their
immediate action, with the promise of general
co-operation
on the part of the Dutch inhabitants. It was
couched in concise and eloquent terms, and met with
general approval; but when the governor called for
pen and ink for the purpose of affixing their signatures
to the document, the cautious Yawpy interposed an
objection. Rudolph might be suspected and arrested,
and the discovery of the paper would be fatal to
them all.
Donner and blitzen, Yawpy, exclaimed the
governor
,
Potstausends! with half a dozen other long
Dutch adjurations, which made the frightened
Poffenburgh
visibly shrink in dimensions;
bring me the
pen and ink!
he concluded in a voice of rage.
One moment, replied Yawpy beseechingly, as he
thought he saw a prospect of relief from utter
annihilation
.
Bring me the pen and ink!
again shouted the
irate old governor, turning his back upon his
discomfited
colleague.
Poffenburgh whispered a moment to old Mr. Van
Schaick, whose silvery hairs and mild voice, as he
addressed their leader, at once mollified his wrath,
and gained attention. It was not for themselves, but
for their cause, he said, that the suggestion had been
made, and he believed it was correct. The death
of a few gray-headed men like themselves, was of but
little consequence, but with their fall would probably
terminate all hope of the great object which they had
in view, the re-conquest of the New Netherlands.
Let the matter be calmly considered. And the
prudent counsel prevailed. Rudolph himself urged it,
as the safest course; he would feel, he said, too great
responsibility if any indiscretion of his could
jeopard
so many valuable lives. He could sufficiently
explain the names and rank and character of the
petitioners
to the government, and their reasons for
withholding
their signatures. He even proposed copying
the memorial himself, lest its detection should prove
fatal to poor Myndert Ten Eyck, in whose well-known
crotchety characters it now appeared. In short,
he said, if I am detected, nothing can avert my fate
7*
but let me at least have the satisfaction of knowing
that I fall alone, the first and only victim to this noble
enterprise. With an animated countenance and lofty
bearing, Rudolph stood in the centre of the apartment,
a young man surrounded by graybeards, eloquent
in word and action, from the force of strong and
natural
feeling. Again they pressed around him, those
venerable patriots, with congratulations and tears,
overwhelmed with admiration and gratitude at his
noble self-devotion. He now became the recipient of
innumerable messages and injunctions, each of which
was to be labelled private and important, and laid
away on some conspicuous shelf of his memory. He
received the petition, and was to copy it carefully,
and destroy the original before going on shipboard.
He received also a plan of the harbor and channel,
with the position of the fort, which had been prepared
with great labor by the considerate governor for the
use of the Dutch fleet, which, in imagination, the
exulting
Hollanders already saw, standing up the bay.
This last named document contained no writing except
a few words and figures printed with a pen, which
could not possibly lead to a discovery of its author.
Thus armed with resources, and feeling like one to
whom a mighty trust is confided, Rudolph bade his
friends an affectionate farewell, and the assembly
dispersed
.
On the next day he was on ship-board, preparing
for his departure. It was a mild, warm day, and he
sat thoughtfully upon the deck, reviewing his singular
position. His excitement had in a degree subsided,
for the hazard was too slight, and his hoped success
too remote to tell forcibly now upon his feelings;
and his thoughts naturally reverted to the same dark
channel in which they had previously flowed. Ah,
what now, he thought, would have been his ecstacy,
if he had been the possessor of Effie's love! How
would he have looked forward with all the ardor of a
youthful imagination, while Fame and Wealth were
thus beckoning him in the distance! How would all
his lofty hopes have been blended with her dear
image, all the glorious future been radiant with her
smiles! He turned sadly from this picture and thought
of the morrow's gloom; for only one day more, and
the warning song of the mariners would be heard as
they raised the heavy sails, or wound the
slow-moving
windlass. The flapping canvass and the creaking
shrouds would sound dismally in his ears, while the
shouted orders, and the prompt response, and all the
busy bustle of departure would be heard. While thus
musing sadly and abstractedly, a familiar voice was
in his ear, and Jed, clad in his hunting habiliments,
stood before him. He had approached unobserved,
in a small boat from the shore, and it was with some
abatement of his usual air of cheerfulness that he
extended
his hand to bid his friend farewell.
So, Ruyou are really going, eh? he said.
Yes, replied Ruruefully enough.
Never to see New York again?
Never! said Groesbeck.
Nor your brothernor uncle Dave?
No!
Nor fathernor me? continued Jed.
No, never, Jed.
Nornor Snapnor the houndsnor
Bucephalus
there? pointing with his riding-whip to his hunter,
tied on the wharf.
No, again answered Rudolph.
NornorEffie, continued Jed at length,
eyeing
his companion closely, but with seeming
carelessness
.
Rudolph turned pale, and despite his most strenuous
efforts at composure, his voice faltered as he replied:
No, my dear fellow, nevernever.
Jed required no further proof of suspicion which
had before nearly amounted to certainty.
You're sure you're doing right, I suppose,
Rudolph
?
he continued, after a pause, and slashing the
deck meanwhile with his whip.
I believe that I am, replied Groesbeck, with
surprise
;
at all events I leave but few behind me who
are interested in my fate.
Rudolph, rejoined Jed, still looking deckward,
and whipping the planks, I have not come to you
with any message or mission, or with the knowledge
of any one: I am, as you see, on my way to the
forest, and yonder, even now, goes old Jake with the
hounds. But I have turned asideRuto bid you
farewell, and to ask you if you are sure, quite sure
Ruthat you are doing right?
There is some hidden meaning in your words, Jed,
replied Rudolph, hurriedly and hoarsely; speak
plainly, quickly, for the love of Heaven!
I will, said Jed; Effie
Yes exclaimed Rudolph.
Effie
Yes, was again the eager response.
I cannot tell you, Ru: she would die, if she
thought I had spoken to youshe has never said or
hinted a word to mebut I can
see
, Rudolph, and I
fear you are laboring under some dreadful mistake;
and Jed slashed the poor deck more unmercifully
than ever.
Does she care aught for me? asked Groesbeck,
quickly, and seizing the hand of his companion with
the grasp of a vice; does she not love Egbert
expect
hope
for his return?
That she never loved Egbertthat she loathes
him nowthat she does not expect or desire his
return
that
the wealth of worlds could not induce her
to smile upon himall this I
know
, replied Jed;
that she cares for you, Rudolph, it is hardly proper
for me to say; but she used to be happy in your
presence
,
and now she isbut I have said enough,
Rutoo much perhaps, sogood bye.
Wait a minute, exclaimed Groesbeck, starting
in three several directions in a breath, and each time
coming back to the same spot; wait a minute,
Jed;halloo there, you, Jack! Jim! Joe! calling
down below and summoning to the gangway the
apparition
of a woolly-headed waiter, with a very
frightened aspect; I'm going on shore, Bill, he said;
take care of my boxes there you knowcome
along, Jedand halloo theredon't sail, you know, till
I come back.
The white eyes of the negro expanded over the
sable disc of his face like the passing off of an eclipse;
Golly, massa, he said,
I
can't stop her.
Oh, very true, Sam, said Rudolph, whose
thoughts, revolving in a whirl of excitement, were
fairly jumbled together; very true, he said, for at
that moment he caught a glimpse of three distinct
ideas as they flitted bythe first of which was that
the negro was not the captain; the second, that the
vessel would not wait three seconds for him in any
event; and the third, that she was not to sail until the
next day, and that he would therefore have ample
time to get back before her departure, without the
aid of seven-league boots. So come along, Jed, he
exclaimed once more, and the friends departed
together
.
The events which immediately ensued scarcely
require to be narrated. Jed did not accompany his
friend to his father's home, and Effie, while walking in
the garden,
It's fairest flowers eclipsed by her,
beheld Rudolph approaching, and anticipated with
dread another painful interview. But there was a
new strange look on his flushed features, and he called
her Effie. The Terror was lying within their
view, and, at Rudolph's instance, they strolled toward
the river that they might see it the more plainly.
There stood the latticed arbor, and loitering,
embarrassedly
,
half within it, to adjust a fallen vine, Effie's
little hand has been taken gently captive, and pressed
to burning lips, and warm and fervent words of love,
of pure and holy love, are murmured in her ear. The
whole story of his alternating hopes and fears, of his
single-hearted and truthful affection, has been told,
and repeated, but has not been answered. No word
has spoken approval, and no look has betokened it
but the little hand is unwithdrawn, and the half averted
face, and the drooping lids, and the one trembling tear
are more eloquent than words. There are scenes and
sentiments which should be left undesecrated by pen
or pencil, and which only the Daguerrean power of
the Imagination can portray. Smile ye who will, but
pure and passionless affection is no chimera of the
mind. The fountain in the desertthe flower on the
heatha star in the clouded sky; these are its images,
and its types, as far as mortal objects can adumbrate
immortality. But let it rather be compared to those
brilliant constellations of the northern sky, which,
never sinking beneath the horizon, disappear from
view only when lost in the brighter effulgence of
Heaven.
CHAPTER XV.
On
that memorable evening when the conclave at
Governor Stuyvesant's was in session, a single
horseman
,
casually passing the house, had his attention
arrested by the singular appearance of the light
bursting through the chinks and crannies of the
closed blinds, in the room which all New York knew
to be the governor's best parlor. The equestrian
gazed a little while, wonderingly, and was about to
pass on, when the dismissed party came pouring out
of the front doorway, uttering many a loud good
night to their host, who, candle in hand, watched
them down the lawn. It was a dark evening, lighted
faintly by the stars, and there were shadowy spots on
the way-side, beneath overhanging trees, which were
darker still. Into one of these the rider reined his
horse, and, unobserved, awaited the approach of the
party. Their nodding heads and whispering voices
and vehement gestures conveyed no other idea to the
listener than the addition of some new ghost to the
spirit-family of the island, whose advent was the
subject
of comment, and whose assaults were to be
avoided
by clustering closely together. But the frequent
mention of Rudolph's name, and the appearance of
one slight and erect form, towering above the bended
figures of his companions, excited no little surprise.
A party of old Dutch gentlemen at the governor's
was no unusual occurrence, but what was young
Groesbeck doing in such an assemblage? Thus
wondering, though only with the curiosity of an idle
mind, and attaching no importance to the occurrence,
the horseman waited until the party had passed, and
then resumed his way. It has been said that there
was starlight only, and that of the faintest kind, but
feeble as were the celestial rays, they would have
revealed to the most careless observer, in the
proportions
of the rider, in his position and motions, and in
the general
Benhadadity
of his air, the person of the
junior Sharp. But Benhadad was not Hiram, or no
bubble had been too frail, no brushed cobweb too
evanescent, to emblem the brilliant scheme on which
so many hopes were hung.
Yet when on the second ensuing day, mingling with
the crowd who thronged to see the departure of the
Terror, Sharp heard for the first time that Rudolph
was on board, a passenger to England, a slow, dull,
tedious process of ratiocination began to take place
in his brain, confusedly connecting the event with the
circumstances of which he had so lately been a
witness
.
At times he seemed to catch the glimpse of an
idea beyond the isolated facts, and to wonder whether
there was not something strange in it, and then, with
much chuckling at his sagacity, he resolved to
mention
the matter to Governor Lovelacethe very first
time that he should meet that officer. In the mean
time many anxious hearts were watching the
embarkation
.
From the long Dutch stoop of Evert
Knickerbocker; from the terrace of Anthony Ten
Broeck; from the distant windows of the Van
Schaicks and Van Tassels, the Van Bummels and
Van Pelts, old heads and spectacled eyes were
peering
;
and whispering voices asked, and whispered
words replied that all seemed safe and quiet yet.
They had regarded Rudolph's prudent injunctions in
remaining at home, but painful indeed was their
suspense
.
Rudolph himself was not free from fear. His
new hopes, the bliss which had so suddenly deluged
his heart, had increased by a thousand fold his value
of life; and the perils which he had held so lightly
before, seemed now of no trivial magnitude. It was
not now as an exile that he was about to quit his
native shores, but as a patriot, bound on a lofty
mission
,
and looking forward to a speedy return and a
happy reunion with the friends whom he left behind.
Not that he shrunk from encountering peril, or would
have abated aught from the glorious enterprise to
which he had pledged his exertions: but it was with
a fast beating heart that he watched the slow
processes
of raising the heavy anchors, and setting the
ample sails. The musical chorus of the sailors, as they
bent cheerily to their tasks, became harsh and
discordant
sounds to his excited nerves, and his suspense
was increased by his inability to judge of the point of
progress attained in these mysterious operations.
Benhadad continued an interested spectator of the
scene, and as the affair of Rudolph continued to occur
at intervals to his mind, he looked around for some
one to whom he might mention his thoughts. But
seeing no one in the undistinguished throng around
him, worthy of his confidence, he again wrapped
himself in his dignity, in which very comfortable
envelope he bade fair to remain inclosed, until after
the departure of the vessel. Now it so happened
that Mr. Lieutenant Flash, who had been necessarily
delayed on shore, was approaching at this late hour
to take boat for the ship. Benhadad bade him
farewell
as he passed, and swelling with suppressed
dignity
,
motioned to him for a moment's delay, for so loyal
an officer, he thought, would of course be glad to hear
any suspicions against anybody. Flash did not at
first recognize him, but after a moment's pause
Ohah, he said, Mraathe man that lost
his fathergood byewe'll keep a sharp look-out for
the Zephyr, and may take her yet; keep up good
heart; good bye.
Yes, thank you, said Benhadad; but I was
going to observe, laying his hand on the lieutenant's
shoulder, and lowering his voice, that Mr. Rudolph
Groesbeck
Oh, I know it, said Flash; he goes out as
passenger
fine
fellowgood bye.
Yes, sirbut he is
On board alreadyof coursecertainly, good
bye; and before Benhadad could reply, the
lieutenant
was in his boat, and his sashed and sworded little
figure, standing erect as a mast, was gliding shipward
as fast as two brawny oarsmen could propel him.
The Zephyr had not slipped through Mr. Flash's
fingers more effectually than that gentleman slipped
through the fingers of Mr. Sharp, who, angered and
abashed at such disrespectful treatment, once more
looked around for some one to whom his intelligence
might prove acceptable.
But the anchor is well nigh inthe sails are nearly
setthe last boat is hoisted up, and swings, dangling,
like a toy, at the vessel's side, and noble hearts beat
freer, and aching eyes grow less vigilant in the
distance
.
Ah, Sharp, my dear friend, how are you? said a
mild bland voice in Benhadad's ear: a fine vessel,
isn't she? I understand our ruralizing, botanizing,
contemplative, poetical friend, young Groesbeck, goes
outeh? where the deuce is he going to?
See here, Captain Sinclair! exclaimed Benhadad,
now burning with his pent secret; and drawing his
companion aside, he whispered earnestly for some
moments in his ear, during which period the captain's
countenance underwent some singular changes. I
dare say, concluded the informant, there's nothing in
it, of course, you knowbut thenit's queer, isn't it?
Blinds closedall DutchmenRudolph the only
young man presentand he now starting off
mysteriously
in the Terrorwar raging between Holland and
England, repeated Sinclair, touching at once on
the prominent points; why, here is no
suspicion
, man;
here is
certainty!
and before Benhadad could reply
his companion had vanished with a celerity equal to
that of Flash, but in quite a different direction.
It's strange what a confounded hurry they're all
in, muttered Benhadad as he again gave himself up
to a contemplation of the majestic vessel, which now
came gracefully around, and with distended sails, stood
gallantly down the bay.
Then came the flash, the smoke, the loud
reverberation
of the parting salute, the prompt response from
the fort, the merry cheers, and waving hats, and signs
of last adieu. Steadily onward, slowly at first, but
more briskly soon, she passes on her way, leaving
town and fort behind; and the banners of St. George
are fluttering at her peak, and the merry troll of the
mariners comes more faintly to the ear, and long deep
breaths are drawn by fervent hearts on shore, and
hopes are growing brighter, and grateful tears are
shed.
Many minutes elapsed, but the gaping crowd did
not disperse. Some new commotion has arrested the
general gaze. Messengers were seen passing rapidly
to and from the government house; signals were
flying from the fort; the governor himself,
accompanied
by Captain Sinclair, made his appearance, and
walked hastily to the Battery, and strange whisperings
of unintelligible events prevailed. Presently the
guns of the fort were fired in quick succession, and
after considerable delay, a sail-boat, darting out into
the stream, went racing down the bay, in the wake
of the Terror. A hundred hearts stood still, but
onward
went the ship. In vain did the echoing cannon
continue to thunder from the fort: they were
regarded
only as repetitions of the parting salute, and as
such were from time to time replied to by the guns of
the vessel. The signals were either not seen, or not
understood, and all the alternating hopes and fears of
the spectators soon centred upon the relative speed of
the messenger boat and its leviathan chase. Had the
wind been fresh, the ship with its towering cloud of
canvass would doubtless soon have passed from view,
but the breeze, while strong enough to give the
feathery little bark a rapid headway, told of course
less effectually upon its bulky competitor. Yet the
difference of speed was too slight to admit of making
any certain calculations upon the result. A stern
chase is proverbially a long one, and the waterman
who guided the little craft had been despatched in
the hurry of the hour, unprovided with the means of
making any conspicuous signals.
Rudolph stood meanwhile upon the quarter-deck of
the Terror, a prey to the most harrowing anxiety.
With a sagacity sharpened by the danger which
surrounded
him, he had at once conjectured the cause of
the commotion on shore, and he watched with fearful
interest the progress of the pursuing boat. His first
impulse was to destroy the papers which might prove
such fearful evidence against him, but their
importance
to the success of his mission was such that he
resolved to defer their destruction until more certain
of its necessity. He thought that his fears might
magnify the danger; that the pursuit might be for
some other object, and that at all events, there would
be abundant opportunity for such a purpose before
any one authorized either to arrest or examine him
could board the vessel, for the present pursuer was
clearly enough no officer of justice. Concealing his
trepidation as best he could, he awaited the course of
events, and to avoid directing attention to the
sail-boat
,
was obliged to content himself with only
occasional
and furtive glances in that direction.
Lieutenant
Flash joined him and rallied him upon his low
spirits: Just so myself, he said, the first time I
went to seaall right, siryou'll be sea-sick
by-and-by
,
and then you'll feel better; but halloo! what's
this? he continued, as looking off toward the
harbor
,
through his sea-glass, he caught sight of the sail
in their wake; why, Groesbeck, she's chasing us,
making signals, and all that; she is, indeed, there
must be something wrong; and the lieutenant was
about to transmit the intelligence to the Captain,
when he felt the hand of Rudolph upon his shoulder,
and turning around, saw the pale face of his
companion
looking earnestly at him.
Mr. Flash, he said, do you believe me to be
guilty of any crime deserving of death?
You! crime! death!
replied Flash rapidly;
why, no sir, of course not. I know better.
Look this way then, said Rudolph, whisperingly;
I cannot tell you now what I mean; but do not look
at that boat; do not point your glass toward her
for it is probable that my life depends upon her not
overtaking us.
8
Whatwhatwhat? said Flash hastily, and
laying down his glass; is it so? and turning from
Rudolph, he issued a succession of rapid orders
which were as rapidly obeyed by the sailors, and
another snowy sail capped the pyramidal canvass
that rose above the decks of the Terror. The
Captain and First are at dinner yet, he said,
turning
again to Rudolph, and will be, for the next
half hour. There is no one else to fear; in twenty
minutes we'll be outside of the Hook; so never fear,
my good sir, never fear.
Rudolph grasped the hand of his companion, and
thanked him with such voice as his choked utterance
would permit.
No, no, never mind, said Flash; I know you
didn't do it, no matter what it wasconfound the
bailiffs, and all that; now we go, sirisn't that a
dashing speed?
And onward sped the Terror, rising and sinking to
the long, heavy swell which proclaimed the open sea
to be close at hand. Ten minutes elapsed, and the
ocean gate, widening to their nearer view, revealed
the white crested waves beyond, chasing each other
like snowy coursers on the race.
She'll scarcely venture outside in such a sea as
that, said Flash; courage, my friend. Ah, if it
would only blow great guns now, there wouldn't be
a speck of danger; I think it
does
come a little
fresherfeeling the air with his hand; and thus the
good-natured Lieutenant ran on, attempting to
encourage
his companion, but delicately abstaining from
any inquiries into the particular cause of his alarm.
He knew enough, however, of the hostility of the
Dutch inhabitants of New York to the existing
government
,
to suspect that Groesbeck's offence, if any,
was of a political character, and if so, there were
obvious reasons just at that moment why the
Lieutenant
should prefer to remain uninformed of it. A
brief acquaintance with Rudolph on shore had
convinced
him that the latter could not be justly
chargeable
with the obloquy of any personal crime.
She gains on us a little, I think, said Rudolph,
casting a hasty glance behind.
Never mind, replied Flash; here we are in the
very portals of the seashe'll vanish here, like a
ghost at the church-yard; and onward rushed the
ship, with a momentarily increasing motionher
speed being now rendered more apparent, by the
rapidly shifting objects on the adjacent land. The
very sound of the breakers on the nearest shore, came
distinctly to the ear, and the sparkling waves could
be seen chasing each other sportively up the beach.
A few minutes more, and the shores were rapidly
receding, and a boundless waste of waters was
opening
to the view.
Good byegood bye, my little friend, exclaimed
Flash exultingly; unless you see fit to cross the
Atlantic with us, in which case you had better
Mr. Flash! exclaimed a startling voice from the
cabin gangway,
yonder is a small boat following us
and making signals; slacken sail a little, and let her
come up
.
It was the voice of fate, and could not be
gainsayed
.
The vanishing head of Captain Grim was
just seen as he again disappeared in the cabin, and
the Lieutenant, directing a deprecatory glance
toward
Rudolph, issued the necessary orders, and in
three minutes the boat was alongside. Rudolph's
heart sank within him, but summoning his resolution,
he awaited the
dnouement
with such composure as
he could command. He still indulged the hope that
his apprehensions had been needlessly excited, and
that the errand of the boat had no reference to
himself
.
How, indeed, could his secret have transpired
at the very moment of his departure? Surely his
excitement and anxiety had conjured up a phantom
of danger where none in reality existed. He would
not yet destroy his papers, which were carefully
concealed
within the lining of one of his travelling boxes,
for there could be no lack of opportunity for that
purpose, if it became necessary to accomplish it.
Alas! he had little calculated on the cruel sagacity of
his foes. The sail-boat came alongside, and a sealed
note for Captain Grim was passed into the ship.
The surprised air with which he perused ithis
glance at Rudolph, and his instantaneous orders for a
return to port, left little room for hope; but when, a
few minutes subsequently, Rudolph attempted to pass
below, and found himself interdicted, he at length
knew the worst.
Mr. Groesbeck will excuse me, said Captain Grim,
for requesting him to remain where he now is, until
we return to port; some suspicions, groundless I
hope, are entertained, and I am requested to forbid
you access to your luggage, until it can be searched
by an officer of justice.
The request was of course a command, and
Rudolph
,
whose native courage and fortitude now came
to his aid, quietly acquiesced. He soon became
conscious
even that he was closely watched to prevent
the destruction of any papers which he might have
about his person.
The sad details of events immediately ensuing,
need scarcely be related. Let it suffice to know that
when, a few hours subsequently, the spreading sails
of the Terror once more faded to a cloud within the
distant Narrows, Rudolph Groesbeck was not upon
her decks. Guarded, manacled, the tenant of a felon's
cell, he awaited a speedy trial for the crime of High
Treason against the majesty of Charles the Second.
CHAPTER XVI.
Avalanche like
, in its force and impetuosity, had
been the descent of this dreadful calamity; and if
anything could add aggravation to the blow, it was a
contemplation of the contemptible means by which it
had been effected. The mountain had been
undermined
by a mouse. The discomfited confederates
needed no summons to bring them together on the
evening of that memorable day; one by one, as the
shadows of twilight deepened, did they wend their
lonely way to the distant Bowery, hoping to gain from
their leader the encouragement which their own
hearts failed to afford. But all regret for their
vanished
hopes of conquest were lost sight of for the
present, in view of the appalling fate which impended
over their young and chivalrous ally. There was no
view of the affair which presented any semblance of
hope in his behalf. He was in the hands of a
rigorous
government, bound by the principle of
self-preservation
to suppress every form of insurrection, and
to crush each embryo bud of treason. They knew
that even a mild and moderate government might
plausibly have punished Rudolph's offence with death,
and that from the despotic tribunal of Lovelace no
leniency in such a case could be expected. Some
fears for their own safety mingled with these
apprehensions
,
and altogether it was a gloomy congress
which convened on that dismal evening at the house
of Governor Stuyvesant. Yawpy Poffenburgh was
not present. From the moment of hearing of the
arrest of Rudolph, he had kept cautiously within his
own domains, and whoever passed his premises saw
Yawpy assiduously at work in his garden, seemingly
as innocent of all state intrigues, as any one of the
future cabbage-heads, which now, in the shape of
infantile plants, stood in interminable rows across the
lot.
Governor Stuyvesant growled like a chained lion,
but he indulged in no idle vaunts. A blank despair,
indeed, pervaded the whole council, and while many
schemes for relief were revolved, each was in turn
abandoned as utterly hopeless. It was resolved,
however
,
that immediate measures should be taken to learn
the designs of the government, and if any fair trial was
to be allowed to the accused, no pains were to be
spared in furnishing him with skilful counsel, and such
other aid as might be practicable. Having
designated
a few of their number to obtain the earliest
possible
information on the subject, the assembly dispersed
to meet again on the ensuing evening, unless some
exigency should call them sooner together.
There was no one who said less, or endured more
on this trying occasion, than Mr. Knickerbocker.
He felt as if all Rudolph's sufferings were in some
way traceable to himself, and it seemed as if the
impending
tragedy was to be the crowning calamity of
his life. Gigantic, colossal, and overshadowing as
the mountain of his troubles had before appeared, it
seemed that this remaining one was to cap the
fearful
climax, and impart a dreadful symmetry to the
pile. Hope deserted his breast, and even Faith
staggered
at the blow; for the heavens seemed of brass
above him, impenetrable by prayer, and echoing
dismally
back the voice of his supplications. That he
passed a weary night, finding sleep without repose
and dreams more fatiguing than toil, need scarcely
be said. On the ensuing morning, he was early
abroad, seeking to glean such information as he could
find upon the subject which now engrossed his whole
attention. His steps were naturally directed toward
the jail in which Rudolph was confined, which stood
closely adjoining the fort, and fronting toward the
Hudson river at a point very near the southern
extremity
of the city. Near to that gloomy tenement he
saw, sauntering, one of those grim officials of the
law, who execute its most odious and repulsive
decrees
without even the show of reluctance. Hiding
a cruel and sanguinary disposition under the guise of
devotion to his official duty, Hugh Gore, at once the
jailer and executioner of the city, added, by the
natural
ferocity of his look and manner, increased
intensity
to every punishment which he inflicted. In vain
did the prisoner, newly arrested, look into his face for
some gleam of encouragement or sympathy. The
very act of turning the prison bolts was performed
with an emphasis which betokened a relish of the
welcome sound; and if the victim was one, the
accusation
against whom was of a capital nature, he would
be sure to be favored by Hugh with a cell which
commanded a full view of the permanent gallows,
scarcely less lofty than that of Haman, which, to the
disgrace of the infant city, then formed one of its
prominent features.
To this ogre, the timid and child-like Evert applied
courteously for information as to the situation of his
young friend, and the nature of the charges against
him.
Charges? said Hugh, sardonicallyoh, nothing,
I believe, more than high treason, and some such little
8*
matters; 'tisn't anything, you know, to invite the king's
enemies into the country, and offer to help them
overturn
the governmentthat ain't anything, is it, old
fellow
?
When is he to be tried? rejoined Evert, with
difficulty suppressing his emotion.
There are older heads than his in this business,
replied Hugh, not heeding the question, if we can only
get at them; some fine estates to be confiscated, too.
You
don't know anything about it though, I dare say,
and then some folks's estates are out of all danger of
confiscationha! ha! ha!you can't get two skins
off one catho! ho! ho!and an echoing laugh
from within told that Hugh was not talking for his
own edification alone.
Can you tell me when Mr. Groesbeck is to be
tried? repeated Evert mildly, and still repressing all
signs of indignation at the brutality of his companion.
Tried, quotha? returned Hugh; tried? no, not
exactly; but there is a man, pointing across the
street, toward a shop of miscellaneous cabinet-ware,
there's a man in that shop, who can tell you
something
about it, I reckon; and so saying, Hugh retired
within doors, whence still the jeering laugh came
back to Evert's ears.
The old man directed his steps slowly across the
road to the place which had been designated by his
informant, and in the simplicity of his heart, applied
with the same inquiry to a workman whom he found
busily engaged within.
Rudolph Groesbeck? when is he to be tried, do
you ask? said the carpenter respectfully, pausing
meanwhile from his work, and leaning on the end of
his plane.
Yes, sir, returned Mr. Knickerbocker, glad that
he seemed like to meet with no further insults; the
jailer told me he thought you could inform me when
his trial would take place.
The man looked curiously and sympathizingly into
old Evert's anxious face, and then gave a quick
furtive
glance toward the opposite side of his shop, as
he replied: I don't know exactly when he's to be
triedpretty soon, I should reckon
that's for him;
and Evert's eyes, following the direction pointed out
by his companion, fell upon a newly made and
freshly stained coffin.
Leaning, clinging to the lintel of the doorway,
pale, trembling, gasping, Mr. Knickerbocker in vain
essayed for some moments to speak.
For him? he said at length; for
Rudolph
Groesbeck?
it is impossible; by whose orders has this
been done?
Oh, Hugh sees to all these things; he ordered it.
I guess it's all right, sirhe don't often make a
mistake
about such matters.
The hard-hearted scoundrelthe fiend!
exclaimed
the old man.
No, no, said the carpenter, I wouldn't call hard
namesit ain't always safe. He gives me a good
many jobs, Hugh does, but he is rather hasty, I think
myself, at times; he sometimes measures his men for
these things as soon as he gets 'em inside, sir. When
you've got a thing to do, then do it, and don't be
puttin' off things, that's Hugh's maxim.
But Rudolph has not been convicted or even tried
yet,much less sentenced to death.
Wal, praps not; I don't know much about these
things, but that won't take long, I reckon. I hearn
something said about a court to be held this
afternoon
at the Stadt-Huys, as soon as the races are
overmay be that's it; and the workman resumed
his labors with a rapidity which manifested a
disposition
at once to put an end to the colloquy, and to make
amends for the time which had already been
consumed
upon it.
With a heavy heart and tottering steps did Evert
return to his house, where for a while he yielded to
the most bitter and hopeless despair. To Jed, who
was equally appalled at his friend's danger, and ready
to do anything in his behalf, he at once imparted the
alarming facts which he had learned, and entreated
him to hasten to Governor Stuyvesant with the
intelligence
.
Tell him, he said, that if anything can be done,
it must be immediately; to-morrow may be too late.
Jed hastened to execute his mission, tarrying only
to enjoin upon his father that he should withhold from
Effie all knowledge of these dreadful facts, for she
was entirely ignorant of the impending calamity.
She knew nothing even of Rudolph's arrest, and her
heart continued glad, as watching the favoring skies
she anticipated his prosperous voyage, and safe return.
Stuyvesant received Jed's information with but
little
surprise. Yes, yes, he said, they'll murder the
poor fellow of course, and we have got to sit still and
look tamely on; but go, and learn with certainty the
time and place of his trial; we will at least behold
the mockery, and do all for him that we can.
But the necessity for haste did not prove to be as
great as had been anticipated. The executioner's
cruel orders had been altogether gratuitous, and were
entirely unknown to Governor Lovelace. The latter
indeed could not be chargeable with a sanguinary
disposition
,
yet in the ever rigorous discharge of his
official trust, clemency was not to be looked for at his
hands. His very hostility to the Dutch inhabitants
had resulted more from a knowledge of their
disloyalty
to the existing powers than from any personal
ill-will
toward them. Faithful to his own master, he
was still not capable of giving them credit for fidelity
to the States, nor mindful of the steps of doubtful
equity by which the latter had been divorced from
their long cherished colonies.
The principal judicial tribunal which existed at this
time in the province was called the Court of Assize,
and was composed of the governor himself and two
or three justices of the peace. Although created by
no legislative enactment, but organized by Lovelace
in pursuance of the plenary powers with which he
was invested, it possessed perhaps sufficient authority
to arraign and try the accused. But desirous to attach
more weight to the affair, and to imitate in some
respect the formula of state trials in England, the
governor issued a special commission of oyer and
terminer
for this purpose to one Sir Thomas Colton and
two justices of the peace, and an interval of six days
was allowed to elapse previous to the trial. Rudolph
was also informed that he would be allowed the
benefit
of counsel, and that if he had any witnesses in
his behalf they should be heard. There was
something
however in all this ceremony which seemed
like a mere show of clemency, where the substance
was wanting. It seemed indeed to Rudolph's
despairing
mind a sort of challenge and defiance, as if he
had been told that he should have every opportunity
of defence for the very purpose of demonstrating the
hopeless certainty of his guilt, and the justice of his
coming condemnation.
It would be painful and unnecessary to dwell upon
the interval of suspense which intervened prior to the
sitting of the court, or to depict the sad details of the
trial. Rudolph's deportment was dignified and calm,
but there was an expression of anguish at times upon
his face, which spoke of suffering beyond any that the
fear of death had power to inflict. His own suddenly
blasted hopes, the pain and degradation of an
ignominious
execution, were scarcely present to his mind; but
who shall tell the agony of his soul as he contemplated
the impending misery of her, who, still unconscious of
his danger, was yet to meet the full shock of so
overwhelming
a grief. Every effort was made in his
behalf
,
but all was in vain. The proof admitted of no
denial. The papers which had been found in his
possession
told the whole story of his culpability; and
the fact of their careful concealment among his
luggage
gave confirmation to the proof. The eloquent
petition, the accurate plan of the harbor and channel,
the private letters of Mr. Knickerbocker, which,
although
containing no allusion to political subjects,
showed the intended destination of their bearer, were
all produced and commented on, carrying conviction
to the minds of the hearers. Rudolph in short was
found guilty, and, when asked, with the usual formula
of the law, whether he had anything to say why
sentence
should not be pronounced against him, he
remained silent. Not even when demanded a second
time did he essay to reply, until, answering rather the
appealing looks of his friends than the voice of the
judge, he briefly addressed the court. If aught,
he saidif aught that I can allege could serve to
avert or palliate a doom which I dread less for myself
than others, I might indeed say something against my
impending sentence. I might speak of political
wrongs sought to be righted; of duty which is counted
crime, and patriotism stigmatized as treason; but I
could neither deny my acts, nor repudiate the
principles
which prompted them. I know that I must die
ignominiouslyon the scaffold,his voice faltered
as he spokebut I die a martyr, and not a criminal.
He sat down, and a shudder ran through the
audience
as the presiding judge, with the judicial ceremony
of the age, assumed the black cap which betokened
the sentence of death. With dignified composure,
yet not without feeling, was his official duty
discharged
.
He spoke of the imperative obligation
incumbent
upon ministers of justice to punish those crimes
which aimed at the subversion of government, and
remarked upon the peculiar situation of the province,
endangered by enemies from abroad, and by
disaffection
at home, as a reason for the most rigid
enforcement
of the law. He then proceeded to sentence the
prisoner, fixing the second ensuing day for his
execution
,
and warning him not to indulge the faintest
hope of pardon or reprieve. The court then
adjourned
,
and Rudolph, in the clutch of the gratified Hugh,
was remanded to his cell. What bitter tears were
shed, what noble hearts were wrung, how voiceless
with grief his faithful friends crowded around him,
seeking vainly to give some word of cheer, need not
be related. Petition and remonstrance were all in
vain: the governor remained inexorable, and even
hinted at further prosecutions if the least additional
provocation were given.
If there was one of Rudolph's friends who now
suffered more than the rest, it was Jed; on whom
plainly devolved a task scarcely less dreadful than
that of suffering side by side with his friend; for
from his lips must Effie receive the appalling tidings
which should prepare her once more to meet Rudolph,
and then to part with him for ever.
CHAPTER XVII.
The
city jail, as has been described, stood near the
fort, and fronting toward the Hudson, at a point near
the confluence of that stream with the East river.
A little to the north, on the same street, was the
governor's
house, a large but in no way ostentatious
building, and immediately adjacent, but fronting in
another direction, was the old Dutch Church. A
narrow
court-yard intervened between the jail and the
street, and a long stoop, the invariable accompaniment
of Dutch buildings, extended the whole width of the
house. Upon this stoop, on the evening which
succeeded
to that melancholy day, the events of which
have just been related, sat Hugh Gore, wrapt in no
unpleasing contemplations. The sun had gone down;
the lingering twilight was growing gradually less;
and the light sea-breeze, setting landward, was lifting
the shaggy locks of the jailer, as gently as if they
had been the curls of cradled innocence. Musing
deeply and alone, and watching with complacent
countenance the thin wreaths which curled slowly
upwards from his pipe, he was aroused from his
reverie
by the heavy tread of some one passing in the
street. On looking up, he saw a man clad in a thin
spencer and wide-legged trowsers, and wearing the
glazed tarpaulin which then as now was a distinctive
badge of the fraternity of sailors. He had passed
Hugh apparently without noticing him, but turning
suddenly back, and exhibiting by the movement the
neck of a glass bottle protruding from his outer pocket,
he touched his hat civilly and inquired the way to a
well-known dram-shop in the neighborhood.
Huyck's? said Hugh, good-naturedly; why, you
must be a stranger here if you don't know where
Huycks' is, and you a sailor, too!
I am, replied the other, again touching his hat,
and have just come from Boston in the Dolly
yonder
she lies, with the blue bunting. Will your honor
please to tell me
Oh yes, said Hugh, giving the desired direction
but don't go and spend all your money like a fool.
The sailor smiled, and thanking his informant
passed on, and Gore, wrapt in his peculiar reflections,
had quite forgotten the incident when, some ten
minutes
afterwards, it was recalled to his mind by a
return of the stranger. He seemed now slightly
affected by the atmosphere of Mynheer Huyck's
tap-room
,
and disposed to be social and communicative;
and, after bandying merry phrases with Hugh for a
few minutes, he produced his bottle and invited his
companion to drink. The jailer sniffed daintily at the
cork, prepared to utter a sneer at the vile whiskey,
or at some compound still viler, though bearing a
more ambitious name, when he became conscious that
his olfactories were regaled with the fumes of a liquor,
rare and costly at that period in the province, and
highly prized by the epicurean race.
The de'il, he exclaimed, applying his huge nose
again and again to the mouth of the bottle; is it
possible that Huyck sells genuine Jamaica, and that
sailors buy it? Walk up, Mr. Jack Tar, walk up,
and take a seat, while I get some cups, and we'll have
a taste of its quality.
The sailor needed no second bidding, and taking a
seat on the stoop, awaited the return of the other
from within, who soon made his appearance with some
drinking utensils, and then led the way to a part of
the piazza less exposed to view from the street, for he
was in no way desirous of attracting any additional
guests to so rare a banquet. Smacking his lips over
his cup, he needed but little urging to renew again and
again the delicious potation. The sailor was
exceedingly
merry, and had many a jovial tale to tell,
which, whatever their real merits, grew more and
more amusing to his auditor; who finally swore, upon
the winding up of a long story about crossing the line,
and being shaved by father Neptune with an iron
hoop, that his particular friend Mr. Jack Tar was the
very pink of sailors, and he really hoped, upon his
soul and body, that he never should be called upon to
do any little unpleasant jobs in the way of stringing
up or cutting down so choice a fellow.
Stringing up and cutting down, repeated the
sailor, who despite his seemingly large draughts
preserved
a tolerable appearance of sobrietywhat do
you mean by that, Mr. Gore?
I mean, replied Hugh, with an involuntary
twinkle of his eye, that I am grand Bashaw here,
with nine tailsthere they hang, up there, pointing
to a huge instrument of flagellation, reposing above
their headsand also, that I tend that guide-post to
the Future State out there, pointing to the gallows,
which in the gloom of the evening loomed up to an
unusual altitude before them.
Hugh did not notice the shudder which shook for
a moment the frame of his companion, any more than
he had noticed the dozen discarded draughts which
the other had slyly spilled into the garden, over the
railing against which his chair was leaning.
Oh, ho, you are the executioner then? returned
the sailor; probably you run up that Growsbeck
then, that was hung the other day, for treason.
No, sir, replied Gore with a chuckle;he hain't
been hung yet, Mr. Groesbeck hain't: I expect the
melancholy pleasure of turning him off the day after
to-morrow, at nine o'clock, and shall be very happy
of your presence on that occasiona large company
expectedfront seats reserved for the ladies; and
Hugh laughed at his hideous joke.
He's a desperate hard case, I suppose; I should
like wonderfully to see himyou don't know where
they keep him, I suppose?
Don't know? returned Hugh; maybe I don'tif
I don't know, who does?that's it. See here, my
salt-water
friend, do you see them winders there, with
fancy lattice work across them? well, that's the jail,
and in there's the onfortinet man; and in here,
striking his gingling pocket with his handin here
are the keys that keep him there.
Mr. Gore's guest expressed no little surprise at
these pieces of information, and reiterating his desire
to see so awful a criminal, Hugh at length volunteered
to gratify his wishes and conduct him within. The
jailor's step as he rose for this purpose was by no
means steady, and Jed, for he, as may have been
conjectured
,
was the assumed sailor, seemed to be equally
under the effects of the bottle.
It was no easy matter for the inebriated man to
apply
his ponderous key, and open the prison door, but
after much fumbling and muttering that difficult feat
was accomplished, and the door being left slightly
ajar, the companions passed in. There was a
principal
central room, which was usually occupied by
offenders of the lesser grades, and off this apartment
were several cells designed for such malefactors as
needed especial guarding. But as Gore had at this
time no other persons under his charge, and Rudolph's
appearance had excited no apprehensions of any very
desperate attempt at escape, he had allowed the
prisoner
the benefit of the larger room; not however
without the precaution of chaining him by one foot to
a ring in the floor. This chain was secured by a
padlock, the key to which Hugh also carried in his
pocket.
There he isthere he is, exclaimed Gore,
speaking thickly, for the liquor was taking effect more
fully upon his brain; look at him quick, Mr. Tar,
and then let's go back, for there'll be some one else
here to see him soon, I dare say, but nobody's to come
in to-night without the governor's orders, except
Dominie Megapolensis.
So saying, the jailer took a seat near the door,
while Jed approached his friend, who was sitting on
a rude wooden chair, with his face turned to the wall,
and with his head resting upon his hands. There was
a dim light in the room, left rather by the stinted
grace of the keeper than as a matter of right.
See what luxuries he has, muttered Hugh, with
his chin dropping upon his breastlights and a seat,
and a large room all to himself'tisn't everybody gets
such treatment, and he wouldn't, you know, only his
time is short.
The prisoner had turned partly around upon the
entrance of the visiters, but after a momentary glance
at them quietly resumed his former position. Jed
approached him slowly, talking meanwhile to the
keeper in his assumed manner, but as he came nearer
he contrived, parenthetically, to pronounce Rudolph's
name in his natural voice, and in a low tone. A quick
nervous motion of the prisoner ensued; he raised
his head slightly, and was about to speak, when his
friend's fingers rested upon his lips, and he remained
silent. But from that moment every faculty was alive.
You've got him chained, eh? said Jed; that's
rightI see you know how to make sure of such
fellows; bolts, bars and chainsyou understand it,
don't you, Mr. Gore?
Of course I do, growled Hugh.
And yet you are merciful too, considering, said
Jed.
Certainly, said Goresee that chair, and
candleandandcup of water.
Yes, certainly; but now it's my opinion, Mr.
Jailer
,
that that chain is a little too tight, and that it
hurts the poor fellow's ankle: you don't want to keep
him in pain, I know; I'd jest shift it to t'other leg,
a ndmake it a trifle looser.
There is said to be no safer or more acceptable
flattery
than that which gives an individual credit for the
quality which of all others he most lacks, and it must
have been on this principle that Jed had attributed
the heavenly virtue of Mercy to his brutal companion.
Evidently flattered by the remark, the now stolid
keeper came forward and inquired of Rudolph if the
fetters were painful.
He
says
that they hurt him, replied Jed, hastening
to speak for the other, and any one can see that it
is so; it will be but a moment's work to shift the
chain to the other leg.
Oh yes, said Hugh, I can do it in a twinkling,
but let me jes lock the door first, because a man in
his case gets dreadful desperate sometimes, and he
might make a rush, and get away from us, you know.
Oh, I'll see to that, exclaimed Jed; and skipping
past the jailer he transferred the key from the outer
to the inner side, and, shutting the door, locked it, but
without removing the key.
Satisfied that all was now safe, and that his prisoner,
however daring, could do nothing against the
combined
efforts of himself and the sailor, Gore stooped
and unlocked the chainremoved it from one leg of
9
Rudolph, and was about transferring it to the other,
when he found himself suddenly lying upon his back,
with Jed astride of his body, and a strong hand at
his throat.
If you speak you will die, said Jed firmlyif
you are quiet you shall not be harmeddo you
understand
?
Purple with fright and suffocation, Hugh winked
in reply, for, pinioned and throttled as he was, it was
the only gesture he could make; and Jed, who had
not come unprepared for his work, produced some
stout cords and a gag, with which, in a few moments,
the helpless jailer was secured beyond the power of
speech or motion. The chain was next applied to
his huge leg and securely locked, and the young men,
trembling with intense excitement, were hastening
toward the door, when a loud knock without fell like
the knell of hope upon their ears.
My dear, screamed a shrill, angry, catamount
like voice through the key-hole, are you inside there?
I want to know, for here is Dominie Megapolensis
waiting to see the poor young man that is to be hung.
My de-e-e-e-r!
A growling, inarticulate noise issuing from the
widely distended jaws of the jailer, manifested his
attempt to reply to this invocation, and Jed, darting
to his side with menacing gestures, crowded an ample
handkerchief into his gulf-like mouth.
He must be in there, continued the woman,
apparently
addressing some one at her side, after
waiting
in vain some moments for an answer; he must be
there, for the key is in the door inside; the lazy fellow
has dropped asleep; and this remark was followed
by another screaming call, and a rattling of the door
that might have awakened the seven sleepers of
Ephesus.
In an agony of suspense, breathless and
motionless
,
stood Jed and Rudolph, yet to the former
returned
at length a portion of the coolness and
equanimity
which had marked all his proceedings. Drawing
his friend aside, he said, Our only hope is in instant
flight, for in three minutes this harridan will raise a
mob. Keep perfectly still, and be guided by me, and
if you get off, and we should be separated, remember
that my hunter stands saddled just outside the wall,
in the woods, about ten rods west of the centre gate
take this tarpaulin and spencerdo as I do, and be
sure not to speak.
So saying, Jed doffed his jacket, exhibiting another
exactly similar beneath it, and drew from his pocket a
crushed cap like the one which he wore. We are
sailors, he continued, belonging to the Dolly, of and
from Boston. Come on and keep calm, and above all
things, don't attempt to run, for the moonlight is like
noonday without, and we shall be distinctly seen.
Resolving to be guided by one who had thus far
shown so much sagacity and prudence, Rudolph
followed
his friend in silence to the door, which was still
rattling in the vigorous grasp of Mrs. Gore. Obeying
the gestures of Jed, he planted himself in a dark corner
adjacent, while the former proceeded to turn the key,
and confront the incensed matron whose voice was
still heard without, mingling with the clatter of the
shaken bars.
Avast there, avast, he said, can't you wait till
the hatches are open, Mrs. Gore? Therecome in
now, if you want toit isn't everybody that is so
anxious to get in a place like this.
What tom-foolery is all this, I should like to know?
said the vixen, bursting into the room, and followed
more leisurely by the venerable and quiet clergyman;
what tom-foolery is thisand who are
you
and
where is that idiot of a Hugh Gore?
Your worthy husband sits yonder, madam, said
Jed, a little unwell, I believe, and the woman darted
to her partner's side, while Jed, followed by Rudolph,
stepped quickly outand the clash of the closing
door, and the sound of the turning lock, mingled with
the shrill feminine scream that arose from within.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Loud
and louder rose the clamor from the jail, as,
arm in arm, Jed and Rudolph descended the outer
steps, and walked into the street; and ere they had
gained the nearest corner, the Stentorian voice of
Hugh, rising like a thunder-tone above the shrill
treble of his wife, told that all impediment to his
speech had been removed. Helphelpstop the
murderersfirehelp, rang in every variety of tone
and accent through the prison bars, until distant
pedestrians
paused to listen, and those more near
hastened with a rush to the scene of the outcry.
The whole street is alarmed, whispered Jed;
we must not run yet; and then raising his voice,
for numbers were passing them every instant, The
Dolly was nearly on her beam-ends, for it blew great
guns, and the breakers wasn't more'n a cable's length
off, when the captain came to me, and says, says he,
Jack, says he
Stop the murderersstop the murderers! came
echoing down the street, and the clatter of coming
feet was heard, and the bell of the old Dutch Church
sent forth a rapid peal; but Jed and Rudolph still
walked moderately forward.
We must walk for a moment more, continued Jed
in a whisper,the corner is close at handit would
be fatal to run here, for the people were still
hastening
past them toward the jail, and eyeing curiously the
two sailors, who, seeming so indifferent to the general
commotion, were sauntering in an opposite direction.
The truth is, the Dolly is a fine craft, he added in
a louder tone, and Rudolph, looking up, saw Sinclair
almost at his elbow passing with the crowd; a little
too square-built mayhap, and rather
The terrific voice of Hugh, sounding at this instant
in their ears, told that the lion was unchained, and on
their very path.
Let some go up Bridge street, he shouted, and
some to Morrisgo some to the river and guard the
boats, and others to the gatesquick, quickwe'll
have them, my boysthey haven't got five minutes the
startstop the murderersstop the murderers! and
the heavy footfall of Hugh echoed far and wide, as
with a long Indian-like lope, he went bounding through
the street.
His voice fell upon the ears of the fugitives just as
they had reached the corner of a road leading to the
North river, and Jed, whispering
Follow now
, dashed
past his companion and led the race. Like the
hunted
herd they ran, but the pack, pursuing, open-mouthed
and yelping, was on their track. Not that the
populace
joined generally in the chase, for the sympathies
of the majority were doubtless with Rudolph, and
some even tried to impede and misdirect the pursuers;
but there was enough of the small retainers and
officials
of government, together with that class who are
ever anxious to curry favor with those in power, to
swell the tide of pursuit to no inconsiderable throng.
The fugitives kept the riverward road until they came
to an open field, or common, which stretched to the
north, and across this, without any abatement of
speed, they directed their course; keeping closely
together. On emerging from the common they were
compelled to cross a public road, beyond which lay
another vacant field, reaching to the wall, which
extended
across the city from river to river, and formed
its northern boundary. Apprehensive of being
intercepted at this road, Jed and Rudolph took a
circuit
westward and crossed to the northern lot in safety,
obtaining a view up the street as they passed which
convinced them that the precaution had not been
superfluous. Three minutes more, and panting with
fatigue, they stood beside the wall, a dozen rods west
of the gate, which, after pausing a moment for breath,
they scaled with little difficulty, and caught sight of
their pursuers not fifty yards behind. A shout of
exultation
from Hugh told that they in turn were
perceived
,
and that their capture was regarded as
certain
.
Jed paused for a moment, and a sickening fear
came upon him as he looked vainly for his steed, but
at the next breath, a welcoming whinny from an
adjoining
copse told not only that his hunter was there,
but that the faithful animal had recognized his
master
.
Rushing to the spot, he disengaged him from
a sapling to which he was fastened, and bade Rudolph
mount and fly.
Never, without you, Jed, exclaimed Groesbeck in
a tone that forbade remonstrance; I will not leave
you in danger.
With
me then, returned the other, springing to
the ample saddle as he spokethere is no time to
parley; Ceph has carried a dead deer besides me,
and I guess he can carry a living man.
Rudolph also mounted, and at the same instant a
shout from the edge of the grove told that they were
again perceived; but answering to his master's voice,
the faithful steed darted forward, and set all pursuit at
defiance. Oaths and angry ejaculations attested the
bitter disappointment of the jailer and his friends as
they stood a moment later upon the deserted spot.
It was a devilish deep-laid plot, whoever the fiend
was that planned it, exclaimed Hugh, as he gazed
after the flying steed; but we must get horses and
followthey're not off the island yet by a long shot.
So saying, he was about to return to the city, when a
shout and commotion at a little distance arrested his
attention.
Here's one of'em nowhere's one of'em, was the
cry, as a dozen men darted into a thicket in chase of
a retreating figure, and soon after emerged with the
trembling tabernacle of poor old Jake, who had been
keeping guard over the hunter, and had indiscreetly
attempted to return before the rabble had dispersed.
As his captors dragged the terrified slave from the
cover of the woods into the moonlight, Hugh leaped
with a shout of exultation toward him, but dreadful
was his chagrin and wrath on perceiving the
character
of his prize.
Who in the fiend's name are
you?
he said,
shaking
the poor negro until his teeth rattled like a castanet.
Trembling from head to foot, and utterly incapable of
speech, Jake listened in silence to this adjuration, for
being utterly unconscious of the object for which his
services had been required by Jed, and unable in the
confused state of his faculties to form a correct idea
of any kind, he never doubted that he had fallen into
the hands of some outlying band of savages, who
were about to roast and eat him without ado.
Who are you? repeated Hugh in a towering
rage, and again shaking his victim.
9*
Oh gor-a-massy, said the negro, holding on to
his wool in momentary expectation of the scalping
knifeoh gor-a-massy, I don't knowI don't know.
A dozen hard cuffs on either side of his head did
not appear in the least to enlighten the bewildered
slave in regard to his identity, although they were
doubtless bestowed with that amiable design; for he
still persisted in saying, not without truth, that he did
not know who he was. The jailer was not aware of
the invulnerability of the African cranium, or of the
very different locality to which flagellation should be
applied on a negro in order to render it effectual.
But poor Jake would have taken his beating more
patiently if he had known how more precious than
rubies, to his master and Rudolph, was every second
of time which was thus employed. This thought
occurred at length to Hugh, who, handing over
the slave to some of his assistants to be preserved for
future examination, hastened back to find means of
prosecuting the chase.
Doleful beyond the power of language to depict,
was the little assembly which had convened on that
memorable evening at the Bowery. But few
comparatively
of the confederates who, scarcely ten days
before, had so joyously separated, sanguine with hope
and expectation, were now assembled; for the
consciousness
of their utter inability to render any
effectual
assistance to Rudolph had deterred many from
incurring personal hazard who otherwise would have
been willing to risk much in his behalf. Confiscation
and death were quite too formidable evils to be
unnecessarily
courted, and although ever ready to respond
to the call of patriotism or duty, their courage was
not of that species which indulges in idle or boyish
bravado. Dear to each of them as Rudolph had
become
,
their own lives and the interests of their
families
were of course not less so; but while they avoided
unnecessary exposure, they gave their leader to
understand
that they were accessible for any purpose
that should appear useful and practicable. Some had
talked of forcible rescue at the gallows, but the
project
was so evidently impossible, and so fraught with
ruin to any who should engage in it, that nothing short
of madness could have induced the attempt. Other
plans equally hopeless were undergoing a dismal
debate
on the evening last named, but although often
indirectly appealed to, an ominous silence sealed the
lips of Stuyvesant. It was in vain that the speakers
looked to him either for approval of their schemes, or
for the suggestion of his own. His looks spoke only of
grief, bitter, intense and hopeless. His thoughts
evidently
extended back to other and more important
wrongs, but they reached forward, too, to the
anticipated
period of retribution and redress.
If fighting could do any good, said Major Ver
Planck, a broad-shouldered and muscular man, who
had seen service in New Swedenif the governor
thinks that fighting can do any good, I am ready
with my sons and my slaves. The negroes are not
the best of soldiers perhaps, but they will make as
good targets for the cartridges of the English troops
as the best of us.
It is folly to talk of force, replied Mynheer Van
Schaick, who being regarded in some respects as the
organ of the governor, was always listened to with
corresponding attention; we may throw away our
lives on the bayonets of the soldiers, and surrender
our estates to the cupidity of government, if we choose
but it won't help Rudolph:
no, my friends, in
thirty-six
hours our young ally will have ceased to live;
we may mourn, but cannot avert his fate.
Old Evert, who had sat long silent, with his hands
and head resting upon his cane, now rose with a
heavy sigh, and walked across the floor; and the
whisper
went around that Rudolph and Effie were
betrothed
,
and that Evert had only on that day learned
it for the first, and that his daughter was even yet
ignorant of her lover's danger. It was a melancholy
scene, and tears sprang afresh to many an eye, when
a sudden clatter of hoofs without, and a shout from
the voice of Jed, brought the whole company in haste
to the door.
Give us fresh horses, for the love of Heaven! he
exclaimedCeph is already blown, and the officers
are close behind!
None stopped to question, but rushing to the stables,
the fleetest steeds were chosen and saddled in a breath
and scarce had their echoing feet died away in the
distance before the sound of others approaching from
the city was heard. So sudden and brief had been
the interruption, and so intense the excitement, that
scarcely any could believe it was a reality; but there
was no time for gratulations, for prudence of course
demanded the instant dissolution of a conclave which
might so naturally create suspicion as to its design.
With hasty adieus the guests departed by a retired
road, and by the time Hugh and his train had reached
the governor's house all was quiet; even Bucephalus,
Jed's discarded steed, having been removed into an
adjoining wood, lest his presence might betray his
master's agency in the rescue. It may be deemed no
reasonable cause of surprise, that while the main body
of the pursuers pressed hotly forward on the
high-way
,
a portion of them stopped to search the
premises
of the ex-governor. Yet not a little amazed
did Stuyvesant seem at the Goth-like irruption into
his domicil, where he was found quietly smoking his
pipe, and reading with great interest an Amsterdam
gazette, some eighteen months old, which he had long
known by heart. Feigning the wrath which his
ecstacy
of joy would not allow him to feel, he beheld
the myrmidons of the law overrunning his house from
cellar to attic, fierce as hounds seeking to unearth
their prey; and many were the unintelligible taunts
which he safely showered upon them in Low Dutch,
while following them up from room to room. On
their sudden departure also he blazed forth a fire in
their rear of double chain-shot anathemas, which,
although formidable to hear, is believed to have
produced
no fatal effects.
Whoever had seen the broad, fat, laughing face that
re-entered Governor Stuyvesant's house to the double
quick-step music of a lignum vit leg, might have
believed that he had encountered the original Comus,
grown old and crippled. Thump, thump, thump, rang
the heavy blows across the echoing floor, as, scarcely
assisted by his cane, he walked rapidly to and fro in
a whirlwind of joyous excitement.
They'll never catch my grays, he said; never,
never; they might as well chase the wind; Ru and
Jed will be at Devil Creek in half an hour, and from
there they will soon reach a place of safety in the
wilderness. They'll never catch my Donner and
Blitzennevernever!
Let it suffice for the present to say that the
venerable
Peter had not overpraised his steeds, or
miscalculated
results; for long before daylight the
discomfited
pursuers returned, utterly baffled in their search.
They had entirely lost track of the fugitives, being
unable to learn at what point they had crossed the
shallow creek which bounds the island on the north.
That they had found shelter somewhere in the
boundless
wilderness which stretched interminably
northward
was the only fact, galling, scathing,
rage-inciting
,
which they were able to bear back to their
awfully incensed governor, Sir Francis Lovelace.
Old Jake meanwhile was in prison, in full view of
the gallows, and in the firmest possible faith that his
unfortunate body was destined to be framed therein
with all reasonable despatch. He had been confined
to await the leisure of his captors, who felt certain of
thus possessing a direct clew to the mysterious agent
in the rescue of Rudolph. He was honored
accordingly
on the ensuing morning by a visit from the
governor
in person, accompanied by the crest-fallen but
still scowling jailer, and no small train beside. Fully
impressed with the belief that he was to be led to
instant
execution, the negro went darting like a
madman
about the room, diving into all imaginable nooks
and corners to evade his supposed pursuers; and it
was only after much delay and parley that he could
be made to comprehend what was really wanted of
him. But the whole story was at length elicited, and
great was the astonishment and indignation of
Lovelace
and his retainers on learning that it was the
young Knickerbocker who had thus wrested their
victim from their hands, and brought disgrace and
ridicule upon the government. While the
examination
was pending, Hugh, who stood a little apart from
the rest of the company, and apparently quite
inattentive
to the proceedings, was diligently engaged in
arranging a sliding noose to a stout hempen cord.
When is it your excellency's pleasure that it shall
be done? he said, addressing the governor as the
latter
was about to withdraw.
What, Hughwhat? do you want to hang the
negro?
Why, yes, said Hugh, I suppose he is to be
turned off, of course; it may as well be now as at
any other time; everything is ready, and it is
certainly
very clear from his own confessions that he
assisted in the escape.
But he hasn't been tried, Hugh, or sentenced,
said the governor, apparently in doubt, and looking
very earnestly in the jailer's face.
Wal, I suppose that can be done afterwards just
as well, answered Hugh, playing with the rope
or for that matter, here is a full Court presentyour
honor and Justices Smith and Clark; you've heern
his confessions, and now you can sentence him.
Very truevery true, said the governor, while
the negro, pale with fright, his teeth audibly
chattering
,
stood staring, speechless, at him. What say
you, brethren of the bench?my opinion is that the
negro is guilty of aiding in the forcible rescue of
Rudolph Groesbeck, a convicted traitor
Hugh stretched his rope, and made more sure of
the knot
and my sentence is that he be discharged
without further punishment. He acted under his
master's orders, said Lovelace, opening the door,
and knew nothing of the foul crime which he was
abettingscamper home, you black dog; and Jake,
darting through the doorway, went bounding through
the streets like a madman, looking ever and anon
behind him, to see if he was pursued.
It shall never be said, continued Lovelace, that
we wreaked our vengeance on a brainless slave; and
now, my friends, we will see what steps can be taken
for the recapture of our prisoner, and his very
valorous
friend, for that we shall have them yet, you may
be well assured.
So saying, the governor and his attendants
withdrew
,
and Mr. Hugh Gore, scowling not a little, hung
his hempen necklace on a nail, and wondered very
much whether he should ever really have the
pleasure
of adjusting it under the ears of any human being.
More especially and more longingly did he wonder
whether he should ever be able to pay so delicate a
mark of attention to that very jovial gentleman who
had treated him to such liberal draughts of Mr.
Huyck's genuine Jamaica.
CHAPTER XIX.
The
danger was not past. Grateful as had been
the sense of relief experienced by Rudolph's friends
at his escape, they could not but feel that his
situation
was still one of extreme hazard, and that another
of their number equally worthy, had now become
involved
in the peril. Outlawed men, co-tenants with
the savage of a barren wilderness, with no
accessible
resort in civilized life, which was not under the
jurisdiction of the government they had offended,
what hope was there for them, of surviving the perils
to which they were exposed? That Lovelace would
not for an hour intermit his efforts for their capture,
there was every reason to believe. Rumors of his
contemplated movements came continually to their
ears, and it soon became certain that a company of
horsemen were to be sent out to scour the forest in
every direction. These it was thought could not fail
of success; and having returned triumphant, the
affront
which had been offered to the majesty of the
law, was to be expiated by a double sacrifice.
But the Dutch citizens meanwhile were not idle.
Scarcely an hour elapsed on the day following the
escape, in which some horsemen might not be seen
travelling northward, slowly and quietly at first,
but outstripping the wind when the forest road was
gained. These, bearing provisions for the temporary
sustenance of their friends, hoped to discover their
retreat, and he enabled not only to administer to their
wants, but to keep them advised of the movements of
their enemies. But friend and foe were alike
unsuccessful
in their efforts, and three days of futile search
had elapsed when tidings of a new device on the part
of the officials of the law diffused terror among the
opposite party. Indian scouts or runners were to be
sent out who could thread the mazy forests with ease,
and follow the trail of the light-footed deer across the
pathless wilds; and these were to be accompanied by
armed men in sufficient numbers to make sure of the
capture of the fugitives. There were no Indians
who, properly speaking, sojourned in the city, but
there was a class of this people, erratic as comets,
who emerged at irregular intervals from the
wilderness
,
and passing a few days as hangers-on at the
fort, and in the vicinity of those shops where the
enticing
fire-water was to be procured, departed again
as suddenly as they had appeared. Among these
was one known as the Raven, a noted runner or news
carrier, among the tribes; who was famous also for
his accuracy in following a trail, however carefully
it had been concealed. His reputation in these
matters
was founded on the concurrent testimony of many
of his red brethren, none of whom pretended to
compete
with him in these qualities. But the Raven was
at this time absent from town, and as his motions,
governed by unknown laws, were too eccentric to
admit of being calculated, particularly when subjected
to certain disturbing influences, bottled and corked,
which he usually carried with him from the city,
it became necessary first to send a messenger of more
humble pretensions in quest of him. One of his own
people was accordingly despatched to bring him in,
and in the mean time every preparation was made for
the expedition, which it was believed could not fail
of success. The anxiety of the friends of the young
men greatly increased, and being themselves closely
watched on all sides, it became difficult even to
concert
any countervailing action, much more to carry
it into effect. Evert, from an ecstasy of joy, had
sunk again into utter despondency, and was haunted
continually by visions of his son and Rudolph
perishing
in the forests or dragged as prisoners to the city;
while Effie, who had been informed of all the
circumstances
on the evening of the flight, was tossed by
those tumultuous emotions of hope and fear, which,
racking the soul with agony, forbade any distinct
perception
of realities.
It was in this state of mind that, on the afternoon
of the fourth day succeeding the escape, she resorted
alone, as was then frequently her custom, to a small
observatory on the house-top. From this prominent
post of observation she surveyed the road which led
northward from the city, and gazing far away
toward
those boundless forests, which, somewhere
within
their depths, sheltered her exiled friends, she
reflected
with anguish on the pains and perils to which
they were exposed. But when, from the frowning
forests, her gaze ascended to the blue summer sky
which was bending tranquilly above them, her
tortured
breast became more calm; for then she
remembered
her accustomed reliance, in every strait, on that
Infinite Power and Beneficence which saves alike by
many or by few. Again changing her field of view,
she gazed down the bay, which was slightly ruffled
by a southern breeze, and her eyes rested upon the
distant point where the converging shores leave but
a narrow outlet to that wider expanse of waters
known as the lower bay. Was it a cloud that hung
midway between the shores, and moved slowly
toward
the north? Another followed in the distance,
and yet another was turning the furthermost point of
land; and now she perceives distinctly, as she shades
her eyes with her hands and looks more closely, that
they are not clouds, but vessels with their sails spread,
coming in from sea, and that two more have been
added to the number. So rare an occurrence could
not fail to excite surprise, and Effie hastened to
inform
her father, who was sitting in his accustomed
corner of the stoop below.
Five vessels in the Narrows, standing up the bay,
do you say? asked the old man, trembling as he rose,
and looking with almost maniacal wildness at his
daughter.
Yes, papa, said Effie; you can see them
distinctly
from the house-top.
God of Heaven! exclaimed Evert reverentially,
clasping his hands and looking upwards, thou hast
sent us aid at last.
Papadear papa! screamed Effie, clinging to
him with sudden alarm, what is it that you mean?
It is the Dutch fleet, my child
, exclaimed Evert,
springing to the stairway with the step of a youth
It is the Dutch fleet, and has come to save us all
from ruin.
Climbing with agility to the roof, the old man
dashed
the blinding tears from his eyes, and gazing
earnestly
down the bay, saw what seemed a glorious
confirmation
of his hopes. The ships had passed the
Narrows and were coming up under flowing sail
toward
the city; and while he trembled lest there should
be some mistake, the voice of Effie was again heard
calling from below:
Papa, oh papahere comes young Harmon Van
Rensselaer riding furiously down the street; his
horse is covered with foam, and he is swinging his
hat in the air; he comes this way, papa, directly
toward
our house; and by the time that Evert had
again reached the piazza, the equestrian was
galloping
down the lawn.
A fleeta fleet from home!
he shouted, pausing
but a breath, and pointing down the bay; I have
seen the colors of the States at their masts; and
turning
his steed, his flushed face vanished as suddenly as
it had appeared, and the clattering of his horse's hoofs
was heard as he hastened to diffuse the tidings, and
his echoing voice came back as he shouted to some
passing friend,
A fleeta fleet from home!
Like the Highland henchman, with his cross of fire,
speeding to call his clan to arms, the young Van
Rensselaer
,
heedless of danger, and exulting in the
glorious
intelligence which he bore, passed from house to
house spreading the news among the principal Dutch
inhabitants of the city; and then turning his panting
steed northward, he went dashing toward the
Bowery
.
Governor Stuyvesant was sitting on his stoop,
giving directions from time to time to the slow-witted
Hans, who,
tte--tte
, with a row of promising
cabbage-heads
in the adjoining garden, was tending and
cultivating them with a sort of fraternal solicitude.
What madman comes here? he exclaimed, as
Harmon came galloping up; put a beggar on
horse-back
,
and he'll ride to
Huzza! huzza! huzza! shouted Van Rensselaer,
leaping from his steed, and swinging his cap as he
rushed on the stoop, and seizing and shaking both the
old man's hands at once. There is a Dutch fleet
standing up the bay with all sails set, he said; in
three hours New York will again belong to Holland.
Are you sure, Harmon? asked the governor
energetically
,
when after several seconds he found voice
to reply; are you quite sure that this glorious news
is true?
A booming gun at this moment, reverberating
through the air, seemed to answer the inquiry;
another and another followed in quick succession.
They are themselves announcing their approach,
said Harmon rapidlythere is, there can be no
mistake; I myself have seen the colors of the States,
floating from the mastshuzza! huzza! and
Stuyvesant joined vociferously in the shouts of
his young companion, swinging his cane meanwhile
over his head, and making the whole house resound
with the clatter of his wooden leg. Hans next added
his hoarse voice to the concert, and a rushing
concourse
of negroes, springing as if by magic from every
quarter, soon joined in the deafening cheers. Doors
and windows flew open, and the whole household of
the governor came pouring out to learn the cause of
the uproar, and finally to join heartily in the
merriment
.
The frightened fowls fled cackling in every
directionthe dogs turned their noses up into the air,
and barked knowingly toward the chimnies; and in
the midst of the uproar, the sound of wheels was
heardfirst from one direction, and then from another,
and the Van Schaicks, and Van Tines, and Van
Pelts, and Van Dams, came pouring in and adding
their shouts and exultations to the tumult. In ten
minutes the whole of that band of confederates who
had been present on the night of Rudolph's
dangerous
commission were re-assembled, with many more
10
beside. The most hearty congratulations were
exchanged
on all sides, and nothing was seen but shaking
of hands and nodding of heads, and nothing heard
but a Babel-like jargon resounding on every side,
interspersed with noisy laughter and every token
of delight. The hubbub of a New-England town
meeting, or the din of a fourfold auction in the
reverberating
rotunda of the modern Exchange, may serve
in some degree to illustrate the uproar.
But the turmoil subsided at length, and the assembly
resolved itself into a sort of informal council, or what
in more modern parlance might perhaps be termed a
provisional government, with a view to take any
necessary measures for a general co-operation with
their foreign friends. Various expedients were
proposed
,
but the upshot of the deliberations was, that
every man should hasten home, and arming himself
and his slaves, stand ready for such emergencies as
should arise. A committee of vigilance was appointed,
and Major Ver Planck was put in command of the
forces.
We'll get retty, my friends, said the Major
but ef there are five sheeps-of-war there won't be
mooch for us to dothey'll batter down the fort, and
all three of the redoubts, and half the town besides, in
ten minutesbut then we'll get retty, my friends
we'll get retty.
Oh yes, said Yawpy Poffenburgh, who had been
alarmingly pale for some time past, but who now
brightened
up at the thought that there would be no
fighting
Oh
yes, let us get ready by all means; we are
all willing, I hope, to venture our lives in such a cause,
and my advice is, that just as soon as the city is taken,
we all march down in a body and welcome our
deliverers.
It may perhaps be necessary to march down a
little
before
the city is taken, Mr. Poffenburgh, said
the governor, and that will certainly show our valor
quite as well; but of that we can judge better after the
fort has been summoned, and after we shall have
established
a communication with our friends.
The next thing in order was to transmit intelligence
of these events, if possible, to Rudolph and Jed, and it
was resolved to send messengers immediately in every
direction in pursuit of them. A dozen young men at
once volunteered on this service, pledging themselves
to explore the forests for a week, rather than return
without success. The Raven had not yet made his
appearance, and it was confidently believed that he
could be intercepted, and made to serve their own
purposes, inasmuch as the intended governmental
expedition
would doubtless be at once abandoned. If
he could not be found, however, it was hoped that
other similar agents could be procured in the
wilderness
,
and, full of confident anticipation, the little party
of cavalry set out on their expedition on that very
evening. The party meanwhile had dispersed, Mr.
Knickerbocker only remaining to smoke a pipe with
his friend, and quaff a bumper of genuine Hollands to
the thrice glorious event which was yet too full of
dazzling hope to be contemplated with any degree of
equanimity.
Of the events which ensued on that ever
memorable
thirtieth of July, in the year of grace 1673, the
historical reader needs scarcely to be informed. The
fleet came to anchor at a considerable distance below
the city, and on that same evening Colonel Manning,
the commandant of the fort, impelled doubtless by a
sense of its indefensible condition, sent down the keys
to the Dutch admirals; an act for which he was
subsequently
tried by court-martial, and degraded, but
escaped severer punishment. But what language
shall describe the scene of the ensuing morning, when
the hundreds of sleepless eyes which had outwatched
the stars, waiting for the momentous events of the
coming day, were greeted at dawn with the sight of
their native flag floating in triumph from every corner
of the fort. The work was accomplished. The
mighty achievement of which they had talked, and
thought, and dreamed for nine long years, was wrought
as if by magic before their eyes; and the New
Netherlands were once more a province of Holland.
Of the details of the capitulation, and of the surrender
of the forts at Albany and on the Delaware, which
soon after ensued, it is unnecessary to speak. Let it
suffice to say that the re-conquest was thorough,
complete, and undisputed.
CHAPTER XX.
The
admirals and captains of the victorious fleet
held a council on shipboard before disembarking, for
the purpose of appointing a governor to the province,
having been thereto empowered by the home
government
;
and it having been ascertained that Stuyvesant,
by reason of his age and infirmities, preferred not to
be recalled to that post, the dignity was devolved
upon one of their own number, Captain Andrew
Colve. The new governor, the admirals, and other
officers of the fleet, assembled on the same afternoon,
by invitation, at the house of Mr. Knickerbocker,
where they were met by the principal Dutch
inhabitants
of the city. Here a scene of unrestrained hilarity
ensued, in which, without any undue exultation over
their adversaries, every one gave free scope to his
exuberant joy. There were a multitude of matters to
be discussed, pertaining both to the expedition and the
taking of the city, and also to the state of the pending
war in Europe; and as the party, to the number of
fifty or sixty, were divided into little knots of six or
eight, in each of which there were at least two
talkers
to one listener, it will be believed that a very
respectable amount of colloquial power was kept in
operation.
The governor, ex-governor Stuyvesant, and the two
admirals, of course received a more respectful
hearing
than others, but joy like grief is a great leveller,
and there was no very marked deference to rank
exacted
or bestowed. Indeed, there came a time before
the evening passed away, in which a considerable
degree of confusion must have resulted from any
attempt to establish rights of precedence; Gevernor
Colve having been heard to address a second
lieutenant
by the title of Admiral, and the venerable
Stuyvesant
making some earnest inquiries when the attack
on the fort was to commence, as he had put Yawpy
Poffenburgh in command of the forces, and they were
all ready to march. If, however, any such little
aberrations
occurred, it was at a late hour in the evening,
when people grow sleepy and naturally make
mistakes
.
There was, it is true, a very large punch-bowl
standing on the sideboard, cheek by jowl with a
pitcher of spiced toddy, and now and then a decanter
of the raw material, and the fumes which arose from
these sources may possibly have had something to do
with the matter. But this is getting altogether ahead
of the story. It was at an earlier hour, and long
before
sunset, that the supper-table was set out on the
long piazza, for there was no room in the house
competent
for such a purpose, and if there had been, there
could have been none half as pleasant. The fresh air
from the river circulated freely through the porch,
while the large shade trees adjacent excluded the
sun, and gave shelter to a band of feathered musicians,
which, flitting briskly about, kept up a sort of
chirruping
chorus to the shouts and laughter that arose from
within. As the superintendence of this momentous
part of the entertainment had been committed to Effie,
her sense of responsibility was a very weighty one,
and probably not materially inferior to that of
Governor
Colve on taking his new command. But dear
Effie had the assistance of the family slaves, and of
six borrowed ones beside, in addition to which a row
of amateurs, to the number of fifteen or twenty,
decorated
the outside of the piazza, looking on with every
demonstration of delight, which owl-like eyes and
white teeth could give, and ready to render any extra
assistance that might be required. Indeed, any
manifestation
of a desire for their aid was apt to be
followed
by a struggle for the honor of rendering it, which
created no slight disturbance; but the good feeling
was too general to allow of any censure being
bestowed
for such a cause. Although Effie's joy, like
that of her father, was materially moderated by her
fears for Rudolph and Jed, yet the spirit of hope
predominated
;
for the measures which had been taken
for the discovery of the young men, it was believed,
could scarcely fail of success. It was a sumptuous
repast, around which, at a summons from Jake, now
transformed into head butler, the happy party
gathered
,
and remained standing, while Dominie
Megapolensis
,
his white locks resting on his shoulders, invoked a
blessing from above. The rich and savory dishes
which sent up their flavor from every side were not a
little grateful to the senses of men who were not
accustomed to slight the creature comforts of life;
and more especially to that portion of them, who for
months preceding had been restricted to the coarser
fare incident to a life at sea. How gloatingly did
their eyes fall upon the dishes of roasted and stewed,
and broiled and baked, which were scattered in
profusion
on every side; the tender juicy steaks, drowned
in gravy; the huge tureens of oysters; the rashers of
bacon and new-laid eggs, the roasted ducks, and
roasted
chickens, and roasted geese; the
saurkraut
, and
kohlslaa
, and
simaa
and
rulliches;
to say nothing of
a side table laden with pies and puddings, and a
perfect
Himmaleh of doughnuts; and with the
many-twisted
,
crisp, crumbling crullers, which were made
on principle so that every part should be of just the
thickness of Effie's little finger. The beverage of tea
was unknown at that period in this country, and
formed
of course no part of the repast, but, as has been
already hinted, there was no lack of certain other
potables, which in those dark ages were deemed
reasonably
palatable. Conversation sank to a very low
ebb for a while, being superseded by the clatter of
knives and forks, and by the occasional clash of
conflicting
waiters, one of whom, being lost in admiration
of Admiral Evertsen's golden sword-hilt, deposited a
dish of oyster-soup in the ample lap of an adjoining
burgher.
Effie, being the only lady present on this occasion,
bloomed like a rose in a potato-patch. Her
beautiful
face, of course, lost nothing by contrast with the
coarser features with which she was surrounded; and
a fat bachelor lieutenant devoted every breath of time
that he could possibly spare from his very eager
deglutition
,
to staring at her. Indeed, he had nearly
concluded before the meal was finished, that if old
Mr. Knickerbocker could give her anything of a
reasonable
dowry, he would be disposed to make her Mrs.
10*
Simon Swackhoffer with all due despatch. But the
meal was nearly ended and the guests had begun to eat
more leisurely, and Governor Stuyvesant's man Hans,
who was inseparable from his master, and who had been
sitting for the last hour in a quiet corner of the stoop,
in a dozing half-dreamy state, had begun to calculate
at each waking how near his own chance at the
tempting viands had approached. And the waiters
within, and the waiters without, knowing full well that
they would be stinted in none of the luxuries on which
their eyes had long been feasting, were making
similar
calculations as to time, and chuckling at each sign
of a guest giving out. But Hans has awakened more
fully than usual; he has even opened his lips in that
august presence; he has raised his handhe speaks,
he gesticulates, and the outsiders are stricken dumb
at his audacity.
Hark! said Hans, raising his forefinger, and all
eyes were turned towards him, Governor Stuyvesant
frowning not a little.
Hark! he repeated, still elevating his hand.
What does the idiot mean? asked Stuyvesant,
angrilywhat do you hear, boy?
It's Donner and Blitzen! said the lad;
I
know
their gallop!
A slight scream arose from Effie;Evert and
Stuyvesant
,
with half of the guests, sprang to their feet,
and rushed out on the lawn, while the naval officers,
ignorant at first of what was meant, looked on in
utter amazement. Hans was not deceived. In two
minutes Jed and Rudolph were in the arms of their
friends, pulled and hauled on every side, thronged and
pressed, and climbed upon, and held by the hands, and
by the arms, and by the shoulders, and questioned
with thirty questions at once, and informed by thirty
voices of what they already knew, that New York
was reconquered, and that they were both safe from
the gibbet, and that the great admirals and the new
governor were all then and there present. The
paternal
eye of Evert was the first to perceive that the
young men were suffering severely from fatigue and
famine, and that no kindness would be as appreciable
by them as food and repose. They were therefore
suffered, after a formal presentation to the strangers,
to withdraw to another room, promising to rejoin the
company in the course of the evening. Effie had
vanished from the party at the first alarm, and to her,
as may well be supposed, the first thoughts of the
new-comers were directed. They met at once and
together; it was a voiceless interview at first, in which
tears that could not be repressed told of feelings that
could not be uttered. Pale, hollow-cheeked, and
travel-stained, the fainting young men sank exhausted
into seats, and gave way to feelings which a greater
degree of stength would have enabled them to
restrain
.
But a little repose, and a little speedy
refreshment
,
and the cheering voice of Effie, who flew
bustling
in every direction to administer to their wants,
acted like a charm upon the sufferers, and at the end
of an hour Jed was sufficiently restored to rejoin his
father's guests. Not so, however, with Rudolph, who
did not deem it safe to abandon his medical adviser
until a much later period. When he did so, however,
the renewed sparkling of his eye, and a general
vivacity
of manner, gave token of some change of
treatment
which had proved highly favorable to his case.
On joining the company, he found himself, moreover,
at once transformed into a lion of very formidable
dimensionsa very Lybian both in roar and mane.
He was not prepared for the congratulations which
poured in upon him from all sides, and much less for
being told by the gallant Admiral Evertsen that his
patriotic services, his self-devoting heroism, and his
near approach to martyrdom, should not only be duly
represented at home, but that they would not be
overlooked
by the new colonial government.
When the excitement occasioned by Rudolph's
entrance
had somewhat subsided, and conversation had
again become general, Governor Stuyvesant, whose
countenance had long given token of some earnest
purpose, rose with much emotion to propose a toast.
The anxious and inquiring look which he gave at the
same time to the admirals and the new governor
evinced that it was not without some degree of
trepidation
and doubt that he spoke. A general silence
prevailed, and all eyes were fixed wonderingly on the
speaker, when, raising his brimming glass he said, I
give you
Justice to Evert Knickerbocker!
There was a moment of painful doubt, for although
all present were familiar with the history of Evert's
wrongs, the former apathy of the home government
on the subject had created fears that even now, when
it was so easy to award restitution, the new governor
might be backward about doing so. The suspense,
however, lasted but a moment. No sooner had
Admiral
Evertsen fully comprehended the meaning of
the toast, than, elevating his glass, he repeated it in an
emphatic voice; Benckes and Colve did the same, and
the words, Justice to Evert Knickerbocker,
resounded
in a hearty chorus from every part of the table,
followed by a clinking of glasses, and a hearty three
times three, led off by Governor Colve himself. At
the next moment Evert's friends crowded around him
with hearty congratulations, while the old man, taken
entirely by surprise, was able only with tears and
disjointed
words to express his emotions. The party
dispersed at a late hour, in merry mood, and on the
next day Mr. Knickerbocker received a valid patent
for the whole length and breadth of those very
domains
which sixteen years before had been voted to
him in council. Whether the claims of the heirs of
Sharp would under other circumstances have been at
all considered, may be a matter of conjecture; but
the abduction of Hiram, and the uncertainty whether
he was in existence or not, had made it impossible for
Lovelace to issue a patent either to him or his
children
;
and the title had been withheld to await some
settlement, either by lapse of time or otherwise, of
that question. The title to the other two thirds had
also remained in the English government, and the
whole thus passing by reconquest to the new
sovereignty
,
there was nothing in the way of awarding the
most full and complete restitution. It was done, and
Evert did not neglect, this time, either the recording of
his deed, or the subsequent safe disposition of the
original document.
CHAPTER XXI.
On
that memorable day which beheld the
retransfer
of the province of New York to the Dutch,
Mr. Benhadad Sharp was absent from the city, being
engaged on his estates, renewing some expired leases,
and grinding the faces of some very poor and very
industrious tenants.
Never since I have been aa patroon, said
Benhadad to himself, assuming a title which he had
long covetednever since I have been a patroon,
he said, as he journeyed leisurely homeward, did I
see such indolence and neglect; and they to prate
about agues and fevers, and their troops of children
to be fed and clothed, the little dirty ragamuffins! but
they'll find there's to be a change: I've raised on 'em
all round, enough to make a hundred pounds extra in
my pocket for the next year, and I shall tell the
governor
to do the same. I'm harder than Mr.
Knickerbocker
,
am I, Mr. Simpkins?very well, I'll be
harder
still next year; I'll have no lazy whining fellows
about me; for Simpkins and Schmidt and Thompson,
who had swarms of youngsters, had all told the young
landlord how Evert had always thrown off something
of his dues from them on account of their children;
I'm harder, am I? continued the soliloquistvery
wellI'll be harder still, and teach you better
manners
I'll
Bang! bang! bang! came the sound of the cannon up
the bay, echoing far and wide across the silent waters,
and over the distant hills; for it was evening, and the
admirals had just received the keys off Staten Island,
as has been related in the preceding chapter.
What in the name of wonder does all that mean?
continued Sharp, who had now reached the ferry
boat, a huge scow, pulled by ropes across the river, at
its narrowest partwhat's all that firing at the fort,
Mr. Schnipper?
'Tain't at the fort, that ain't, Mr. Sharp, by no
manner of means, said the ferryman, who, being a
Dutchman, was chuckling delightedly as he spoke;
it's the Dutch, sir, that isthe Dutch, sirsixteen
men-of-war, which are going to take the city at
day-break
to-morrow mornin'that's all.
There are no words in any human vocabulary to
express Benhadad's astonishment and alarm, for,
obtuse
as he was on many points, he was remarkably
clear-sighted in whatever pertained to his own
pecuniary
interest, and he foresaw at once the whole
probable sequence of events in relation to the
Knickerbocker
manor. How great was his cause for grief
will be better understood when it is said, that, in a
formal division with his sister of their patrimony, he
had accepted the manor lands as his half, felicitating
himself not a little on having obtained the lion's share.
That no re-division could be hoped for, had been
rendered
quite certain by another singular event which
had occurred a short time prior, being nothing less
than the sudden marriage of Euphemia to one Charles
Augustus Sinclair, late a Captain in the Spanish naval
service. Benhadad did not reply to the ferryman, and
was aroused from his painful reverie only by being
notified
that the boat was ready. But if the boat was
ready, the traveller was not. Visions of a tremendous
bombardmentof red-hot shells flying through the
airof a desperate encounter under the walls of the
fort, began to take possession of his mind, and
inasmuch
as fighting was quite against his principles, he
resolved to return to his estate, and there await the
expected thunderbolt which was to shatter his fortunes.
If this anticipation was not a very pleasing one, it was at
least of no long continuance; for in forty-eight hours
Mr. Knickerbocker was in person on the estate, fully
reinstated in his rights, and receiving the
congratulations
of his thronging tenantry.
The new government did not stop midway in its
measures. We must give Rudolph a potato-patch,
said Colve to his councillors at one of their earliest
sittings
,
running his finger meanwhile over a number of
unappropriated
townships on a map which was spread out
before him, and finally selecting one containing about ten
square miles, in the neighborhood of the
Knickerbocker
manor. That will do, he said; what say you,
gentlemenhas Rudolph Groesbeck deserved such a
mark of his country's gratitude? A unanimous
voice approved the governor's liberality, and the
grant was immediately made.
It required time to appreciate the magical change
which had been so suddenly wrought in the fortunes
of the Knickerbockers, and of Rudolph. Their
indigence
had been changed to affluence, their danger to
security, their distress to happiness, and no trace of
departed griefs remained, excepting that remembrance
of their existence, which serves to heighten the
enjoyment
of present prosperity. Many were the
subsequent
scenes of hilarity which ensued at the old
homestead; but the earliest and most prominent of
these was one which will be too easily imagined to
require any detailed description. Evert's house was
one of ample dimensions, but it was for once filled to
overflowing; for old and young were there,
gray-bearded
men, and ancient matrons, blooming belles
and dashing beaux, and even wee children, to attend
the mystical ceremony by which Rudolph and Effie
were to be united in perpetual league. It was the
season of flowers, and the bride, in accordance with
the simple tastes of the age, was adorned with a
roseate
diadem, which, however much a decoration,
manifestly
received more lustre than it imparted.
Rudolph's
commanding figure, the joyous Jed, the
venerable
Evert, with Stuyvesant and Colve and old
Dominie Megapolensis, erect and stately, were among
the conspicuous features of the assemblage. The
crowded room, the open windows thronged on the
outer side by guests who could not get in, the tier of
slaves still further removed, and peering, with sable
necks outstretched, from the tops of adjacent railings
and fences, presented altogether a picture of delight
and satisfaction, not often seen or easily forgotten.
The merry-making which followed the ceremony was
free and unrestrained, and lasted until a late hour in
the evening: the pillars of the long piazza being made
to shake by the hour to the tread of the twenty-four
couple of contra-dancers, who responded to the
violent
and tugging efforts of three African fiddlers,
perched on an eminence just without the porch. As
there was nothing to mar the pleasures of the
evening
,
so did these prove a significant prelude to the
long after years of harmony and happiness, which
marked the lot of the newly wedded.
Jed continued his woodland sports, until diverted
from the chase by a new variety of game, in the
pursuit
of which he exhibited his usual skill and success.
In other words, he soon brought home a gentle bride;
but the friends whom adversity had united, prosperity
did not separate. In that ancient homestead,
rendered
sacred by its connection with the marked events
of the past, they all resided together for many happy
years. Evert lived to an advanced age, and smoked
a thousand peaceful pipes in his favorite corner of
the stoop, slightly disturbed perhaps, at times, by the
shouts of noisy children on the green, who called him
by a new and welcome name. Upspringing like
roses about his path, these became the light of his
eyes, and the core of his heart. The morning and
the eve of lifehow strongly do they contrast, and
yet how harmoniously do they blend; the innocence
of childhood, and the piety of guileless age, alike
eliciting
the smiles and protection of that Infinite
Beneficence
whose purity they reflect.
Governor Stuyvesant lived also to a ripe age, and,
like Evert, in the enjoyment of serene and tranquil
days, scarcely disturbed even by the subsequent
cession
of the province to England by the Dutch, which
occurred at the close of the war between those
nations. He died in August, 1682, and an ancient
slab of freestone, still to be seen against the base of
St. Mark's church in the modern metropolis, indicates
the place of his repose. There are gorgeous
monuments
to his more wealthy descendants within the
edifice, but the old, gray, weather-beaten stone
without
,
alone proclaims the resting-place of the illustrious
founder of the family.
Lovelace was ordered to depart from the province,
and Egbert Groesbeck, bankrupt in purse and in
reputation
,
was among those who joined the train of the
ex-governor, and went to England. He did not
scruple
however to receive a liberal present from his
brother on the eve of departure, or to suggest the
address to which any similar mark of favor might be
forwarded.
As neither Ripley nor Sharp was ever heard of
again, it is supposed that the former concluded to
throw off his allegiance to Sinclair, and take the
destinies
of the Zephyr and its prisoner into his own
hands, in which event the fate of the latter may
readily
be conjectured.
The means by which Captain Sinclair had
succeeded
in supplanting his friend in the affections of
Euphemia were not altogether apparent, but it soon
became evident that the latter had no very strong
hold upon her volatile and jovial partner. He soon
began to manifest a singular propensity to transmute
his property of every description into bullion, and,
with the exception of a small estate which had
fortunately
been settled upon his wife, accomplished his
purpose, although of course at a great sacrifice.
Soon afterwards he received some important
intelligence
from Spain, which demanded his presence in
that country for a few months, whither he accordingly
departed, taking care to carry his gold along with
him. Singularly enough, however, the Captain
neglected
to return to America, and it was supposed
that he had been prevailed upon to remain abroad by
the urgent entreaties of his many distinguished friends,
the Count Sylvio not excepted.
THE END.